Ohio, session 136, SB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 303.12, 303.59, 307.94, 3501.01, 17
3501.38, 3501.381, 3501.39, 3503.13, 3503.14, 3503.15, 3503.151, 18
3503.152, 3503.153, 3503.16, 3503.19, 3503.20, 3503.21, 3503.33, 19
3505.181, 3505.182, 3505.183, 3505.20, 3509.02, 3509.03, 20
3509.04, 3509.05, 3509.051, 3509.06, 3509.07, 3509.08, 3509.09, 21

S. B. No. 153 Page 2
As Introduced
3511.02, 3511.04, 3511.05, 3511.09, 3511.11, 3511.14, 3513.07, 22
3513.261, 3517.01, 3517.12, 3519.02, 3519.05, 3519.16, 3599.12, 23
and 3599.21 be amended and sections 3503.201, 3503.202, and 24
3511.052 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 25
Sec. 303.12. (A)(1) Amendments to the zoning resolution 26
may be initiated by motion of the county rural zoning 27
commission, by the passage of a resolution by the board of 28
county commissioners, or by the filing of an application by one 29
or more of the owners or lessees of property within the area 30
proposed to be changed or affected by the proposed amendment 31
with the county rural zoning commission. The board of county 32
commissioners may require that the owner or lessee of property 33
filing an application to amend the zoning resolution pay a fee 34
to defray the cost of advertising, mailing, filing with the 35
county recorder, and other expenses. If the board of county 36
commissioners requires such a fee, it shall be required 37
generally, for each application. The board of county 38
commissioners, upon the passage of such a resolution, shall 39
certify it to the county rural zoning commission. 40
(2) Upon the adoption of a motion by the county rural 41
zoning commission, the certification of a resolution by the 42
board of county commissioners to the commission, or the filing 43
of an application by property owners or lessees as described in 44
division (A)(1) of this section with the commission, the 45
commission shall set a date for a public hearing, which date 46
shall not be less than twenty nor more than forty days from the 47
date of adoption of such a motion, the date of the certification 48
of such a resolution, or the date of the filing of such an 49
application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the 50
commission by one publication at least ten days before the date 51
of the hearing, using at least one of the following methods: 52

S. B. No. 153 Page 3
As Introduced
(a) In the print or digital edition of one or more 53
newspapers of general circulation in each township affected by 54
the proposed amendment; 55
(b) On the official public notice web site established 56
under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; 57
(c) On the web site and social media account of the 58
county. 59
(B) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or 60
redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land, as listed on the county 61
auditor's current tax list, written notice of the hearing shall 62
be mailed by the county rural zoning commission, by first class 63
mail, at least ten days before the date of the public hearing to 64
all owners of property within and contiguous to and directly 65
across the street from the area proposed to be rezoned or 66
redistricted to the addresses of those owners appearing on the 67
county auditor's current tax list. The failure of delivery of 68
that notice shall not invalidate any such amendment. 69
(C) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or 70
redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county 71
auditor's current tax list, the published and mailed notices 72
shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing 73
and include all of the following: 74
(1) The name of the county rural zoning commission that 75
will be conducting the hearing; 76
(2) A statement indicating that the motion, resolution, or 77
application is an amendment to the zoning resolution; 78
(3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be 79
rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the 80
names of owners of these properties, as they appear on the 81

S. B. No. 153 Page 4
As Introduced
county auditor's current tax list; 82
(4) The present zoning classification of property named in 83
the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of 84
that property; 85
(5) The time and place where the motion, resolution, or 86
application proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be 87
available for examination for a period of at least ten days 88
prior to the hearing; 89
(6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice 90
of the public hearing by publication, by mail, or by both 91
publication and mail; 92
(7) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, 93
the matter will be submitted to the board of county 94
commissioners for its action; 95
(8) Any other information requested by the commission. 96
(D) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the 97
zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten 98
parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax 99
list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and 100
place of the public hearing and include all of the following: 101
(1) The name of the county rural zoning commission that 102
will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; 103
(2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, 104
or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; 105
(3) The time and place where the text and maps of the 106
proposed amendment will be available for examination for a 107
period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; 108

S. B. No. 153 Page 5
As Introduced
(4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice 109
of the hearing by publication; 110
(5) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, 111
the matter will be submitted to the board of county 112
commissioners for its action; 113
(6) Any other information requested by the commission. 114
Hearings shall be held in the county court house or in a 115
public place designated by the commission. 116
(E) Within five days after the adoption of the motion 117
described in division (A) of this section, the certification of 118
the resolution described in division (A) of this section, or the 119
filing of the application described in division (A) of this 120
section, the county rural zoning commission shall transmit a 121
copy of it together with text and map pertaining to it to the 122
county or regional planning commission, if there is such a 123
commission. 124
The county or regional planning commission shall recommend 125
the approval or denial of the proposed amendment or the approval 126
of some modification of it and shall submit its recommendation 127
to the county rural zoning commission. The recommendation shall 128
be considered at the public hearing held by the county rural 129
zoning commission on the proposed amendment. 130
The county rural zoning commission, within thirty days 131
after the hearing, shall recommend the approval or denial of the 132
proposed amendment, or the approval of some modification of it, 133
and shall submit that recommendation together with the motion, 134
application, or resolution involved, the text and map pertaining 135
to the proposed amendment, and the recommendation of the county 136
or regional planning commission on it to the board of county 137

S. B. No. 153 Page 6
As Introduced
commissioners. 138
The board of county commissioners, upon receipt of that 139
recommendation, shall set a time for a public hearing on the 140
proposed amendment, which date shall be not more than thirty 141
days from the date of the receipt of that recommendation. Notice 142
of the hearing shall be given by the board by one publication at 143
least ten days before the date of the hearing, using at least 144
one of the following methods: 145
(1) In the print or digital edition of one or more 146
newspapers of general circulation in the county; 147
(2) On the official public notice web site established 148
under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; 149
(3) On the web site and social media account of the 150
county. 151
(F) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or 152
redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county 153
auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth 154
the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all 155
of the following: 156
(1) The name of the board of county commissioners that 157
will be conducting the hearing; 158
(2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, 159
or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; 160
(3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be 161
rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the 162
names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the 163
county auditor's current tax list; 164
(4) The present zoning classification of property named in 165

S. B. No. 153 Page 7
As Introduced
the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of 166
that property; 167
(5) The time and place where the motion, application, or 168
resolution proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be 169
available for examination for a period of at least ten days 170
prior to the hearing; 171
(6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice 172
of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication 173
and mail; 174
(7) Any other information requested by the board. 175
(G) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the 176
zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten 177
parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax 178
list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and 179
place of the public hearing and include all of the following: 180
(1) The name of the board of county commissioners that 181
will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; 182
(2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, 183
or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; 184
(3) The time and place where the text and maps of the 185
proposed amendment will be available for examination for a 186
period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; 187
(4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice 188
of the hearing by publication; 189
(5) Any other information requested by the board. 190
(H) Within twenty days after its public hearing, the board 191
of county commissioners shall either adopt or deny the 192

S. B. No. 153 Page 8
As Introduced
recommendation of the county rural zoning commission or adopt 193
some modification of it. If the board denies or modifies the 194
commission's recommendation, a majority vote of the board shall 195
be required. 196
The proposed amendment, if adopted by the board, shall 197
become effective in thirty days after the date of its adoption, 198
unless, within thirty days after the adoption, there is 199
presented to the board of county commissioners a petition, 200
signed by a number of qualified voters residing in the 201
unincorporated area of the township or part of that 202
unincorporated area included in the zoning plan equal to not 203
less than eight per cent of the total vote cast for all 204
candidates for governor in that area at the most recent general 205
election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board 206
to submit the amendment to the electors of that area for 207
approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the 208
day of the next primary or general election occurring at least 209
ninety days after the petition is submitted. Each part of this 210
petition shall contain the number and the full and correct 211
title, if any, of the zoning amendment resolution, motion, or 212
application, furnishing the name by which the amendment is known 213
and a brief summary of its contents. In addition to meeting the 214
requirements of this section, each petition shall be governed by 215
the rules specified in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. 216
The form of a petition calling for a zoning referendum and 217
the statement of the circulator shall be substantially as 218
follows: 219
"PETITION FOR ZONING REFERENDUM 220
(if the proposal is identified by a particular name or number, 221
or both, these should be inserted here) ________________________ 222

S. B. No. 153 Page 9
As Introduced
A proposal to amend the zoning map of the unincorporated 223
area of ______________ Township, ___________________ County, 224
Ohio, adopted _______ (date) __________ (followed by brief 225
summary of the proposal). 226
To the Board of County Commissioners of __________________ 227
County, Ohio: 228
We, the undersigned, being electors residing in the 229
unincorporated area of _______________ Township, included within 230
the _________________ County Zoning Plan, equal to not less than 231
eight per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for 232
governor in the area at the preceding general election at which 233
a governor was elected, request the Board of County 234
Commissioners to submit this amendment of the zoning resolution 235
to the electors of _____________ Township residing within the 236
unincorporated area of the township included in the 237
_______________ County Zoning Resolution, for approval or 238
rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the 239
next primary or general election to be held on 240
________(date)_______, pursuant to section 303.12 of the Revised 241
Code. 242
Street Address Date of 243
Signature or R.F.D. Township Precinct County Signing 244
_______________________________________________________________ 245
_______________________________________________________________ 246
STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR 247
I, _____________________(name of circulator)___________________, 248
declare under penalty of election falsification that I am an 249
elector of the state of Ohio and reside at the address appearing 250

S. B. No. 153 Page 10
As Introduced
below my signature; that I am the circulator of the foregoing 251
part petition containing _____(number)_______ signatures; that I 252
have witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers 253
were to the best of my knowledge and belief qualified to sign; 254
and that every signature is to the best of my knowledge and 255
belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports 256
to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 257
3501.382 of the Revised Code. (The circulator shall personally 258
write the number of electors whose signatures the petition paper 259
contains.) 260
For the purposes of any proceeding related to this 261
petition, I submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the 262
State of Ohio, the Ohio Secretary of State, and the board of 263
elections of the county in which I have circulated this 264
petition. I understand that I may be required to testify or to 265
produce evidence in such a proceeding. I agree to receive any 266
service of process at the residence address I have provided. 267
I am compensated to circulate this petition by 268
_______________________ (name and address). (The circulator 269
shall complete the preceding sentence as required by section 270
3501.38 of the Revised Code if the circulator is being 271
compensated to circulate the petition.) 272
_____________________________ 273
(Signature of circulator) 274
_____________________________ 275
- (Address of circulator's 276
- permanent residence in this 277
- state) 278
_____________________________ 279

S. B. No. 153 Page 11
As Introduced
(City, village, or township, 280
- and zip code) 281
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 282
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 283
No amendment for which such a referendum vote has been 284
requested shall be put into effect unless a majority of the vote 285
cast on the issue is in favor of the amendment. Upon 286
certification by the board of elections that the amendment has 287
been approved by the voters, it shall take immediate effect. 288
Within five working days after an amendment's effective 289
date, the board of county commissioners shall file the text and 290
maps of the amendment in the office of the county recorder and 291
with the regional or county planning commission, if one exists. 292
The failure to file any amendment, or any text and maps, 293
or duplicates of any of these documents, with the office of the 294
county recorder or the county or regional planning commission as 295
required by this section does not invalidate the amendment and 296
is not grounds for an appeal of any decision of the board of 297
zoning appeals. 298
Sec. 303.59. A resolution designating a restricted area 299
prohibiting the construction of utility facilities, if adopted 300
by the board of county commissioners, becomes effective thirty 301
days after the date of its adoption, unless, within thirty days 302
after the adoption, there is presented to the board of county 303
commissioners a petition, signed by a number of registered 304
electors residing in the county equal to not less than eight per 305
cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in 306
that county at the most recent general election at which a 307
governor was elected, requesting the board of county 308

S. B. No. 153 Page 12
As Introduced
commissioners to submit the resolution to the electors of that 309
county for approval or rejection at a special election to be 310
held on the day of the next primary or general election that 311
occurs at least one hundred twenty days after the petition is 312
filed. Each part petition shall contain the number and the full 313
and correct title, if any, of the resolution, motion, or 314
application, furnishing the name by which the resolution is 315
known and a brief summary of its contents. In addition to 316
meeting the requirements of this section, each petition shall be 317
governed by the rules specified in section 3501.38 of the 318
Revised Code. 319
The form of a petition calling for a referendum on the 320
designation of a restricted area and the statement of the 321
circulator shall be substantially as follows: 322
"PETITION FOR REFERENDUM ON THE DESIGNATION OF A 323
RESTRICTED AREA PROHIBITING THE CONSTRUCTION OF UTILITY 324
FACILITIES 325
(if the proposal is identified by a particular name or 326
number, or both, these should be inserted here)__________ 327
A proposal to designate a restricted area prohibiting the 328
construction of utility facilities in the unincorporated area of 329
__________ county, Ohio, adopted __________(date) (followed by 330
brief summary of the resolution). 331
To the board of county commissioners of __________ county, 332
Ohio: 333
We, the undersigned, being electors residing in 334
__________county, equal to not less than eight per cent of the 335
total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the county at 336
the preceding general election at which a governor was elected, 337

S. B. No. 153 Page 13
As Introduced
request the board of county commissioners to submit this 338
designation of a restricted area to the electors of __________ 339
county, for approval or rejection at a special election to be 340
held on the day of the primary or general election to be held on 341
__________ (date), pursuant to section 303.59 of the Revised 342
Code. 343
__________ Signature 344
__________ Residence address 345
__________ Date of signing 346
STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR 347
I, __________ (name of circulator), declare under penalty 348
of election falsification that I reside at the address appearing 349
below my signature; that I am the circulator of the foregoing 350
part petition containing __________ (number) signatures; that I 351
have witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers 352
were to the best of my knowledge and belief qualified to sign; 353
and that every signature is to the best of my knowledge and 354
belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports 355
to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 356
3501.382 of the Revised Code. (The circulator shall personally 357
write the number of electors whose signatures the petition paper 358
contains.) 359
For the purposes of any proceeding related to this 360
petition, I submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the 361
State of Ohio, the Ohio Secretary of State, and the board of 362
elections of the county in which I have circulated this 363
petition. I understand that I may be required to testify or to 364
produce evidence in such a proceeding. I agree to receive any 365
service of process at the residence address I have provided. 366

S. B. No. 153 Page 14
As Introduced
I am compensated to circulate this petition by 367
_______________________ (name and address). (The circulator 368
shall complete the preceding sentence as required by section 369
3501.38 of the Revised Code if the circulator is being 370
compensated to circulate the petition.) 371
__________ (Signature of circulator) 372
__________ (Circulator's residence address) 373
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 374
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 375
The petition shall be filed with the board of county 376
commissioners. Within two weeks after receiving a petition filed 377
under this section, the board of county commissioners shall 378
certify the petition to the board of elections. A petition filed 379
under this section shall be certified to the board of elections 380
not less than ninety days prior to the election at which the 381
question is to be voted upon. 382
The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and 383
validity of each petition certified to it by a board of county 384
commissioners under this section. If the board of elections 385
determines that a petition is sufficient and valid, the question 386
shall be voted upon at a special election to be held on the day 387
of the next primary or general election that occurs at least one 388
hundred twenty days after the date the petition is filed with 389
the board of county commissioners, regardless of whether any 390
election will be held to nominate or elect candidates on that 391
day. 392
No resolution designating a restricted area for which such 393
a referendum vote has been requested shall be put into effect 394
unless a majority of the vote cast on the issue is in favor of 395

S. B. No. 153 Page 15
As Introduced
the resolution. Upon certification by the board of elections 396
that the resolution has been approved by the voters, it shall 397
take immediate effect. 398
Within five working days after the resolution's effective 399
date, the board of county commissioners shall file the text of 400
the resolution and maps of the restricted area in the office of 401
the county recorder and with the county or regional planning 402
commission, if one exists. 403
The failure to file any resolution, or any text and maps, 404
or duplicates of any of these documents, with the office of the 405
county recorder as required by this section does not invalidate 406
the resolution. 407
Sec. 307.94. Electors of a county, equal in number to ten 408
per cent of the number who voted for governor in the county at 409
the most recent gubernatorial election, may file, not later than 410
one hundred fifteen days before the date of a general election, 411
a petition with the board of county commissioners asking that 412
the question of the adoption of a county charter in the form 413
attached to the petition be submitted to the electors of the 414
county. The petition shall be available for public inspection at 415
the offices of the county commissioners during regular business 416
hours until four p.m. of the one hundred eleventh day before the 417
election, at which time the board shall, by resolution, certify 418
the petition to the board of elections of the county for 419
submission to the electors of the county, unless the signatures 420
are insufficient or the petitions otherwise invalid, at the next 421
general election. 422
Such electors may, in the alternative not later than the 423
one hundred thirtieth day before the date of a general election, 424
file such a petition with the board of elections of the county. 425

S. B. No. 153 Page 16
As Introduced
In such case the board of elections shall immediately proceed to 426
determine whether the petition and the signatures on the 427
petition meet the requirements of law and to count the number of 428
valid signatures and to note opposite each invalid signature the 429
reason for the invalidity. The board of elections shall complete 430
its examination of the petition and the signatures and shall 431
submit a report to the board of county commissioners not later 432
than the one hundred twentieth day before the date of the 433
general election certifying whether the petition is valid or 434
invalid and, if invalid, the reasons for invalidity, whether 435
there are sufficient valid signatures, and the number of valid 436
and invalid signatures. The petition and a copy of the report to 437
the board of county commissioners shall be available for public 438
inspection at the board of elections. If the petition is 439
certified by the board of elections to be valid and to have 440
sufficient valid signatures, the board of county commissioners 441
shall forthwith and not later than four p.m. on the one hundred 442
eleventh day before the general election, by resolution, certify 443
the petition to the board of elections for submission to the 444
electors of the county at the next general election. If the 445
petition is certified by the board of elections to be invalid or 446
to have insufficient valid signatures, or both, the petitioners' 447
committee may protest such findings or solicit additional 448
signatures as provided in section 307.95 of the Revised Code, or 449
both, or request that the board of elections proceed to 450
establish the validity or invalidity of the petition and the 451
sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures in an action 452
before the court of common pleas in the county. Such action must 453
be brought within three days after the request has been made, 454
and the case shall be heard forthwith by a judge or such court 455
whose decision shall be certified to the board of elections and 456
to the board of county commissioners in sufficient time to 457

S. B. No. 153 Page 17
As Introduced
permit the board of county commissioners to perform its duty to 458
certify the petition, if it is determined by the court to be 459
valid and contain sufficient valid signatures, to the board of 460
elections not later than four p.m. on the one hundred eleventh 461
day prior to the general election for submission to the electors 462
at such general election. 463
A county charter to be submitted to the voters by petition 464
shall be considered to be attached to the petition if it is 465
printed as a part of the petition. A county charter petition may 466
consist of any number of separate petition papers. Each part 467
shall have attached a copy of the charter to be submitted to the 468
electors, and each part shall otherwise meet all the 469
requirements of law for a county charter petition. Section 470
3501.38 of the Revised Code applies to county charter petitions. 471
The petitioners shall designate in the petition the names 472
and addresses of a committee of not fewer than three nor more 473
than five persons who will represent them in all matters 474
relating to the petition. Notice of all matters or proceedings 475
pertaining to such petitions may be served on the committee, or 476
any of them committee's agent designated under division (N)(1) 477
of section 3501.38 of the Revised Code, either personally or by 478
certified mail, or by leaving it at the agent's usual place of 479
residence of each of them. 480
Sec. 3501.01. As used in the sections of the Revised Code 481
relating to elections and political communications: 482
(A) "General election" means the election held on the 483
first Tuesday after the first Monday in each November. 484
(B) "Regular municipal election" means the election held 485
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each 486

S. B. No. 153 Page 18
As Introduced
odd-numbered year. 487
(C) "Regular state election" means the election held on 488
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each 489
even-numbered year. 490
(D) "Special election" means any election other than those 491
elections defined in other divisions of this section. A special 492
election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first 493
Monday in May or November, on the first Tuesday after the first 494
Monday in August in accordance with section 3501.022 of the 495
Revised Code, or on the day authorized by a particular municipal 496
or county charter for the holding of a primary election, except 497
that in any year in which a presidential primary election is 498
held, no special election shall be held in May, except as 499
authorized by a municipal or county charter, but may be held on 500
the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March. 501
(E)(1) "Primary" or "primary election" means an election 502
held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of 503
political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose 504
of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of 505
political parties and as delegates and alternates to the 506
conventions of political parties. Primary elections shall be 507
held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each 508
year except in years in which a presidential primary election is 509
held. 510
(2) "Presidential primary election" means a primary 511
election as defined by division (E)(1) of this section at which 512
an election is held for the purpose of choosing delegates and 513
alternates to the national conventions of the major political 514
parties pursuant to section 3513.12 of the Revised Code. Unless 515
otherwise specified, presidential primary elections are included 516

S. B. No. 153 Page 19
As Introduced
in references to primary elections. In years in which a 517
presidential primary election is held, all primary elections 518
shall be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in 519
March except as otherwise authorized by a municipal or county 520
charter. 521
(F) "Political party" means any group of voters meeting 522
the requirements set forth in section 3517.01 of the Revised 523
Code for the formation and existence of a political party. 524
(1) "Major political party" means any political party 525
organized under the laws of this state whose candidate for 526
governor or nominees for presidential electors received not less 527
than twenty per cent of the total vote cast for such office at 528
the most recent regular state election. 529
(2) "Minor political party" means any political party 530
organized under the laws of this state that meets either of the 531
following requirements: 532
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 533
political party's candidate for governor or nominees for 534
presidential electors received less than twenty per cent but not 535
less than three per cent of the total vote cast for such office 536
at the most recent regular state election. A political party 537
that meets the requirements of this division remains a political 538
party for a period of four years after meeting those 539
requirements. 540
(b) The political party has filed with the secretary of 541
state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of 542
division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a petition that meets the 543
requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. 544
A newly formed political party shall be known as a minor 545

S. B. No. 153 Page 20
As Introduced
political party until the time of the first election for 546
governor or president which occurs not less than twelve months 547
subsequent to the formation of such party, after which election 548
the status of such party shall be determined by the vote for the 549
office of governor or president. 550
(G) "Dominant party in a precinct" or "dominant political 551
party in a precinct" means that political party whose candidate 552
for election to the office of governor at the most recent 553
regular state election at which a governor was elected received 554
more votes than any other person received for election to that 555
office in such precinct at such election. 556
(H) "Candidate" means any qualified person certified in 557
accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code for placement 558
on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special 559
election to be held in this state, or any qualified person who 560
claims to be a write-in candidate, or who knowingly assents to 561
being represented as a write-in candidate by another at either a 562
primary, general, or special election to be held in this state. 563
(I) "Independent candidate" means any candidate who claims 564
not to be affiliated with a political party, and whose name has 565
been certified on the office-type ballot at a general or special 566
election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and 567
nominating petition, as prescribed in section 3513.257 of the 568
Revised Code. 569
(J) "Nonpartisan candidate" means any candidate whose name 570
is required, pursuant to section 3505.04 of the Revised Code, to 571
be listed on the nonpartisan ballot, including all candidates 572
for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common 573
pleas, for member of any board of education, for municipal or 574
township offices in which primary elections are not held for 575

S. B. No. 153 Page 21
As Introduced
nominating candidates by political parties, and for offices of 576
municipal corporations having charters that provide for separate 577
ballots for elections for these offices. 578
(K) "Party candidate" means any candidate who claims to be 579
a member of a political party and who has been certified to 580
appear on the office-type ballot at a general or special 581
election as the nominee of a political party because the 582
candidate has won the primary election of the candidate's party 583
for the public office the candidate seeks, has been nominated 584
under section 3517.012, or is selected by party committee in 585
accordance with section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. 586
(L) "Officer of a political party" includes, but is not 587
limited to, any member, elected or appointed, of a controlling 588
committee, whether representing the territory of the state, a 589
district therein, a county, township, a city, a ward, a 590
precinct, or other territory, of a major or minor political 591
party. 592
(M) "Question or issue" means any question or issue 593
certified in accordance with the Revised Code for placement on 594
an official ballot at a general or special election to be held 595
in this state. 596
(N) "Elector" or "qualified elector" means a person having 597
the qualifications provided by law to be entitled to vote. 598
(O) "Voter" means an elector who votes at an election. 599
(P) "Voting residence" means that place of residence of an 600
elector which shall determine the precinct in which the elector 601
may vote. 602
(Q) "Precinct" means a district within a county 603
established by the board of elections of such county within 604

S. B. No. 153 Page 22
As Introduced
which all qualified electors having a voting residence therein 605
may vote at the same polling place. 606
(R) "Polling place" means that place provided for each 607
precinct at which the electors having a voting residence in such 608
precinct may vote. 609
(S) "Board" or "board of elections" means the board of 610
elections appointed in a county pursuant to section 3501.06 of 611
the Revised Code. 612
(T) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, 613
city, village, or school district. 614
(U) "Election officer" or "election official" means any of 615
the following: 616
(1) Secretary of state; 617
(2) Employees of the secretary of state serving the 618
division of elections in the capacity of attorney, 619
administrative officer, administrative assistant, elections 620
administrator, office manager, or clerical supervisor; 621
(3) Director of a board of elections; 622
(4) Deputy director of a board of elections; 623
(5) Member of a board of elections; 624
(6) Employees of a board of elections; 625
(7) Precinct election officials; 626
(8) Employees appointed by the boards of elections on a 627
temporary or part-time basis. 628
(V) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by a board 629
of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, 630

S. B. No. 153 Page 23
As Introduced
informing a voter registration applicant or an applicant who 631
wishes to change the applicant's residence or name of the status 632
of the application; the information necessary to complete or 633
update the application, if any; and if the application is 634
complete, the precinct in which the applicant is to vote. 635
(W) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent by a board 636
of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, to 637
a registered elector to confirm the registered elector's current 638
address, name, or other information required for registration. 639
The notice shall be sent by forwardable mail, shall be 640
accompanied by a postage prepaid, preaddressed return envelope 641
containing a form on which the elector may verify or correct the 642
elector's registration, and shall meet the requirements of the 643
National Voter Registration Act of 1993. 644
(X) "Designated agency" means an office or agency in the 645
state that provides public assistance or that provides state- 646
funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to 647
persons with disabilities and that is required by the National 648
Voter Registration Act of 1993 to implement a program designed 649
and administered by the secretary of state for registering 650
voters, or any other public or government office or agency that 651
implements a program designed and administered by the secretary 652
of state for registering voters, including the department of job 653
and family services, the program administered under section 654
3701.132 of the Revised Code by the department of health, the 655
department of mental health and addiction services, the 656
department of developmental disabilities, the opportunities for 657
Ohioans with disabilities agency, and any other agency the 658
secretary of state designates. "Designated agency" does not 659
include public high schools and vocational schools, public 660
libraries, or the office of a county treasurer. 661

S. B. No. 153 Page 24
As Introduced
(Y) "National Voter Registration Act of 1993" means the 662
"National Voter Registration Act of 1993," 107 Stat. 77, 42 663
U.S.C.A. 1973gg. 664
(Z) "Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the "Voting Rights 665
Act of 1965," 79 Stat. 437, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973, as amended. 666
(AA)(1) "Photo identification" means one of the following 667
documents that includes the individual's name and photograph and 668
is not expired: 669
(a) An Ohio driver's license, state identification card, 670
or interim identification form issued by the registrar of motor 671
vehicles or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of 672
the Revised Code; 673
(b) A United States passport or passport card; 674
(c) A United States military identification card, Ohio 675
national guard identification card, or United States department 676
of veterans affairs identification card. 677
(2) A "copy" of an individual's photo identification means 678
images of both the front and back of a document described in 679
division (AA)(1) of this section, except that if the document is 680
a United States passport, a copy of the photo identification 681
means an image of the passport's identification page that 682
includes the individual's name, photograph, and other 683
identifying information and the passport's expiration date. 684
(BB) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued 685
by the registrar or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 686
4507. of the Revised Code that authorizes an individual to 687
drive. "Driver's license" includes a driver's license, 688
commercial driver's license, probationary license, restricted 689
license, motorcycle operator's license, or temporary instruction 690

S. B. No. 153 Page 25
As Introduced
permit identification card. "Driver's license" does not include 691
a limited term license issued under section 4507.09 of the 692
Revised Code. 693
(CC) "State identification card" means a card issued by 694
the registrar or a deputy registrar under sections 4507.50 to 695
4507.52 of the Revised Code. 696
(DD) "Interim identification form" means the document 697
issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar to an applicant 698
for a driver's license or state identification card that 699
contains all of the information otherwise found on the license 700
or card and that an applicant may use as a form of 701
identification until the physical license or card arrives in the 702
mail. 703
(EE)(1) "Proof of citizenship" means evidence that an 704
individual is a United States citizen, in the form of one of the 705
following: 706
(a) The number of the individual's current or expired Ohio 707
driver's license or state identification card, if the secretary 708
of state verifies using information obtained from the bureau of 709
motor vehicles that the individual has submitted documentation 710
to the bureau that indicates that the individual is a United 711
States citizen; 712
(b) The individual's current or expired Ohio driver's 713
license, state identification card, or interim identification 714
form issued on or after April 7, 2023, or a copy of the front 715
and back of that license, card, or form, if the license, card, 716
or form does not include a notation designating that the 717
individual is a noncitizen of the United States; 718
(c) The individual's current or expired driver's license 719

S. B. No. 153 Page 26
As Introduced
or nondriver identification card issued by another state within 720
the United States, or a copy of the front and back of the 721
license or card, if the issuing agency indicates on the license 722
or card that the individual is a United States citizen; 723
(d) The individual's birth certificate, certification of 724
report of birth, or consular report of birth abroad, or a copy 725
of one of those documents; 726
(e) The individual's current or expired United States 727
passport or passport card, a copy of the identification page of 728
the passport, or a copy of the front and back of the passport 729
card; 730
(f) The individual's certificate of naturalization or 731
certificate of citizenship or a copy of one of those documents. 732
(2) If an individual's current legal name is different 733
from the name on the individual's proof of citizenship, the 734
individual also shall provide proof of the change of name, such 735
as a copy of a marriage license or court order. 736
Sec. 3501.38. All declarations of candidacy, nominating 737
petitions, or other petitions presented to or filed with the 738
secretary of state or a board of elections or with any other 739
public office for the purpose of becoming a candidate for any 740
nomination or office or for the holding of an election on any 741
issue shall, in addition to meeting the other specific 742
requirements prescribed in the sections of the Revised Code 743
relating to them, be governed by the following rules: 744
(A) Only electors qualified to vote on the candidacy or 745
issue which is the subject of the petition shall sign a 746
petition. Each signer shall be a registered elector pursuant to 747
section 3503.01 of the Revised Code. The facts of qualification 748

S. B. No. 153 Page 27
As Introduced
shall be determined as of the date when the elector signs the 749
petition is filed. 750
(B) Signatures shall be affixed in ink. Each signer may 751
also print the signer's name, so as to clearly identify the 752
signer's signature. 753
(C) Each signer shall place on the petition after the 754
signer's name the date of signing and the location of the 755
signer's voting residence, including the street and number if in 756
a municipal corporation or the rural route number, post office 757
address, or township if outside a municipal corporation. The 758
voting address given on the petition shall be the address 759
appearing in the registration records at the board of elections. 760
(D) Except as otherwise provided in section 3501.382 of 761
the Revised Code, no person shall write any name other than the 762
person's own on any petition. Except as otherwise provided in 763
section 3501.382 of the Revised Code, no person may authorize 764
another to sign for the person. If a petition contains the 765
signature of an elector two or more times, only the first 766
signature shall be counted. 767
(E)(1) (E) On each petition paper, the circulator shall 768
personally indicate the number of signatures contained on it, 769
and shall sign a statement made under penalty of election 770
falsification that the includes all of the following: 771
(1) A statement that the circulator witnessed the affixing 772
of every signature, that all signers were to the best of the 773
circulator's knowledge and belief qualified to sign, and that 774
every signature is to the best of the circulator's knowledge and 775
belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports 776
to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 777

S. B. No. 153 Page 28
As Introduced
3501.382 of the Revised Code. On the circulator's statement for 778
a declaration of candidacy or nominating petition for a person 779
seeking to become a statewide candidate, for a statewide 780
initiative or a statewide referendum petition, or for a party 781
formation petition described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 782
3517.01 of the Revised Code, the circulator shall identify the ; 783
(2) The circulator's name, and the address of the 784
circulator's permanent residence, and the name and address of 785
the ; 786
(3) If any person employing is compensating the circulator 787
to circulate the petition, if any. 788
(2) As used in division (E) of this section, "statewide 789
candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of 790
governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office 791
of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or 792
attorney general. as described in division (C) of section 793
3501.381 of the Revised Code, the name and address of that 794
person; 795
(4) The following statement: 796
"For the purposes of any proceeding related to this 797
petition, I submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the 798
State of Ohio, the Ohio Secretary of State, and the board of 799
elections of the county in which I have circulated this 800
petition. I understand that I may be required to testify or to 801
produce evidence in such a proceeding. I agree to receive any 802
service of process at the residence address I have provided." 803
(F) Except as otherwise provided in section 3501.382 of 804
the Revised Code, if a circulator knowingly permits an 805
unqualified person to sign a petition paper or permits a person 806

S. B. No. 153 Page 29
As Introduced
to write a name other than the person's own on a petition paper, 807
that petition paper is invalid; otherwise, the signature of a 808
person not qualified to sign shall be rejected but shall not 809
invalidate the other valid signatures on the paper. 810
(G) The circulator of a petition may, before filing it in 811
a public office, strike from it any signature the circulator 812
does not wish to present as a part of the petition. 813
(H) Any signer of a petition or an attorney in fact acting 814
pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code on behalf of a 815
signer may remove the signer's signature from that petition at 816
any time before the petition is filed in a public office by 817
striking the signer's name from the petition; no signature may 818
be removed after the petition is filed in any public office. 819
(I)(1) No alterations, corrections, or additions may be 820
made to a petition after it is filed in a public office. 821
(2)(a) No declaration of candidacy, nominating petition, 822
or other petition for the purpose of becoming a candidate may be 823
withdrawn after it is filed in a public office. Nothing in this 824
division prohibits a person from withdrawing as a candidate as 825
otherwise provided by law. 826
(b) No petition presented to or filed with the secretary 827
of state, a board of elections, or any other public office for 828
the purpose of the holding of an election on any question or 829
issue may be resubmitted after it is withdrawn from a public 830
office or rejected as containing insufficient signatures. 831
Nothing in this division prevents a question or issue petition 832
from being withdrawn by the filing of a written notice of the 833
withdrawal by a majority of the members of the petitioning 834
committee with the same public office with which the petition 835

S. B. No. 153 Page 30
As Introduced
was filed prior to the sixtieth day before the election at which 836
the question or issue is scheduled to appear on the ballot. 837
(J) All declarations of candidacy, nominating petitions, 838
or other petitions under this section shall be accompanied by 839
the following statement in boldface capital letters: WHOEVER 840
COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE 841
FIFTH DEGREE. 842
(K) All separate petition papers shall be filed at the 843
same time, as one instrument. 844
(L) If a board of elections distributes for use a petition 845
form for a declaration of candidacy, nominating petition, or any 846
type of question or issue petition that does not satisfy the 847
requirements of law as of the date of that distribution, the 848
board shall not invalidate the petition on the basis that the 849
petition form does not satisfy the requirements of law, if the 850
petition otherwise is valid. Division (L) of this section 851
applies only if the candidate received the petition from the 852
board within ninety days of when the petition is required to be 853
filed. 854
(M)(1) Upon receiving an initiative petition, or a 855
petition filed under section 307.94 or 307.95 of the Revised 856
Code, concerning a ballot issue that is to be submitted to the 857
electors of a county or municipal political subdivision, the 858
board of elections shall examine the petition to determine: 859
(a) Whether the petition falls within the scope of a 860
municipal political subdivision's authority to enact via 861
initiative, including, if applicable, the limitations placed by 862
Sections 3 and 7 of Article XVIII of the Ohio Constitution on 863
the authority of municipal corporations to adopt local police, 864

S. B. No. 153 Page 31
As Introduced
sanitary, and other similar regulations as are not in conflict 865
with general laws, and whether the petition satisfies the 866
statutory prerequisites to place the issue on the ballot. The 867
petition shall be invalid if any portion of the petition is not 868
within the initiative power; or 869
(b) Whether the petition falls within the scope of a 870
county's authority to enact via initiative, including whether 871
the petition conforms to the requirements set forth in Section 3 872
of Article X of the Ohio Constitution, including the exercise of 873
only those powers that have vested in, and the performance of 874
all duties imposed upon counties and county officers by law, and 875
whether the petition satisfies the statutory prerequisites to 876
place the issue on the ballot. The finding of the board shall be 877
subject to challenge by a protest filed pursuant to division (B) 878
of section 307.95 of the Revised Code. 879
(2) After making a determination under division (M)(1)(a) 880
or (b) of this section, the board of elections shall promptly 881
transmit a copy of the petition and a notice of the board's 882
determination to the office of the secretary of state. Notice of 883
the board's determination shall be given to the petitioners and 884
the political subdivision. 885
(3) If multiple substantially similar initiative petitions 886
are submitted to multiple boards of elections and the 887
determinations of the boards under division (M)(1)(a) or (b) of 888
this section concerning those petitions differ, the secretary of 889
state shall make a single determination under division (M)(1)(a) 890
or (b) of this section that shall apply to each such initiative 891
petition. 892
(N) With respect to any petition for which a committee is 893
designated to represent the petitioners, both of the following 894

S. B. No. 153 Page 32
As Introduced
apply: 895
(1) The committee shall designate an agent upon whom 896
notice of all matters or proceedings pertaining to the petition 897
may be served. Each part-petition shall include the names of the 898
members of the committee and the name and address of the 899
committee's agent as they exist at the time the part-petition is 900
printed. 901
(2) The committee shall designate in writing the names and 902
addresses of one or more members or agents of the committee who 903
consent to testify on behalf of the committee. The designation 904
may set out the matters on which each person designated may 905
testify. Upon request, the committee's agent described in 906
division (N)(1) of this section shall make the designation 907
available to the secretary of state, a board of elections, or a 908
court of competent jurisdiction. 909
Sec. 3501.381. (A)(1) Any person who will receive 910
compensation for supervising, managing, or otherwise organizing 911
any effort to obtain signatures for a declaration of candidacy, 912
nominating petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in 913
candidate for a person seeking to become a statewide candidate, 914
for a statewide initiative petition or a statewide referendum 915
petition, or for a party formation petition described in 916
division (A)(1)(b) of section 3517.01 3501.38 of the Revised 917
Code shall file a statement to that effect with the office of 918
the secretary of state before any signatures are obtained for 919
the petition or before the person is engaged to supervise, 920
manage, or otherwise organize the effort to obtain signatures 921
for the petition, whichever is later. 922
(2) Any person who will compensate a person for 923
supervising, managing, or otherwise organizing any effort to 924

S. B. No. 153 Page 33
As Introduced
obtain signatures for a declaration of candidacy, nominating 925
petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate 926
for a person seeking to become a statewide candidate, for a 927
statewide initiative or a statewide referendum petition, or for 928
a party formation petition described in division (A)(1)(b) of 929
section 3517.01 3501.38 of the Revised Code shall file a 930
statement to that effect with the office of the secretary of 931
state before any signatures are obtained for the petition or 932
before the person engages a person to supervise, manage, or 933
otherwise organize the effort to obtain signatures for the 934
petition, whichever is later. 935
(B) (3) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form 936
and content of the statements required under division (A) of 937
this section. 938
(C) (4) Whoever violates division (A) (A)(1) or (2) of 939
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and 940
the petition for which a person was compensated for supervising, 941
managing, or otherwise organizing the effort to obtain 942
signatures shall be deemed invalid. 943
(D) As used in this section, "statewide candidate" means 944
the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant 945
governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, 946
auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general. 947
(B) At all times while circulating a petition, a person 948
who is compensated for circulating the petition shall have, 949
plainly visible on the circulator's person, a badge that legibly 950
identifies the circulator as a paid circulator. The secretary of 951
state shall prescribe the form of the badge. 952
(C) For purposes of this section, a person is compensated 953

S. B. No. 153 Page 34
As Introduced
for taking an action if any of the following apply: 954
(1) The person has been paid, given, or promised, or has 955
received, any money or other thing of value as consideration for 956
taking the action. 957
(2) The person is authorized to take the action as part of 958
the person's regular duties as an employee or contractor of 959
another person. 960
(3) The person has been given or promised, or has 961
received, an appointment, promotion, or contract or an increase 962
in pay as consideration for taking the action. 963
(4) The person has been given or promised, or has 964
received, assistance to obtain an appointment, promotion, or 965
contract or an increase in pay as consideration for taking the 966
action. 967
Sec. 3501.39. (A)(A)(1) The secretary of state or a board 968
of elections shall accept any petition described in section 969
3501.38 of the Revised Code unless one of the following occurs: 970
(1) (a) A written protest against the petition or 971
candidacy, naming specific objections, is filed, a hearing is 972
held, and a determination is made by the election officials with 973
whom the protest is filed that the petition is invalid, in 974
accordance with any section of the Revised Code providing a 975
protest procedure. 976
(2) (b) A written protest against the petition or 977
candidacy, naming specific objections, is filed, a hearing is 978
held, and a determination is made by the election officials with 979
whom the protest is filed that the petition violates any 980
requirement established by law. 981

S. B. No. 153 Page 35
As Introduced
(3) (c) In the case of an initiative petition received by 982
the board of elections, the petition falls outside the scope of 983
authority to enact via initiative or does not satisfy the 984
statutory prerequisites to place the issue on the ballot, as 985
described in division (M) of section 3501.38 of the Revised 986
Code. The petition shall be invalid if any portion of the 987
petition is not within the initiative power. 988
(4) (d) The candidate's candidacy or the petition violates 989
the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 3513. of the Revised 990
Code, or any other requirements established by law. 991
(2) Whenever any person fails to fully comply with a 992
subpoena or an order to produce evidence served upon the person 993
in a proceeding under division (A)(1) of this section by the 994
secretary of state acting pursuant to section 3501.05, or by a 995
board of elections acting pursuant to division (J) of section 996
3501.11 or section 3519.18 of the Revised Code, the secretary of 997
state or the board of elections, as applicable, may file in a 998
court of competent jurisdiction, and serve upon the person, a 999
request for an order of the court that compels compliance with 1000
the subpoena or order. If the court finds that the noncompliance 1001
was in bad faith or for the purpose of delay, it may order the 1002
person to pay to the secretary of state or the board of 1003
elections, as applicable, the reasonable expenses incurred in 1004
obtaining the order to comply, including attorney's fees, and 1005
may invoke the sanctions provided by Rule 37 of the Rules of 1006
Civil Procedure. 1007
(B) No part-petition is properly verified if it appears on 1008
the face thereof, or is made to appear by satisfactory evidence, 1009
that any of the following are true: 1010
(1) That the number and statement required by division (E) 1011

S. B. No. 153 Page 36
As Introduced
of section 3501.38 of the Revised Code are not properly filled 1012
out by the circulator; 1013
(2) That the statement required by division (E) of section 1014
3501.38 of the Revised Code is not properly signed, is altered 1015
by erasure, interlineation, or otherwise, or is false in any 1016
respect; 1017
(3) That any one person has signed the part-petition more 1018
than once; 1019
(4) If applicable, that division (A)(1) or (2) of section 1020
3501.381 of the Revised Code was violated with respect to the 1021
petition; 1022
(5) If applicable, that the circulator did not comply with 1023
the requirements of division (B) of section 3501.381 of the 1024
Revised Code while circulating the part-petition. 1025
(C) Except as otherwise provided in division (C) (D) of 1026
this section or section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, a board of 1027
elections shall not invalidate any declaration of candidacy or 1028
nominating petition under division (A)(4) (A)(1)(d) of this 1029
section after the sixtieth day prior to the election at which 1030
the candidate seeks nomination to office, if the candidate filed 1031
a declaration of candidacy, or election to office, if the 1032
candidate filed a nominating petition. 1033
(C)(1) (D)(1) If a petition is filed for the nomination or 1034
election of a candidate in a charter municipal corporation with 1035
a filing deadline that occurs after the ninetieth day before the 1036
day of the election, a board of elections may invalidate the 1037
petition within fifteen days after the date of that filing 1038
deadline. 1039
(2) If a petition for the nomination or election of a 1040

S. B. No. 153 Page 37
As Introduced
candidate is invalidated under division (C)(1) (D)(1) of this 1041
section, that person's name shall not appear on the ballots for 1042
any office for which the person's petition has been invalidated. 1043
If the ballots have already been prepared, the board of 1044
elections shall remove the name of that person from the ballots 1045
to the extent practicable in the time remaining before the 1046
election. If the name is not removed from the ballots before the 1047
day of the election, the votes for that person are void and 1048
shall not be counted. 1049
Sec. 3503.13. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in 1050
division (A)(2) of this section, voter registration forms 1051
submitted by applicants and the statewide voter registration 1052
database established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code 1053
are public records subject to disclosure under section 149.43 of 1054
the Revised Code. 1055
(2) None of the following are subject to disclosure under 1056
division (A)(1) of this section: 1057
(a) An elector's full or partial social security number, 1058
driver's license or state identification card number, telephone 1059
number, or electronic mail address; 1060
(b) A confidential voter registration record, as described 1061
in section 111.44 of the Revised Code; 1062
(c) The address of a designated public service worker, if 1063
the designated public service worker has submitted a redaction 1064
request to the board of elections under section 149.45 of the 1065
Revised Code; 1066
(d) An elector's proof of citizenship; 1067
(e) Any other information that is prohibited from being 1068
disclosed by state or federal law. 1069

S. B. No. 153 Page 38
As Introduced
(B) A board of elections may use a legible digitized 1070
signature list of voter signatures, copied from the signatures 1071
on the registration forms in a form and manner prescribed by the 1072
secretary of state, provided that the board includes the 1073
required voter registration information in the statewide voter 1074
registration database established under section 3503.15 of the 1075
Revised Code, and provided that the precinct election officials 1076
have computer printouts at the polls prepared in the manner 1077
required under section 3503.23 of the Revised Code. 1078
Sec. 3503.14. (A) The secretary of state shall prescribe 1079
the form and content of the registration, change of residence, 1080
and change of name forms used in this state. The forms shall 1081
meet the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1082
1993 and shall include spaces for all of the following: 1083
(1) The voter's name; 1084
(2) The voter's current residence address; 1085
(3) The current date; 1086
(4) The voter's date of birth; 1087
(5) The voter to provide at least one of the following 1088
forms of identification: 1089
(a) The the voter's Ohio driver's license or state 1090
identification card number; 1091
(b) The or, if the voter does not have an Ohio driver's 1092
license or state identification card, the voter to provide the 1093
last four digits of the voter's social security number. 1094
(6) A space for the voter to provide the voter's former 1095
residence address or addresses, if the voter is currently 1096
registered to vote at another address. 1097

S. B. No. 153 Page 39
As Introduced
(7) The voter's signature, accompanied by the following 1098
statement: "I declare under penalty of election falsification I 1099
am a citizen of the United States, will have lived in this state 1100
for 30 days immediately preceding the next election, and will be 1101
at least 18 years of age at the time of the general election. I 1102
understand that if I am registered to vote at any other address, 1103
the election officials will be notified of my change of 1104
address." 1105
The forms shall include the following statement: 1106
"WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 1107
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 1108
The registration form shall include a space on which the 1109
person registering an applicant shall sign the person's name and 1110
provide the person's address and a space on which the person 1111
registering an applicant shall name the employer who is 1112
employing that person to register the applicant. 1113
The forms shall include a box for the person filling out 1114
the form to check to indicate, if applicable, that the person 1115
has filled out all or part of the form on behalf of the 1116
applicant because the applicant declares that the applicant 1117
requires such assistance by reason of blindness, disability, or 1118
illiteracy. 1119
Except for forms prescribed by the secretary of state 1120
under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, the secretary of 1121
state shall permit boards of elections to produce forms that 1122
have subdivided spaces for each individual alphanumeric 1123
character of the information provided by the voter so as to 1124
accommodate the electronic reading and conversion of the voter's 1125
information to data and the subsequent electronic transfer of 1126

S. B. No. 153 Page 40
As Introduced
that data to the statewide voter registration database 1127
established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code. 1128
(B) None of the following persons who are registering an 1129
applicant in the course of that official's or employee's normal 1130
duties shall sign the person's name, provide the person's 1131
address, or name the employer who is employing the person to 1132
register an applicant on a form prepared under this section: 1133
(1) An election official; 1134
(2) A county treasurer; 1135
(3) A deputy registrar of motor vehicles; 1136
(4) An employee of a designated agency; 1137
(5) An employee of a public high school; 1138
(6) An employee of a public vocational school; 1139
(7) An employee of a public library; 1140
(8) An employee of the office of a county treasurer; 1141
(9) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles; 1142
(10) An employee of a deputy registrar of motor vehicles; 1143
(11) An employee of an election official. 1144
(C) Except as provided in section 3501.382 of the Revised 1145
Code, any applicant who is unable to sign the applicant's own 1146
name shall make an "X," if possible, which shall be certified by 1147
the signing of the name of the applicant by the person filling 1148
out the form, who shall add the person's own signature. If an 1149
applicant is unable to make an "X," the applicant shall indicate 1150
in some manner that the applicant desires to register to vote or 1151
to change the applicant's name or residence. The person 1152

S. B. No. 153 Page 41
As Introduced
registering the applicant shall sign the form and attest that 1153
the applicant indicated that the applicant desired to register 1154
to vote or to change the applicant's name or residence. 1155
(D) No registration, change of residence, or change of 1156
name form shall be rejected solely on the basis that a person 1157
registering an applicant failed to sign the person's name or 1158
failed to name the employer who is employing that person to 1159
register the applicant as required under division (A) of this 1160
section. 1161
(E) (E)(1) A voter registration application is not 1162
required to contain the voter's former residence address to be 1163
considered valid. 1164
(2) A voter registration application submitted 1165
electronically through the registrar of motor vehicles or a 1166
deputy registrar pursuant to section 3503.11 or submitted online 1167
through the internet pursuant to section 3503.20 of the Revised 1168
Code is not required to contain a signature to be considered 1169
valid. The signature obtained under division (A)(3) of section 1170
3503.11 or under division (B) of section 3503.20 of the Revised 1171
Code, as applicable, shall be considered the applicant's 1172
signature for all election and signature-matching purposes. 1173
(F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of 1174
this section and in sections 3501.382 and 3505.24 of the Revised 1175
Code, no person shall preprint or fill out any portion of a 1176
voter registration, change of residence, or change of name form 1177
on behalf of an applicant. 1178
(2) A completed voter registration, change of residence, 1179
or change of name form is not valid if any portion of it has 1180
been completed by any person other than the applicant in 1181

S. B. No. 153 Page 42
As Introduced
violation of division (F)(1) of this section. 1182
(G) As used in this section, "registering an applicant" 1183
includes any effort, for compensation, to provide voter 1184
registration forms or to assist persons in completing or 1185
returning those forms. 1186
Sec. 3503.15. (A) The secretary of state shall establish 1187
and maintain a statewide voter registration database that shall 1188
be administered by the office of data analytics and archives in 1189
the office of the secretary of state and made continuously 1190
available to each board of elections and to other agencies as 1191
authorized by law. 1192
The statewide voter registration database shall be the 1193
official list of registered electors for all elections conducted 1194
in this state. 1195
(B) The statewide voter registration database shall, at a 1196
minimum, include all of the following: 1197
(1) An electronic network that connects all board of 1198
elections offices with the office of the secretary of state and 1199
with the offices of all other boards of elections; 1200
(2) A computer program that harmonizes the records 1201
contained in the database with records maintained by each board 1202
of elections; 1203
(3) An interactive computer program that allows access to 1204
the records contained in the database by each board of elections 1205
and by any persons authorized by the secretary of state to add, 1206
delete, modify, or print database records, and to conduct 1207
updates of the database; 1208
(4) A search program capable of verifying registered 1209

S. B. No. 153 Page 43
As Introduced
electors and their registration information by name, driver's 1210
license or state identification card number, birth date, social 1211
security number, or current address; 1212
(5) Safeguards and components to ensure that the 1213
integrity, security, and confidentiality of the voter 1214
registration information is maintained; 1215
(6) Methods to retain canceled voter registration records 1216
for not less than five years after they are canceled and to 1217
record the reason for their cancellation. 1218
(C) For each registered elector, the statewide voter 1219
registration database shall include all of the following 1220
information: 1221
(1) The elector's name; 1222
(2) The elector's birth date; 1223
(3) The elector's current residence address; 1224
(4) The elector's precinct number; 1225
(5) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state 1226
identification card number, if available; 1227
(6) The last four digits of the elector's social security 1228
number, if available; 1229
(7) The elector's telephone number, if available; 1230
(8) The elector's electronic mail address, if available; 1231
(9)(a) The elector's voter registration date, which shall 1232
be determined based on the elector's most recent application to 1233
register to vote in this state, subject to division (C)(9)(b) of 1234
this section, as follows: 1235

S. B. No. 153 Page 44
As Introduced
(i) In the case of an application delivered in person to a 1236
state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the 1237
registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public 1238
high school or vocational school, a public library, or the 1239
office of a county treasurer, the date stamped on the 1240
application upon receipt by the entity that transmits the 1241
application to the board of elections or the secretary of state; 1242
(ii) In the case of an application delivered in person to 1243
a board of elections or the secretary of state, the date stamped 1244
on the application upon receipt by the board of elections or the 1245
secretary of state, as applicable; 1246
(iii) In the case of an application delivered by mail to a 1247
board of elections or the secretary of state, the date the 1248
application is postmarked; 1249
(iv) In the case of an application submitted through the 1250
online voter registration system established under section 1251
3503.20 of the Revised Code, the date of the online submission; 1252
(v) In the case of an application submitted to a board of 1253
elections by facsimile transmission or electronic mail under 1254
Chapter 3511. of the Revised Code, the date of the receipt of 1255
the transmission or electronic mail by the board of elections; 1256
(vi) In the case of a provisional ballot affirmation that 1257
serves as an application to register to vote in future elections 1258
because the individual who cast the ballot is not registered to 1259
vote, the date the board of elections determines that the 1260
provisional ballot is invalid under section 3505.183 of the 1261
Revised Code. 1262
(b) For purposes of determining an elector's voter 1263
registration date under division (C)(9)(a) of this section, all 1264

S. B. No. 153 Page 45
As Introduced
of the following apply: 1265
(i) An elector's voter registration date shall not be 1266
during the period beginning on the day after the close of voter 1267
registration before an election and ending on the day of the 1268
election. If the date determined under division (C)(9)(a) of 1269
this section would be during that period, the voter registration 1270
date instead shall be the date on which the board of elections 1271
processes the application to register to vote after the day of 1272
the election. 1273
(ii) A change of address or change of name form, including 1274
a provisional ballot affirmation that serves as a change of 1275
address or change of name form, is not considered an application 1276
to register to vote. 1277
(iii) An application to register to vote that is submitted 1278
by an individual who is already registered to vote in this state 1279
is not considered an application to register to vote. 1280
(10) The elector's voting history, including all of the 1281
following for each election in which the elector cast a ballot 1282
that was counted: 1283
(a) The date of the election; 1284
(b) If the election was a primary election, the political 1285
party whose ballot the elector cast at the primary election or 1286
an indication that the elector voted only on the questions and 1287
issues appearing on the ballot at a special election held on the 1288
day of the primary election; 1289
(c) The type of ballot the elector cast. 1290
(11) The elector's last activity date, which shall be 1291
determined in accordance with rules adopted by the secretary of 1292

S. B. No. 153 Page 46
As Introduced
state pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code.; 1293
(12) The date, if any, on which the elector's United 1294
States citizenship was verified under section 3503.152 or 1295
3503.202 of the Revised Code; 1296
(13) If applicable, a notation that the elector is 1297
required to cast a provisional ballot under section 3503.201 or 1298
3503.202 of the Revised Code and the reason the elector is 1299
required to do so; 1300
(14) Any other information the secretary of state requires 1301
to be included by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the 1302
Revised Code. 1303
(D) Every business day during the period beginning on the 1304
forty-sixth day before an election and ending on the eighty- 1305
first day after the day of the election, a board of elections 1306
shall create a daily record of its voter registration database 1307
as of four p.m. and shall transmit the daily record to the 1308
secretary of state in a secure manner prescribed by the 1309
secretary of state. The secretary of state shall archive the 1310
daily record and retain it for at least twenty-two months after 1311
the day of the election permanently. 1312
(E) The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to 1313
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section and 1314
sections 3503.151 to 3503.153 of the Revised Code, including 1315
rules doing all of the following: 1316
(1) Specifying the manner in which any voter registration 1317
records maintained by boards of elections in other data formats 1318
shall be converted for inclusion in the statewide voter 1319
registration database; 1320
(2) Establishing a uniform method for entering voter 1321

S. B. No. 153 Page 47
As Introduced
registration records into the statewide voter registration 1322
database on an expedited basis, but not less than once per day, 1323
if new registration information is received, and for 1324
transmitting information securely to the secretary of state; 1325
(3) Establishing a uniform method for purging canceled 1326
voter registration records from the statewide voter registration 1327
database in accordance with section 3503.21 of the Revised Code; 1328
(4) Specifying the persons authorized to add, delete, 1329
modify, or print records contained in the statewide voter 1330
registration database and to make updates of that database; 1331
(5) Establishing a process for annually auditing the 1332
information contained in the statewide voter registration 1333
database. 1334
(F) A board of elections promptly shall purge a voter's 1335
name and voter registration information from the statewide voter 1336
registration database in accordance with the rules adopted by 1337
the secretary of state under division (E)(3) of this section 1338
after the cancellation of a voter's registration under section 1339
3503.21 of the Revised Code. 1340
(G) The secretary of state shall provide training in the 1341
operation of the statewide voter registration database to each 1342
board of elections and to any persons authorized by the 1343
secretary of state to add, delete, modify, or print database 1344
records, and to conduct updates of the database. 1345
(H) A board of elections and any vendor with which it 1346
contracts to provide voter registration software or related 1347
services shall ensure that the board's voter registration system 1348
and practices comply with the requirements of this section and 1349
any rules adopted under this section. 1350

S. B. No. 153 Page 48
As Introduced
Sec. 3503.151. (A) The secretary of state, through the 1351
office of data analytics and archives, and the boards of 1352
elections shall maintain the accuracy of the statewide voter 1353
registration database in accordance with this section. 1354
(B)(1) State agencies, including, but not limited to, the 1355
department of health, the bureau of motor vehicles, the 1356
department of job and family services, the department of 1357
medicaid, and the department of rehabilitation and corrections, 1358
shall provide any information and data to the secretary of state 1359
that is collected in the course of normal business and that is 1360
necessary to register to vote, to update an elector's 1361
registration, or to maintain the statewide voter registration 1362
database, except where prohibited by federal law or regulation. 1363
The department of health, the bureau of motor vehicles, the 1364
department of job and family services, the department of 1365
medicaid, and the department of rehabilitation and corrections 1366
shall provide that information and data to the secretary of 1367
state not later than the last day of each month. The secretary 1368
of state shall ensure that any information or data provided to 1369
the secretary of state that is confidential in the possession of 1370
the entity providing the data remains confidential while in the 1371
possession of the secretary of state. No public office, and no 1372
public official or employee, shall sell that information or data 1373
or use that information or data for profit. 1374
(2) The secretary of state shall adopt rules under Chapter 1375
119. of the Revised Code that establish, by mutual agreement 1376
with the bureau of motor vehicles, the content and format of the 1377
information and data the bureau of motor vehicles shall provide 1378
to the secretary of state under division (B)(1) of this section 1379
and the frequency with which the bureau shall provide that 1380
information and data. 1381

S. B. No. 153 Page 49
As Introduced
(C)(1) The secretary of state shall enter into agreements 1382
to share information or data that is in the possession of the 1383
secretary of state with other states or groups of states, as the 1384
secretary of state considers necessary, in order to maintain the 1385
statewide voter registration database. Except as otherwise 1386
provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the secretary of 1387
state shall ensure that any information or data provided to the 1388
secretary of state that is confidential in the possession of the 1389
state providing the data remains confidential while in the 1390
possession of the secretary of state. 1391
(2) The secretary of state may provide such otherwise 1392
confidential information or data to persons or organizations 1393
that are engaging in legitimate governmental purposes related to 1394
the maintenance of the statewide voter registration database. 1395
The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 1396
119. of the Revised Code identifying the persons or 1397
organizations who may receive that information or data. The 1398
secretary of state shall not share that information or data with 1399
a person or organization not identified in those rules. The 1400
secretary of state shall ensure that a person or organization 1401
that receives confidential information or data under this 1402
division keeps the information or data confidential in the 1403
person's or organization's possession by, at a minimum, entering 1404
into a confidentiality agreement with the person or 1405
organization. Any confidentiality agreement entered into under 1406
this division shall include a requirement that the person or 1407
organization submit to the jurisdiction of this state in the 1408
event that the person or organization breaches the agreement. 1409
(3) No person or entity that receives information or data 1410
under division (C) of this section shall sell the information or 1411
data or use the information or data for profit. 1412

S. B. No. 153 Page 50
As Introduced
(D) The secretary of state shall regularly transmit to the 1413
boards of elections, to the extent permitted by state and 1414
federal law, the information and data the secretary of state 1415
receives under divisions (B) and (C) of this section that is 1416
necessary to do the following, in order to ensure that the 1417
accuracy of the statewide voter registration database is 1418
maintained on a regular basis in accordance with applicable 1419
state and federal law: 1420
(1) Require the boards of elections to maintain the 1421
database in a manner that ensures that the name of each 1422
registered elector appears in the database, that only 1423
individuals who are not registered or eligible to vote are 1424
removed from the database, and that duplicate registrations are 1425
eliminated from the database; 1426
(2) Require the boards of elections to make a reasonable 1427
effort to remove individuals who are not eligible to vote from 1428
the database; 1429
(3) Establish safeguards to ensure that eligible electors 1430
are not removed in error from the database. 1431
(E)(1) The secretary of state shall use the information in 1432
the statewide voter registration database and the databases of 1433
the bureau of motor vehicles and the United States social 1434
security administration regularly to prepare and transmit a 1435
report to each board of elections that identifies each voter 1436
registration record in the county to which any of the following 1437
apply and that has not been identified in a previous report: 1438
(a) The record contains neither an Ohio driver's license 1439
or state identification card number nor the last four digits of 1440
a social security number. 1441

S. B. No. 153 Page 51
As Introduced
(b) The record contains an Ohio driver's license or state 1442
identification card number, but one of the following applies: 1443
(i) The number does not exist in the records of the bureau 1444
of motor vehicles. 1445
(ii) The number exists in the records of the bureau of 1446
motor vehicles but is not associated with the first name, last 1447
name, and date of birth that appear in the voter registration 1448
record. 1449
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2) of 1450
this section, the number exists in the records of the bureau of 1451
motor vehicles and is associated with the first name, last name, 1452
and date of birth that appear in the voter registration record, 1453
but the residence address that appears in the records of the 1454
bureau of motor vehicles is not the same as the residence 1455
address that appears in the voter registration record. 1456
(c) The record contains the last four digits of a social 1457
security number, but one of the following applies: 1458
(i) Those digits do not exist in the records of the United 1459
States social security administration. 1460
(ii) Those digits exist in the records of the United 1461
States social security administration but are not associated 1462
with the first name, last name, and date of birth that appear in 1463
the voter registration record. 1464
(2) The report shall exclude any voter registration record 1465
described in division (E)(1)(b)(iii) belonging to an elector to 1466
whom either of the following applies: 1467
(a) The elector is a participant in the address 1468
confidentiality program described in sections 111.41 to 111.99 1469

S. B. No. 153 Page 52
As Introduced
of the Revised Code. 1470
(b) The elector is a designated public service worker, as 1471
described in section 149.43 of the Revised Code, and one of the 1472
following applies: 1473
(i) The elector has submitted a redaction request to the 1474
secretary of state or to the board of elections under section 1475
149.45 of the Revised Code. 1476
(ii) It is otherwise apparent from the elector's voter 1477
registration record or from the records of the bureau of motor 1478
vehicles that the elector is a designated public service worker. 1479
(3) If, after a voter registration record appears on a 1480
report created under division (E) of this section because of the 1481
circumstances described in division (E)(1)(b)(iii) of this 1482
section, and the secretary of state learns in the preparation of 1483
a subsequent report that the elector's residence address in the 1484
records of the bureau of motor vehicles has been updated to 1485
match the elector's residence address in the voter registration 1486
record, the subsequent report shall include an instruction to 1487
the board to remove the indication from the elector's 1488
registration record added under division (A)(1) of section 1489
3503.202 of the Revised Code. 1490
(4) Promptly after receiving the report, the board of 1491
elections shall proceed under section 3503.201 of the Revised 1492
Code. 1493
(5) Subject to division (A)(2) of section 3503.13 of the 1494
Revised Code, the secretary of state shall make the information 1495
in each report available to the public on the secretary of 1496
state's official web site. 1497
(F)(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules under 1498

S. B. No. 153 Page 53
As Introduced
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to establish a uniform method 1499
for addressing instances in which records contained in the 1500
statewide voter registration database do not conform with 1501
records maintained by an agency, state, or group of states 1502
described in division (B) or (C) of this section. That method 1503
shall prohibit an elector's voter registration from being 1504
canceled on the sole basis that the information in the 1505
registration record does not conform to records maintained by 1506
such an agency. 1507
(2) Information provided under division (B) or (C) of this 1508
section for maintenance of the statewide voter registration 1509
database shall not be used to update the name or address of a 1510
registered elector. The name or address of a registered elector 1511
shall only be updated as a result of the elector's actions in 1512
filing a notice of change of name, change of address, or both. 1513
(3) A Except as otherwise provided in section 3503.201 of 1514
the Revised Code, a board of elections shall contact a 1515
registered elector pursuant to the rules adopted under division 1516
(E)(1) (F)(1) of this section to verify the accuracy of the 1517
information in the statewide voter registration database 1518
regarding that elector if that information does not conform with 1519
information provided under division (B) or (C) of this section 1520
and the discrepancy would affect the elector's eligibility to 1521
cast a regular ballot. 1522
Sec. 3503.152. The At least once each month, and every day 1523
during the period beginning on the forty-sixth day before an 1524
election and ending on the day before the day of the election, 1525
the secretary of state shall conduct an annual review of the 1526
statewide voter registration database to identify persons who 1527
appear not to be verify the United States citizens citizenship 1528

S. B. No. 153 Page 54
As Introduced
of persons whose citizenship has not been verified, as follows: 1529
(A)(A)(1) The secretary of state shall compare the 1530
information in the statewide voter registration database with 1531
the information the secretary of state obtains from the bureau 1532
of motor vehicles under section 3503.151 of the Revised Code to 1533
identify any person who has submitted documentation to the 1534
bureau of motor vehicles that indicates that the person is a 1535
United States citizen. 1536
(2) The secretary of state shall compare the information 1537
in the statewide voter registration database with the 1538
information the secretary of state obtains from the bureau of 1539
motor vehicles under section 3503.151 of the Revised Code to 1540
identify any person who does all of the following, in the 1541
following order, and who has not previously been included in a 1542
report issued under this section: 1543
(1) (a) Submits documentation to the bureau of motor 1544
vehicles that indicates that the person is not a United States 1545
citizen; 1546
(2) (b) Registers to vote, submits a voter registration 1547
change of residence or change of name form, or votes in this 1548
state; 1549
(3) (c) Submits documentation to the bureau of motor 1550
vehicles that indicates that the person is not a United States 1551
citizen. 1552
(B) The secretary of state shall send a written notice to 1553
each person identified under division (A) of this section, 1554
instructing the person either to confirm that the person is a 1555
United States citizen or to submit a completed voter 1556
registration cancellation form to the secretary of state. The 1557

S. B. No. 153 Page 55
As Introduced
secretary of state shall include a blank voter registration 1558
cancellation form with the notice. If the person fails to 1559
respond to the secretary of state in the manner described in 1560
division (C) or (D) of this section not later than thirty days 1561
after the notice is sent, the secretary of state promptly shall 1562
send the person a second notice and form. 1563
(C) If, not later than sixty days after the first notice 1564
is sent, a person who is sent a notice under division (B) of 1565
this section responds to the secretary of state, confirming that 1566
the person is a United States citizen, the secretary of state 1567
shall take no action concerning the person's voter registration. 1568
(D) If, not later than sixty days after the first notice 1569
was sent, a person who receives a notice under division (B) of 1570
this section sends a completed voter registration cancellation 1571
form to the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall 1572
instruct the board of elections of the county in which the 1573
person is registered to cancel the person's registration. 1574
(E) If a person who is sent a second notice under division 1575
(B) of this section fails to respond to the secretary of state 1576
in the manner described in division (C) or (D) of this section 1577
not later than thirty days after the second notice is sent, the 1578
secretary of state shall refer the matter to the attorney 1579
general for further investigation and possible prosecution under 1580
section 3599.11, 3599.12, 3599.13, or any other applicable 1581
section of the Revised Code. If, after the thirtieth day after 1582
the second notice is sent, the person sends a completed voter 1583
registration cancellation form to the secretary of state, the 1584
secretary of state shall instruct the board of elections of the 1585
county in which the person is registered to cancel the person's 1586
registration and shall notify the attorney general of the 1587

S. B. No. 153 Page 56
As Introduced
cancellation. 1588
(F) The secretary of state shall not conduct the review 1589
described in this section during the ninety days immediately 1590
preceding a primary or general election for federal office.(3) 1591
Separately, the secretary of state shall compare the information 1592
in the statewide voter registration database with the 1593
information the secretary of state obtains from the bureau of 1594
motor vehicles under section 3503.151 of the Revised Code to 1595
identify any person who has submitted documentation to the 1596
bureau of motor vehicles that indicates that the person is not a 1597
United States citizen, has not subsequently submitted 1598
documentation to the bureau that indicates that the person has 1599
become a United States citizen, and has not previously been 1600
included in a report issued under this section. The secretary of 1601
state then shall consult the systematic alien verification for 1602
entitlements (SAVE) program or its successor program, operated 1603
by the United States department of homeland security or its 1604
successor agency, to determine whether the program indicates 1605
that the person is not a United States citizen. 1606
(B)(1) When the secretary of state verifies that a person 1607
is a United States citizen under division (A)(1) of this 1608
section, the secretary of state promptly shall send a report to 1609
the applicable board of elections, instructing the board to 1610
proceed under division (D) of section 3503.201 or division (A) 1611
(1)(e) of section 3503.202 of the Revised Code, as applicable. 1612
(2) When the secretary of state identifies a person who 1613
appears not to be a United States citizen under division (A)(2) 1614
or (3) of this section, the secretary of state promptly shall 1615
send a report to the applicable board of elections, instructing 1616
the board to proceed under division (A)(1)(e) of section 1617

S. B. No. 153 Page 57
As Introduced
3503.202 of the Revised Code. 1618
(C)(1) If, after being sent a confirmation notice under 1619
division (A)(1)(e) of section 3503.202 of the Revised Code, a 1620
person cancels the person's voter registration or has the 1621
person's registration canceled under division (D)(4) of that 1622
section, the secretary of state shall refer the matter to the 1623
attorney general for further investigation and possible 1624
prosecution under section 3599.11, 3599.12, 3599.13, or any 1625
other applicable section of the Revised Code. 1626
(2) If, within fourteen days after a person is sent a 1627
second confirmation notice under division (A)(1)(e) of section 1628
3503.202 of the Revised Code, the person does not provide valid 1629
proof of citizenship to the board of elections under that 1630
section or cancel the person's voter registration, the secretary 1631
of state shall do all of the following: 1632
(a) Cancel the person's voter registration and notify the 1633
board of elections of that action; 1634
(b) Send the person a notice that the person's voter 1635
registration has been canceled and the reason for the 1636
cancelation; 1637
(c) Refer the matter to the attorney general for further 1638
investigation and possible prosecution under section 3599.11, 1639
3599.12, 3599.13, or any other applicable section of the Revised 1640
Code. 1641
Sec. 3503.153. (A) The statewide voter registration 1642
database shall be made available on a web site of the office of 1643
the secretary of state as follows: 1644
(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of 1645
this section, the following information from the statewide voter 1646

S. B. No. 153 Page 58
As Introduced
registration database regarding a registered elector shall be 1647
made available on the web site: 1648
(a) The elector's name; 1649
(b) The elector's birth date; 1650
(c) The elector's current residence address; 1651
(d) The elector's precinct number; 1652
(e) The elector's voter registration date, as described in 1653
division (C)(9) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; 1654
(f) The elector's voting history, as described in division 1655
(C)(10) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; 1656
(g) The elector's last activity date, as described in 1657
division (C)(11) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; 1658
(h) If applicable, the fact that the elector is required 1659
to cast a provisional ballot under section 3503.201 or 3503.202 1660
of the Revised Code, the reason for that fact, and the 1661
information the elector must provide to the board of elections 1662
to become eligible to cast a regular ballot. 1663
(2) During the thirty days before the day of a primary or 1664
general election, the web site interface of the statewide voter 1665
registration database shall permit an elector to search for the 1666
polling location at which that elector may cast a ballot. 1667
(3) No information in the statewide voter registration 1668
database that is exempt from disclosure under division (A)(2) of 1669
section 3503.13 of the Revised Code shall be made available on 1670
the web site. 1671
(B)(1) The secretary of state shall establish, by rule 1672
adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, a process for 1673

S. B. No. 153 Page 59
As Introduced
boards of elections to notify the secretary of state of changes 1674
in the locations of precinct polling places for the purpose of 1675
updating the information made available on the secretary of 1676
state's web site under division (A)(2) of this section. Those 1677
rules shall require a board of elections, during the thirty days 1678
before the day of a primary or general election, to notify the 1679
secretary of state within one business day of any change to the 1680
location of a precinct polling place within the county. 1681
(2) During the thirty days before the day of a primary or 1682
general election, not later than one business day after 1683
receiving a notification from a county pursuant to division (B) 1684
(1) of this section that the location of a precinct polling 1685
place has changed, the secretary of state shall update that 1686
information on the secretary of state's web site for the purpose 1687
of division (A)(2) of this section. 1688
Sec. 3503.16. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division 1689
(E) of section 111.44 of the Revised Code, whenever Whenever a 1690
registered elector changes the place of residence of that 1691
registered elector from one precinct to another within a county 1692
or from one county to another this state, or has a change of 1693
name, that registered elector shall report the change by 1694
delivering a change of residence or change of name form, 1695
whichever is appropriate, as prescribed by the secretary of 1696
state under section 3503.14 of the Revised Code to the state or 1697
local office of a designated agency, a public high school or 1698
vocational school, a public library, the office of the county 1699
treasurer, the office of the secretary of state, any office of 1700
the registrar or deputy registrar of motor vehicles, or any 1701
office of a board of elections in person or by a third person. 1702
Any voter registration, change of address, or change of name 1703
application, returned by mail, may be sent only to the secretary 1704

S. B. No. 153 Page 60
As Introduced
of state or the board of elections. 1705
A registered elector also may update the registration of 1706
that registered elector by filing a change of residence or 1707
change of name form on the day of a special, primary, or general 1708
election at the polling place in the precinct in which that 1709
registered elector resides or at the board of elections or at 1710
another site designated by the boardone of the methods described 1711
in section 3503.19 of the Revised Code not later than the 1712
thirtieth day before the day of an election, except as otherwise 1713
permitted under this section. 1714
(B)(1)(a) Any registered elector who moves within a 1715
precinct on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or 1716
special election and has not filed a notice of change of 1717
residence with the board of elections may vote in that election 1718
by going to that registered elector's assigned polling place, 1719
completing and signing a notice of change of residence, showing 1720
photo identification, and casting a ballot. 1721
(b) Any registered elector who changes the name of that 1722
registered elector and remains within a precinct on or prior to 1723
the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not 1724
filed a notice of change of name with the board of elections may 1725
vote in that election by going to that registered elector's 1726
assigned polling place, completing and signing a notice of a 1727
change of name, and casting a provisional ballot under section 1728
3505.181 of the Revised Code. If the registered elector provides 1729
to the precinct election officials proof of a legal name change, 1730
such as a marriage license or court order that includes the 1731
elector's current and prior names, the elector may complete and 1732
sign a notice of change of name and cast a regular ballot. 1733
(2)(B) Any registered elector who moves from one precinct 1734

S. B. No. 153 Page 61
As Introduced
to another within a county, does not move but changes the 1735
elector's name, or moves from one precinct to another within a 1736
county and changes the name of that registered elector on or 1737
prior to the day of a general, primary, or special election and 1738
has not filed a notice of reported the change of residence or 1739
change of name, whichever is appropriate, with the board of 1740
elections under section 3503.19 of the Revised Code may vote in 1741
that election if that registered elector complies with division 1742
(G) of this section or does all of the following: 1743
(a) Appears at anytime during regular business hours on or 1744
after the twenty-eighth day prior to the election in which that 1745
registered elector wishes to vote or, if the election is held on 1746
the day of a presidential primary election, the twenty-fifth day 1747
prior to the election, through noon of the Saturday prior to the 1748
election at the office of the board of elections, appears at any 1749
time during regular business hours on the Monday prior to the 1750
election at the office of the board of elections, or appears on 1751
the day of the election at either of the following locations: 1752
(i) The by casting a provisional ballot using the address 1753
to which the elector has moved or the name of the elector as 1754
changed, whichever is appropriate, at the polling place for the 1755
precinct in which that registered elector resides; 1756
(ii) The , at the office of the board of elections or, if 1757
pursuant to division (C) of of the county in which the elector 1758
resides during the time that absent voter's ballots may be cast 1759
in person under section 3501.10 3509.051 of the Revised Code the 1760
board has designated another location in the county at which 1761
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 1762
the office of the board of elections, or, if the elector 1763
qualifies to do so, by casting a provisional ballot with the 1764

S. B. No. 153 Page 62
As Introduced
assistance of two election officials of the county in which the 1765
elector resides under section 3509.08 of the Revised Code. 1766
(b) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 1767
falsification, the The written affirmation on the provisional 1768
ballot envelope, which shall serve as a notice of change of 1769
residence or change of name, whichever is appropriate; 1770
(c) Votes a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of 1771
the Revised Code at the polling place, at the office of the 1772
board of elections, or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 1773
3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another 1774
location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at 1775
that other location instead of the office of the board of 1776
elections, whichever is appropriate, using the address to which 1777
that registered elector has moved or the name of that registered 1778
elector as changed, whichever is appropriate; 1779
(d) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 1780
falsification, a statement attesting that that registered 1781
elector moved or had a change of name, whichever is appropriate, 1782
on or prior to the day of the election, has voted a provisional 1783
ballot at the polling place for the precinct in which that 1784
registered elector resides, at the office of the board of 1785
elections, or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of 1786
the Revised Code the board has designated another location in 1787
the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other 1788
location instead of the office of the board of elections, 1789
whichever is appropriate, and will not vote or attempt to vote 1790
at any other location for that particular election. 1791
(C) Any registered elector who moves from one county to 1792
another county within the state on or prior to the day of a 1793
general, primary, or special election and has not registered to 1794

S. B. No. 153 Page 63
As Introduced
vote in the county to which that registered elector moved 1795
reported the change of residence under section 3503.19 of the 1796
Revised Code may vote in that election if that registered 1797
elector complies with division (G) of this section or does all 1798
of the following: 1799
(1) Appears at any time during regular business hours on 1800
or after the twenty-eighth day prior to the election in which 1801
that registered elector wishes to vote or, if the election is 1802
held on the day of a presidential primary election, the twenty- 1803
fifth day prior to the election, through noon of the Saturday 1804
prior to the election by casting a provisional ballot using the 1805
address to which the elector has moved at the office of the 1806
board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 1807
3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another 1808
location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at 1809
that other location instead of the office of the board of 1810
elections, appears of the county in which the elector resides 1811
during the time that absent voter's ballots may be cast in 1812
person under section 3509.061 of the Revised Code, during 1813
regular business hours on the Monday prior to the election at 1814
the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division 1815
(C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has 1816
designated another location in the county at which registered 1817
electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office 1818
of the board of elections, or appears on the day of the election 1819
at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to 1820
division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board 1821
has designated another location in the county at which 1822
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 1823
the office of the board of elections; 1824
(2) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 1825

S. B. No. 153 Page 64
As Introduced
falsification, the , or, if the elector qualifies to do so, by 1826
casting a provisional ballot with the assistance of two election 1827
officials of the county in which the elector resides under 1828
section 3509.08 of the Revised Code. The written affirmation on 1829
the provisional ballot envelope, which shall serve as a notice 1830
of change of residence; 1831
(3) Votes a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of 1832
the Revised Code at the office of the board of elections or, if 1833
pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code 1834
the board has designated another location in the county at which 1835
registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of 1836
the office of the board of elections, using the address to which 1837
that registered elector has moved; 1838
(4) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 1839
falsification, a statement attesting that that registered 1840
elector has moved from one county to another county within the 1841
state on or prior to the day of the election, has voted at the 1842
office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) 1843
of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated 1844
another location in the county at which registered electors may 1845
vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board 1846
of elections, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other 1847
location for that particular election. 1848
(D) A person who votes by absent voter's ballots pursuant 1849
to division (G) of this section shall not make written 1850
application for the ballots pursuant to Chapter 3509. of the 1851
Revised Code. Ballots cast pursuant to division (G) of this 1852
section shall be set aside in a special envelope and counted 1853
during the official canvass of votes in the manner provided for 1854
in sections 3505.32 and 3509.06 of the Revised Code insofar as 1855

S. B. No. 153 Page 65
As Introduced
that manner is applicable. The board shall examine the pollbooks 1856
to verify that no ballot was cast at the polls or by absent 1857
voter's ballots under Chapter 3509. or 3511. of the Revised Code 1858
by an elector who has voted by absent voter's ballots pursuant 1859
to division (G) of this section. Any ballot determined to be 1860
insufficient for any of the reasons stated above or stated in 1861
section 3509.07 of the Revised Code shall not be counted. 1862
Subject to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised 1863
Code, a board of elections may lease or otherwise acquire a site 1864
different from the office of the board at which registered 1865
electors may vote pursuant to division (B) or (C) of this 1866
section. 1867
(E) Upon receiving a notice of change of residence or 1868
change of name, the board of elections shall immediately send 1869
the registrant an acknowledgment notice. If the change of 1870
residence or change of name notice is valid, the board shall 1871
update the voter's registration as appropriate. If that form is 1872
incomplete, the board shall inform the registrant in the 1873
acknowledgment notice specified in this division of the 1874
information necessary to complete or update that registrant's 1875
registration. 1876
(F) Change of residence and change of name forms shall be 1877
available at each polling place, and when these forms are 1878
completed, noting changes of residence or name, as appropriate, 1879
they shall be filed with election officials at the polling 1880
place. Election officials shall return completed forms, together 1881
with the pollbooks and tally sheets, to the board of elections. 1882
The board of elections shall provide change of residence 1883
and change of name forms to the probate court and court of 1884
common pleas. The court shall provide the forms to any person 1885

S. B. No. 153 Page 66
As Introduced
eighteen years of age or older who has a change of name by order 1886
of the court or who applies for a marriage license. The court 1887
shall forward all completed forms to the board of elections 1888
within five days after receiving them. 1889
(G) A registered elector who otherwise would qualify to 1890
vote under division (B) or (C) of this section but is unable to 1891
appear at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant 1892
to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board 1893
has designated another location in the county at which 1894
registered electors may vote, at that other location, on account 1895
of personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity, may vote 1896
on the day of the election if that registered elector does all 1897
of the following: 1898
(1) Makes a written application on a form prescribed by 1899
the secretary of state that includes all of the information 1900
required under section 3509.03 of the Revised Code to the 1901
appropriate board for an absent voter's ballot on or after the 1902
twenty-seventh day prior to the election in which the registered 1903
elector wishes to vote through the close of business on the 1904
seventh day prior to that election and requests that the absent 1905
voter's ballot be sent to the address to which the registered 1906
elector has moved if the registered elector has moved, or to the 1907
address of that registered elector who has not moved but has had 1908
a change of name; 1909
(2) Declares that the registered elector has moved or had 1910
a change of name, whichever is appropriate, and otherwise is 1911
qualified to vote under the circumstances described in division 1912
(B) or (C) of this section, whichever is appropriate, but that 1913
the registered elector is unable to appear at the board of 1914
elections because of personal illness, physical disability, or 1915

S. B. No. 153 Page 67
As Introduced
infirmity; 1916
(3) Completes and returns along with the completed absent 1917
voter's ballot a notice of change of residence indicating the 1918
address to which the registered elector has moved, or a notice 1919
of change of name, whichever is appropriate; 1920
(4) Completes and signs, under penalty of election 1921
falsification, a statement attesting that the registered elector 1922
has moved or had a change of name on or prior to the day before 1923
the election, has voted by absent voter's ballot because of 1924
personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity that 1925
prevented the registered elector from appearing at the board of 1926
elections, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other 1927
location or by absent voter's ballot mailed to any other 1928
location or address for that particular election. 1929
Sec. 3503.19. (A) Persons Except as otherwise provided in 1930
section 111.44 of the Revised Code, persons qualified to 1931
register or to change their registration because of a change of 1932
address or change of name may register or change update their 1933
registration in by doing any of the following: 1934
(1) Submitting a voter registration application or update 1935
form in person at any state or local office of a designated 1936
agency, at the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar 1937
of motor vehicles, at a public high school or vocational school, 1938
at a public library, at the office of a county treasurer, or at 1939
a branch office established by the board of elections, or 1940
probate court or court of common pleas, provided that a person 1941
who receives compensation for registering a voter shall return 1942
any registration form entrusted to that person by an applicant 1943
to a board of elections or to the office of the secretary of 1944
state; 1945

S. B. No. 153 Page 68
As Introduced
(2) Submitting a voter registration application or update 1946
form in person, through another person, or by mail at the office 1947
of the secretary of state or at the office of a board of 1948
elections. A registered elector may also change the elector's 1949
registration , including a branch office; 1950
(3) Submitting a voter registration application or update 1951
form through the online voter registration system under section 1952
3503.20 of the Revised Code; 1953
(4) Submitting a voter registration application or update 1954
form in person to the election officials on election day at any 1955
polling place where the elector is eligible to vote, in the 1956
manner provided under section 3503.16 of the Revised Code. The 1957
election officials shall return all completed forms, together 1958
with the pollbooks and tally sheets, to the board of elections. 1959
(5) In the case of a person who is eligible to vote as a 1960
uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 1961
52 U.S.C. 20310, returning the person's completed voter 1962
registration application or update form electronically to the 1963
office of the secretary of state or to the board of elections of 1964
the county in which the person's voting residence is located 1965
pursuant to Chapter 3511. of the Revised Code. 1966
(B)(1) Any state or local office of a designated agency, a 1967
public high school or vocational school, a public library, a 1968
probate court or court of common pleas, or the office of a 1969
county treasurer shall date stamp a voter registration 1970
application or update form it receives using a date stamp that 1971
does not disclose the identity of the state or local office that 1972
receives it and shall transmit any voter registration the 1973
application or change of registration form that it receives to 1974
the board of elections of the county in which the state or local 1975

S. B. No. 153 Page 69
As Introduced
office is located, within five days after receiving the voter 1976
registration application or change of registration form. The 1977
office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor 1978
vehicles shall date stamp a voter registration application or 1979
update form it receives using a date stamp that does not 1980
disclose the identity of the state or local office that receives 1981
it, shall transmit any electronic voter registration application 1982
or change of registration that it receives to the secretary of 1983
state within twenty-four hours after receiving it, and shall 1984
transmit any paper voter registration application or change of 1985
registration form that it receives to the board of elections of 1986
the county in which the office of the registrar or deputy 1987
registrar is located within five days after receiving the voter 1988
registration application or change of registration form, as 1989
required under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code. 1990
(2) If the office of the secretary of state receives a 1991
registration or update form before the thirtieth day before an 1992
election, the office shall forward the form to the board of 1993
elections of the county in which the applicant resides within 1994
ten days after receiving the application. If the office of the 1995
secretary of state receives a registration or update form on or 1996
after the thirtieth day before an election, the office shall 1997
forward the registration to the board of elections of the county 1998
in which the applicant resides within thirty days after that 1999
election. 2000
(3) If a board of elections receives a registration or 2001
update form from an applicant who resides in another county 2002
before the thirtieth day before an election, the board shall 2003
forward the form to the board of elections of the county in 2004
which the applicant resides within ten days after receiving the 2005
application. If a board of elections receives a registration or 2006

S. B. No. 153 Page 70
As Introduced
update form from an applicant who resides in another county on 2007
or after the thirtieth day before an election, the board shall 2008
forward the registration to the board of elections of the county 2009
in which the applicant resides within thirty days after that 2010
election. 2011
(C) Except as otherwise provided in section 3503.16 of the 2012
Revised Code: 2013
(1) An otherwise valid voter registration application that 2014
is returned to the appropriate office other than by mail must be 2015
received by a state or local office of a designated agency, the 2016
office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor 2017
vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public 2018
library, the office of a county treasurer, a probate court or 2019
court of common pleas, the office of the secretary of state, or 2020
the office of a board of elections no later than the thirtieth 2021
day preceding a primary, special, or general election for the 2022
person to qualify as an elector eligible to vote at that 2023
election. An otherwise valid registration application received 2024
after that day entitles the elector to vote at all subsequent 2025
elections. 2026
Any state or local office of a designated agency, the 2027
office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor 2028
vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public 2029
library, or the office of a county treasurer shall date stamp a 2030
registration application or change of name or change of address 2031
form it receives using a date stamp that does not disclose the 2032
identity of the state or local office that receives the 2033
registration. 2034
(2) Voter registration applications, if otherwise valid, 2035
that are returned by mail to the office of the secretary of 2036

S. B. No. 153 Page 71
As Introduced
state or to the office of a board of elections must be 2037
postmarked no later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, 2038
special, or general election in order for the person to qualify 2039
as an elector eligible to vote at that election. If an otherwise 2040
valid voter registration application that is returned by mail 2041
does not bear a postmark or a legible postmark, the registration 2042
shall be valid for that election if received by the office of 2043
the secretary of state or the office of a board of elections no 2044
later than twenty-five days preceding any special, primary, or 2045
general election. 2046
(B)(1) (D) Any person may apply in person, by telephone, 2047
by mail, or through another person for voter registration forms 2048
to the office of the secretary of state or the office of a board 2049
of elections. An individual who is eligible to vote as a 2050
uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 2051
42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 also may apply for voter registration forms 2052
by electronic means to the office of the secretary of state or 2053
to the board of elections of the county in which the person's 2054
voting residence is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the 2055
Revised Code. 2056
(2)(a) An applicant may return the applicant's completed 2057
registration form in person or by mail to any state or local 2058
office of a designated agency, to a public high school or 2059
vocational school, to a public library, to the office of a 2060
county treasurer, to the office of the secretary of state, or to 2061
the office of a board of elections. An applicant who is eligible 2062
to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in 2063
accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 also may return the 2064
applicant's completed voter registration form electronically to 2065
the office of the secretary of state or to the board of 2066
elections of the county in which the person's voting residence 2067

S. B. No. 153 Page 72
As Introduced
is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the Revised Code. 2068
(b) Subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section, an 2069
applicant may return the applicant's completed registration form 2070
through another person to any board of elections or the office 2071
of the secretary of state. 2072
(c) A person who receives compensation for registering a 2073
voter shall return any registration form entrusted to that 2074
person by an applicant to any board of elections or to the 2075
office of the secretary of state. 2076
(d) If a board of elections or the office of the secretary 2077
of state receives a registration form under division (B)(2)(b) 2078
or (c) of this section before the thirtieth day before an 2079
election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as 2080
applicable, shall forward the registration to the board of 2081
elections of the county in which the applicant is seeking to 2082
register to vote within ten days after receiving the 2083
application. If a board of elections or the office of the 2084
secretary of state receives a registration form under division 2085
(B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section on or after the thirtieth day 2086
before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of 2087
state, as applicable, shall forward the registration to the 2088
board of elections of the county in which the applicant is 2089
seeking to register to vote within thirty days after that 2090
election. 2091
(C)(1) A board of elections that receives a voter 2092
registration application and is satisfied as to the truth of the 2093
statements made in the registration form shall register the 2094
applicant not later than twenty business days after receiving 2095
the application, unless that application is received during the 2096
thirty days immediately preceding the day of an election. The 2097

S. B. No. 153 Page 73
As Introduced
board shall promptly notify the applicant in writing of each of 2098
the following: 2099
(a) The applicant's registration; 2100
(b) The precinct in which the applicant is to vote; 2101
(c) In bold type as follows: 2102
"Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in 2103
order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo 2104
identification will still be able to vote by casting a 2105
provisional ballot." 2106
The notification shall be by nonforwardable mail. If the 2107
mail is returned to the board, it shall investigate and cause 2108
the notification to be delivered to the correct address. 2109
(2) If, after investigating as required under division (C) 2110
(1) of this section, the board is unable to verify the voter's 2111
correct address, it shall cause the voter's name in the official 2112
registration list and in the poll list or signature pollbook to 2113
be marked to indicate that the voter's notification was returned 2114
to the board. 2115
At the first election at which a voter whose name has been 2116
so marked appears to vote, the voter shall be required to vote 2117
by provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised 2118
Code. If the provisional ballot is counted pursuant to division 2119
(B)(3) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the board shall 2120
correct that voter's registration, if needed, and shall remove 2121
the indication that the voter's notification was returned from 2122
that voter's name on the official registration list and on the 2123
poll list or signature pollbook. If the provisional ballot is 2124
not counted pursuant to division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of 2125
section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the voter's registration 2126

S. B. No. 153 Page 74
As Introduced
shall be canceled. The board shall notify the voter by United 2127
States mail of the cancellation. 2128
(3) If a notice of the disposition of an otherwise valid 2129
registration application is sent by nonforwardable mail and is 2130
returned undelivered, the person shall be registered as provided 2131
in division (C)(2) of this section and sent a confirmation 2132
notice by forwardable mail. If the person fails to respond to 2133
the confirmation notice, update the person's registration, or 2134
vote by provisional ballot as provided in division (C)(2) of 2135
this section in any election during the period of two federal 2136
elections subsequent to the mailing of the confirmation notice, 2137
the person's registration shall be canceled. 2138
Sec. 3503.20. (A) The secretary of state shall establish a 2139
secure online voter registration system. The system shall 2140
provide for all of the following: 2141
(1) An applicant to submit a voter registration 2142
application to the secretary of state online through the 2143
internet; 2144
(2) The online applicant to be registered to vote, if all 2145
of the following apply: 2146
(a) The application contains all of the following 2147
information: 2148
(i) The applicant's name; 2149
(ii) The applicant's address; 2150
(iii) The applicant's date of birth; 2151
(iv) The last four digits of the applicant's social 2152
security number; 2153

S. B. No. 153 Page 75
As Introduced
(v) The applicant's Ohio driver's license number or the 2154
number of the applicant's state identification card issued under 2155
section 4507.50 of the Revised Code. 2156
(b) The applicant's name, address, and date of birth, the 2157
last four digits of the applicant's social security number, and 2158
the applicant's Ohio driver's license number or the number of 2159
the applicant's state identification card as they are provided 2160
in the application are not inconsistent with the information on 2161
file with the bureau of motor vehicles; 2162
(c) The applicant is a United States citizen, will have 2163
lived in this state for thirty days immediately preceding the 2164
next election, will be at least eighteen years of age on or 2165
before the day of the next general election, and is otherwise 2166
eligible to register to vote; 2167
(d) The applicant attests to the truth and accuracy of the 2168
information submitted in the online application under penalty of 2169
election falsification. 2170
(B) If an individual registers to vote or a registered 2171
elector updates the elector's name, address, or both under this 2172
section, the secretary of state shall obtain an electronic copy 2173
of the applicant's or elector's signature that is on file with 2174
the bureau of motor vehicles. That electronic signature shall be 2175
used as the applicant's or elector's signature on voter 2176
registration records, for all election and signature-matching 2177
purposes. 2178
(C) The secretary of state shall employ whatever security 2179
measures the secretary of state considers necessary to ensure 2180
the integrity and accuracy of voter registration information 2181
submitted electronically pursuant to this section. Errors in 2182

S. B. No. 153 Page 76
As Introduced
processing voter registration applications in the online system 2183
shall not prevent an applicant from becoming registered or from 2184
voting. 2185
(D) The online voter registration application established 2186
under division (A) of this section shall include both of the 2187
following: 2188
(1) An option for the voter to provide the voter's former 2189
residence address or addresses, if the voter is currently 2190
registered to vote at another address; 2191
(2) The following language: 2192
"By clicking the box below, I affirm all of the following 2193
under penalty of election falsification, which is a felony of 2194
the fifth degree: 2195
(1) (a) I am the person whose name and identifying 2196
information is provided on this form, and I desire to register 2197
to vote, or update my voter registration, in the State of Ohio. 2198
(2) (b) All of the information I have provided on this 2199
form is true and correct as of the date I am submitting this 2200
form. 2201
(3) (c) I am a United States citizen. 2202
(4) (d) I will have lived in Ohio for thirty days 2203
immediately preceding the next election. 2204
(5) (e) I will be at least eighteen years of age on or 2205
before the day of the next general election. 2206
(6) (f) I authorize the Bureau of Motor Vehicles to 2207
transmit to the Ohio Secretary of State my signature that is on 2208
file with the Bureau of Motor Vehicles, and I understand and 2209

S. B. No. 153 Page 77
As Introduced
agree that the signature transmitted by the Bureau of Motor 2210
Vehicles will be used by the Secretary of State to validate this 2211
electronic voter registration application as if I had signed 2212
this form personally. 2213
(g) I understand that if I am registered to vote at any 2214
other address, the election officials will be notified of my 2215
change of address. 2216
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 2217
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 2218
In order to register to vote or update a voter 2219
registration under division (A) of this section, an applicant or 2220
elector shall be required to mark the box in the online voter 2221
registration application that appears in conjunction with the 2222
previous statement. 2223
(E) The online voter registration process established 2224
under division (A) of this section shall be in operation and 2225
available for use by individuals who wish to register to vote or 2226
update their voter registration information online not earlier 2227
than January 1, 2017. During the period beginning on the first 2228
day after the close of voter registration before an election and 2229
ending on the day of the election, the online voter registration 2230
system shall display a notice indicating that the applicant will 2231
not be registered to vote for the purposes of that election. 2232
(F) Notwithstanding section 1.50 of the Revised Code, if 2233
any provision of this section or of division (E) of section 2234
3503.14 of the Revised Code is held invalid, or if the 2235
application of any provision of this section or of that division 2236
to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then this section 2237
and that division cease to operate. 2238

S. B. No. 153 Page 78
As Introduced
Sec. 3503.201. (A)(1) When the board of elections receive s 2239
a voter registration application or a notice of change of 2240
address or change of name, if the form is complete and the board 2241
is satisfied as to the truth of the statements made in the form, 2242
the board shall register the applicant or update the applicant's 2243
registration. 2244
(2) If the form is incomplete, the board promptly shall 2245
send the applicant a notice that specifies the information 2246
necessary to complete or update the applicant's registration. 2247
(3) If the board determines that the applicant appears not 2248
to be eligible to vote, the board shall reject the form and 2249
refer the matter to the prosecuting attorney of the county for 2250
investigation. 2251
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(2) 2252
and (3) of this section, upon registering an elector or updating 2253
an elector's registration, the board shall mark the elector's 2254
registration record, the official registration list, and the 2255
poll list or signature pollbook to indicate that the elector 2256
must vote by provisional ballot because the applicant's 2257
citizenship has not been verified. 2258
(2) Division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to an 2259
elector if the statewide voter registration database indicates 2260
that the elector's citizenship has been verified. 2261
(3) Division (B)(1) of this section does not prohibit a 2262
uniformed services or overseas absent voter from voting in a 2263
general election for federal office using a federal write-in 2264
absentee ballot as permitted under division (C) of section 2265
3511.14 of the Revised Code. 2266
(C)(1) The board shall register an applicant or update the 2267

S. B. No. 153 Page 79
As Introduced
applicant's registration under division (A)(1) of this section 2268
not later than twenty business days after receiving the 2269
application, unless that application is received during the 2270
thirty days immediately preceding the day of an election, and 2271
promptly shall send the applicant an acknowledgment notice. 2272
(2) The acknowledgment notice shall include all of the 2273
following information: 2274
(a) The fact that the elector has been registered to vote 2275
or has had the elector's registration updated, as applicable; 2276
(b) The precinct in which the elector is to vote; 2277
(c) In bold type as follows: 2278
"Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in 2279
order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo 2280
identification will still be able to vote by casting a 2281
provisional ballot." 2282
(d) Whether the elector's United States citizenship has 2283
been verified; 2284
(e) If the elector's United States citizenship has not 2285
been verified, the fact that the elector will be required to 2286
provide proof of citizenship to the board in order to cast a 2287
regular ballot and the manner in which the elector may do so 2288
under section 3503.202 of the Revised Code. 2289
(3) The board shall send the acknowledgment notice by 2290
nonforwardable mail. If the acknowledgment notice is returned to 2291
the board as undeliverable, it shall investigate and cause the 2292
acknowledgment notice to be delivered to the correct address. 2293
(4) If, after investigating as required under division (C) 2294
(3) of this section, the board is unable to verify the elector's 2295

S. B. No. 153 Page 80
As Introduced
correct address, it shall proceed under section 3503.202 of the 2296
Revised Code. 2297
(D) Upon receiving a report from the secretary of state 2298
under section 3503.152 of the Revised Code, indicating that the 2299
secretary of state has verified that the applicant is a United 2300
States citizen, the board shall do all of the following: 2301
(1) Indicate in the elector's registration record that the 2302
elector's United States citizenship has been verified; 2303
(2) Remove the indication that the elector must vote by 2304
provisional ballot. If the board receives the report during the 2305
period beginning on the forty-sixth day before an election and 2306
ending on the day before the day of the election, the board 2307
shall remove the indication as soon as possible after receiving 2308
the report. 2309
(3) Notify the elector, on a form prescribed by the 2310
secretary of state, that the elector's United States citizenship 2311
has been verified. The notice required under this division may 2312
be included in the acknowledgment notice described under 2313
division (C) of this section if the board has not yet sent the 2314
elector an acknowledgment notice. 2315
Sec. 3503.202. (A)(1) When any of the following occur, th e 2316
board of elections shall send the elector a confirmation notice 2317
and, if the board's records are not already so marked, shall 2318
mark the elector's registration record, the official 2319
registration list, and the poll list or signature pollbook to 2320
indicate that the elector must vote by provisional ballot and 2321
the reason the elector must do so: 2322
(a) The board determines that it is unable to verify an 2323
elector's residence address, as described in division (C)(4) of 2324

S. B. No. 153 Page 81
As Introduced
section 3503.201 of the Revised Code. 2325
(b) The board receives a report from the secretary of 2326
state under division (E) of section 3503.151 of the Revised Code 2327
indicating that the board must verify the elector's residence 2328
address, unless it is apparent to the board that the elector is 2329
a participant in the address confidentiality program described 2330
in sections 111.41 to 111.99 of the Revised Code or is a 2331
designated public service worker as described in section 149.43 2332
of the Revised Code. 2333
Upon receiving notice in a subsequent report under this 2334
division that an elector's residence address in the records of 2335
the bureau of motor vehicles has been updated to match the 2336
elector's residence address in the voter registration record, 2337
the board shall remove the indication that the elector must vote 2338
by provisional ballot under this division and shall notify the 2339
elector, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, that 2340
the elector's residence address has been verified. 2341
(c) The board receives a report from the secretary of 2342
state under division (E) of section 3503.151 of the Revised Code 2343
indicating that the board must verify the elector's Ohio 2344
driver's license or state identification card number. 2345
(d) The board receives a report from the secretary of 2346
state under division (E) of section 3503.151 of the Revised Code 2347
indicating that the board must verify the last four digits of 2348
the elector's social security number. 2349
(e) The board receives a report from the secretary of 2350
state under section 3503.152 of the Revised Code indicating that 2351
the board must verify the elector's United States citizenship. 2352
If, within fourteen days after the confirmation notice is sent, 2353

S. B. No. 153 Page 82
As Introduced
the elector does not provide valid proof of citizenship to the 2354
board under division (B) or (D) of this section or cancel the 2355
elector's registration, the board shall send the elector a 2356
second confirmation notice. Upon receiving notice in a 2357
subsequent report under section 3503.152 of the Revised Code 2358
that the secretary of state has verified that the elector is a 2359
United States citizen, the board shall do all of the following: 2360
(i) Indicate in the elector's registration record that the 2361
elector's United States citizenship has been verified; 2362
(ii) Remove the indication that the elector must vote by 2363
provisional ballot under division (A)(1)(e) of this section; 2364
(iii) Notify the elector, on a form prescribed by the 2365
secretary of state, that the elector's United States citizenship 2366
has been verified. 2367
(2) A confirmation notice sent to an elector under 2368
division (A)(1) of this section shall include all of the 2369
following: 2370
(a) The information the board must verify; 2371
(b) The manner in which the elector may provide the 2372
required information to the board before the elector next 2373
appears to vote, as described in division (B) of this section, 2374
or when casting a provisional ballot, as described in division 2375
(D) of this section; 2376
(c) The date by which the elector must provide the 2377
required information to the board in order to avoid having the 2378
elector's registration canceled under division (C)(2) of section 2379
3503.152 or division (A)(7) of section 3503.21 of the Revised 2380
Code, as applicable. 2381

S. B. No. 153 Page 83
As Introduced
(B) An elector whose registration record has been marked 2382
under division (A) of this section or division (B)(1) of section 2383
3503.201 of the Revised Code to indicate that the elector must 2384
cast a provisional ballot is not required to cast a provisional 2385
ballot if, before the elector next appears to vote, the elector 2386
does the following, as applicable: 2387
(1) Provides a valid residence address to the board, if 2388
the board must verify the elector's residence address; 2389
(2) Provides one of the following to the board, if the 2390
board must verify the elector's Ohio driver's license or state 2391
identification card number: 2392
(a) An Ohio driver's license or state identification card 2393
number that exists in the records of the bureau of motor 2394
vehicles and is associated with the elector's first name, last 2395
name, and date of birth, as confirmed by the secretary of state; 2396
(b) A correction to the elector's first name, last name, 2397
or date of birth in the elector's registration record such that 2398
the number in the elector's registration record meets the 2399
requirements of division (B)(2)(a) of this section, as confirmed 2400
by the secretary of state. 2401
(3) Provides one of the following to the board, if the 2402
board must verify the last four digits of the elector's social 2403
security number: 2404
(a) The last four digits of a social security number that 2405
exists in the records of the United States social security 2406
administration and is associated with the elector's first name, 2407
last name, and date of birth, as confirmed by the secretary of 2408
state; 2409
(b) A correction to the elector's first name, last name, 2410

S. B. No. 153 Page 84
As Introduced
or date of birth in the elector's registration record such that 2411
the last four digits of the elector's social security number in 2412
the elector's registration record meets the requirements of 2413
division (B)(3)(a) of this section, as confirmed by the 2414
secretary of state. 2415
(4) Provides proof of citizenship to the board, if the 2416
board must verify the elector's United States citizenship. The 2417
board shall transmit an electronic copy of the elector's proof 2418
of citizenship to the secretary of state in a secure manner 2419
prescribed by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state 2420
shall confirm whether the elector's proof of citizenship is 2421
valid. 2422
(C) When the board has verified all of the information the 2423
board is required to verify concerning an elector under division 2424
(B) of this section, the board shall correct or update the 2425
elector's registration, as applicable, and shall remove the 2426
indication that the elector must vote by provisional ballot. 2427
(D)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B) 2428
and (D)(1)(b) of this section, at the first election at which an 2429
elector whose registration record is marked to indicate that the 2430
elector must vote by provisional ballot under this section or 2431
section 3503.201 of the Revised Code appears to vote, the 2432
elector shall vote by provisional ballot. 2433
(b) Division (D)(1)(a) of this section does not prohibit a 2434
uniformed services or overseas absent voter who is required to 2435
cast a provisional ballot under division (B)(1) of section 2436
3503.201 of the Revised Code, but for no other reason, from 2437
voting in a general election for federal office using a federal 2438
write-in absentee ballot as permitted under division (C) of 2439
section 3511.14 of the Revised Code. 2440

S. B. No. 153 Page 85
As Introduced
(2) In order for the elector's provisional ballot to be 2441
eligible to be counted, in addition to meeting all other 2442
requirements described in division (B)(3) of section 3505.183 of 2443
the Revised Code, the elector shall provide the applicable 2444
required information as described in division (B) of this 2445
section on or attached to the provisional ballot affirmation, or 2446
shall appear in person at the office of the board within four 2447
days after the day of the election and provide that information. 2448
(3) If the elector's provisional ballot is counted 2449
pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 3505.183 of the Revised 2450
Code and division (D)(2) of this section, the board shall 2451
correct or update the elector's registration, as applicable, and 2452
shall remove the indication that the elector must vote by 2453
provisional ballot. 2454
(4) If the provisional ballot is not counted pursuant to 2455
division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of section 3505.183 of the 2456
Revised Code or division (D)(2) of this section, the board shall 2457
cancel the elector's registration and shall notify the elector 2458
by United States mail of the cancellation. The notice shall 2459
inform the elector that the elector may again register to vote 2460
if the elector is eligible to do so. 2461
Sec. 3503.21. (A) The registration of a registered elector 2462
shall be canceled upon the occurrence of any of the following: 2463
(1) The filing by a registered elector of a written 2464
request with a board of elections or the secretary of state, on 2465
a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by the 2466
elector, that the registration be canceled. The filing of such a 2467
request does not prohibit an otherwise qualified elector from 2468
reregistering to vote at any time. 2469

S. B. No. 153 Page 86
As Introduced
(2) The filing of a notice of the death of a registered 2470
elector as provided in section 3503.18 of the Revised Code; 2471
(3) The filing with the board of elections of a certified 2472
copy of the death certificate of a registered elector by the 2473
deceased elector's spouse, parent, or child, by the 2474
administrator of the deceased elector's estate, or by the 2475
executor of the deceased elector's will; 2476
(4) The conviction of the registered elector of a felony 2477
under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United 2478
States as provided in section 2961.01 of the Revised Code; 2479
(5) The adjudication of incompetency of the registered 2480
elector for the purpose of voting as provided in section 2481
5122.301 of the Revised Code; 2482
(6) The change of residence of the registered elector to a 2483
location outside the county of registration in accordance with 2484
division (B) of this section or as described in section 3503.33 2485
of the Revised Code; 2486
(7) The failure of the registered elector, after having 2487
been mailed a confirmation notice, to do either of the 2488
following: 2489
(a) Respond to such a notice and vote at least once during 2490
a period of four consecutive years, which period shall include 2491
two general federal elections; 2492
(b) Update the elector's registration and vote at least 2493
once during a period of four consecutive years, which period 2494
shall include two general federal elections. 2495
(8) The receipt by the board of elections of a 2496
cancellation notice or request pursuant to section 111.44 of the 2497

S. B. No. 153 Page 87
As Introduced
Revised Code; 2498
(9) The circumstances described in division (C)(2) of 2499
section 3503.152 of the Revised Code; 2500
(10) The circumstances described in division (D)(4) of 2501
section 3503.202 of the Revised Code. 2502
(B)(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures 2503
to transfer a registrant's voter registration information when 2504
the registrant moves from one county to another within this 2505
state and updates the registrant's voter registration, as 2506
described in section 3503.33 of the Revised Code, and to 2507
identify and cancel the registration in a prior county of 2508
residence of any registrant who changes the registrant's voting 2509
residence to a location outside the registrant's current county 2510
of registration without updating the registrant's voter 2511
registration. Any procedures prescribed in this division shall 2512
be uniform and nondiscriminatory, and shall comply with the 2513
Voting Rights Act of 1965. The secretary of state may prescribe 2514
procedures under this division that include the use of the 2515
national change of address service provided by the United States 2516
postal system through its licensees. Any program so prescribed 2517
shall be completed not later than ninety days prior to the date 2518
of any primary or general election for federal office. 2519
(2) The registration of any elector identified as having 2520
changed the elector's voting residence to a location outside the 2521
elector's current county of registration without updating the 2522
elector's registration shall not be canceled unless the 2523
registrant is sent a confirmation notice on a form prescribed by 2524
the secretary of state and the registrant fails to respond to 2525
the confirmation notice or otherwise update the registration and 2526
fails to vote in any election during the period of two federal 2527

S. B. No. 153 Page 88
As Introduced
elections subsequent to the mailing of the confirmation notice. 2528
(C) The registration of a registered elector shall not be 2529
canceled except as provided in this section, section 111.44 or 2530
3503.33 of the Revised Code, or division (Q) of section 3501.05 2531
of the Revised Code, division (C)(2) of section 3503.152, 2532
division (C)(2) (D)(4) of section 3503.19 of the Revised Code 2533
3503.202, or division (C) of section 3503.24 of the Revised 2534
Code. 2535
(D) Boards of elections shall send their voter 2536
registration information to the secretary of state as required 2537
under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code. The secretary of 2538
state may prescribe by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 2539
of the Revised Code the format in which the boards of elections 2540
must send that information to the secretary of state. In the 2541
first quarter of each year, the secretary of state shall send 2542
the information to the national change of address service 2543
described in division (B) of this section and request that 2544
service to provide the secretary of state with a list of any 2545
voters sent by the secretary of state who have moved within the 2546
last twelve months. The secretary of state shall transmit to 2547
each appropriate board of elections whatever lists the secretary 2548
of state receives from that service. The board shall send a 2549
notice to each person on the list transmitted by the secretary 2550
of state requesting confirmation of the person's change of 2551
address, together with a postage prepaid, preaddressed return 2552
envelope containing a form on which the voter may verify or 2553
correct the change of address information. 2554
(E) The registration of a registered elector described in 2555
division (A)(7) or (B)(2) of this section shall be canceled not 2556
later than one hundred twenty days after the date of the second 2557

S. B. No. 153 Page 89
As Introduced
general federal election in which the elector fails to vote or 2558
not later than one hundred twenty days after the expiration of 2559
the four-year period in which the elector fails to vote or 2560
respond to a confirmation notice, whichever is later. 2561
(F)(1) When a registration is canceled pursuant to 2562
division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, the applicable board of 2563
elections shall send a written notice, on a form prescribed by 2564
the secretary of state, to the address at which the elector was 2565
registered, informing the recipient that the elector's 2566
registration has been canceled, of the reason for the 2567
cancellation, and that if the cancellation was made in error, 2568
the elector may contact the board of elections to correct the 2569
error. 2570
(2) If the elector's registration is canceled pursuant to 2571
division (A)(2) or (3) of this section in error, it shall be 2572
restored and treated as though it were never canceled. 2573
Sec. 3503.33. If an elector applying for registration is 2574
already registered in another state or in another county within 2575
this state, the elector shall declare this fact to the 2576
registration officer and shall sign an authorization to cancel 2577
or transfer the elector's previous registration on a form 2578
prescribed by the secretary of state. If the elector does not 2579
sign such an authorization, the elector's registration 2580
application authorizes the transfer of the elector's previous 2581
registration from one county to another within this state or the 2582
cancellation of the elector's registration in the elector's 2583
previous state of residence, as applicable. 2584
The In the case of an elector who moves from one county to 2585
another within this state, the director of the board of 2586
elections shall mail all such authorizations transmit a copy of 2587

S. B. No. 153 Page 90
As Introduced
the elector's new registration form and any accompanying 2588
authorization form to the board of elections or comparable 2589
agency of the proper state and county of the elector's former 2590
registration. Upon the receipt of this authorization the 2591
registration form and any accompanying authorization form from 2592
the forwarding county, the director of a the board of elections 2593
in Ohio, upon a comparison of the elector's signature with the 2594
elector's signature as it appears on the registration files, 2595
shall remove the elector's former registration from the files, 2596
transfer the information in it to the board of elections of the 2597
elector's new county, and place it with the cancellation 2598
authorization new registration form and any accompanying 2599
authorization form in a separate file which shall be kept for a 2600
period of two calendar years. The board shall notify the elector 2601
at the present address as shown on the cancellation 2602
authorization that his registration has been canceled. 2603
In the case of an elector who moves into this state, the 2604
director of the board of elections shall transmit a copy of the 2605
elector's new registration form and any accompanying 2606
authorization form to the chief election official of the state 2607
of the elector's former registration. 2608
Sec. 3505.181. (A) All of the following individuals shall 2609
be permitted to cast a provisional ballot at an election: 2610
(1) An individual who declares that the individual is a 2611
registered voter in the precinct in which the individual desires 2612
to vote and that the individual is eligible to vote in an 2613
election, but the name of the individual does not appear on the 2614
official list of eligible voters for the precinct or an election 2615
official asserts that the individual is not eligible to vote; 2616
(2) An individual who does not have or is unable to 2617

S. B. No. 153 Page 91
As Introduced
provide photo identification to the election officials; 2618
(3) An individual whose name in the poll list or signature 2619
pollbook has been marked under section 3509.09 or 3511.13 of the 2620
Revised Code as having requested an absent voter's ballot or a 2621
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot for that 2622
election and who appears to vote at the polling place; 2623
(4) An individual whose notification of registration has 2624
been returned undelivered to the board of elections and whose 2625
name in the official registration list and in the poll list or 2626
signature pollbook has been marked under division (C)(2) of 2627
section 3503.19 3503.201 or 3503.202 of the Revised Code, except 2628
as otherwise provided in division (C) of section 3511.14 of the 2629
Revised Code; 2630
(5) An individual who has been successfully challenged 2631
under section 3505.20 or 3513.20 of the Revised Code; 2632
(6) An individual who changes the individual's name and 2633
remains within the precinct without providing proof of that name 2634
change under division (B)(1)(b) of section 3503.16 of the 2635
Revised Code, moves from one precinct to another within a 2636
county, moves from one precinct to another within a county and 2637
changes the individual's name, or moves from one county to 2638
another within the state, and completes and signs the required 2639
forms and statements under as described in division (B) or (C) 2640
of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code; 2641
(7) An individual whose signature, in the opinion of the 2642
precinct officers under section 3505.22 of the Revised Code, is 2643
not that of the person who signed that name in the registration 2644
forms. 2645
(B) An individual who is eligible to cast a provisional 2646

S. B. No. 153 Page 92
As Introduced
ballot under division (A) of this section shall be permitted to 2647
cast a provisional ballot as follows: 2648
(1) An election official at the polling place shall notify 2649
the individual that the individual may cast a provisional ballot 2650
in that election. 2651
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (F) of this 2652
section, the individual shall complete and execute a written 2653
affirmation before an election official at the polling place 2654
stating that the individual is both of the following: 2655
(a) A registered voter in the precinct in which the 2656
individual desires to vote; 2657
(b) Eligible to vote in that election. 2658
(3) An election official at the polling place shall 2659
transmit the ballot cast by the individual and the voter 2660
information contained in the written affirmation executed by the 2661
individual under division (B)(2) of this section to an 2662
appropriate local election official for verification under 2663
division (B)(4) of this section. 2664
(4) If the appropriate local election official to whom the 2665
ballot or voter or address information is transmitted under 2666
division (B)(3) of this section determines that the individual 2667
is eligible to vote, the individual's provisional ballot shall 2668
be counted as a vote in that election. 2669
(5)(a) At the time that an individual casts a provisional 2670
ballot, the appropriate local election official shall give the 2671
individual written information that states that any individual 2672
who casts a provisional ballot will be able to ascertain under 2673
the system established under division (B)(5)(b) of this section 2674
whether the vote was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, 2675

S. B. No. 153 Page 93
As Introduced
the reason that the vote was not counted. 2676
(b) The appropriate state or local election official shall 2677
establish a free access system, in the form of a toll-free 2678
telephone number, that any individual who casts a provisional 2679
ballot may access to discover whether the vote of that 2680
individual was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, the 2681
reason that the vote was not counted. The free access system 2682
established under this division also shall provide to an 2683
individual whose provisional ballot was not counted information 2684
explaining how that individual may contact the board of 2685
elections to register to vote or to resolve problems with the 2686
individual's voter registration. 2687
The appropriate state or local election official shall 2688
establish and maintain reasonable procedures necessary to 2689
protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of personal 2690
information collected, stored, or otherwise used by the free 2691
access system established under this division. The system shall 2692
permit an individual only to gain access to information about 2693
the individual's own provisional ballot. 2694
(6) If, at the time that an individual casts a provisional 2695
ballot, the individual provides photo identification, the 2696
individual shall record the type of identification provided on 2697
the provisional ballot affirmation and, if the individual 2698
provides an Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or 2699
interim identification document, the individual also shall write 2700
the individual's driver's license or state identification card 2701
number on the provisional ballot affirmation. 2702
(7)(a) For a provisional ballot to be eligible to be 2703
counted when it is cast by an individual who does not have photo 2704
identification because the individual has a religious objection 2705

S. B. No. 153 Page 94
As Introduced
to being photographed, the individual shall complete an 2706
affidavit of religious objection under section 3505.19 of the 2707
Revised Code. The election officials shall attach the affidavit 2708
to the individual's provisional ballot envelope. If the 2709
individual does not complete the affidavit at the time of 2710
casting the provisional ballot, the individual may appear at the 2711
office of the board of elections within four days after the day 2712
of the election and complete the affidavit. 2713
(b) For a provisional ballot to be eligible to be counted 2714
when it is cast by any other individual who does not have or is 2715
unable to provide photo identification to the election 2716
officials, the individual who cast that ballot, within four days 2717
after the day of the election, shall appear at the office of the 2718
board of elections and provide photo identification. 2719
(8) For a provisional ballot cast by an individual who has 2720
been successfully challenged under section 3505.20 of the 2721
Revised Code to be eligible to be counted, the individual who 2722
cast that ballot, within four days after the day of that 2723
election, shall provide to the board of elections any 2724
identification or other documentation required to be provided by 2725
the applicable challenge questions asked of that individual 2726
under section 3505.20 of the Revised Code. 2727
(C)(1) If an individual declares that the individual is 2728
eligible to vote in a precinct other than the precinct in which 2729
the individual desires to vote, or if, upon review of the 2730
precinct voting location guide using the residential street 2731
address provided by the individual, an election official at the 2732
precinct at which the individual desires to vote determines that 2733
the individual is not eligible to vote in that precinct, the 2734
election official shall direct the individual to the precinct 2735

S. B. No. 153 Page 95
As Introduced
and polling place in which the individual appears to be eligible 2736
to vote, explain that the individual may cast a provisional 2737
ballot at the current location but the ballot or a portion of 2738
the ballot will not be counted if it is cast in the wrong 2739
precinct, and provide the telephone number of the board of 2740
elections in case the individual has additional questions. 2741
(2) If the individual refuses to travel to the correct 2742
precinct or to the office of the board of elections to cast a 2743
ballot, the individual shall be permitted to vote a provisional 2744
ballot at that precinct in accordance with division (B) of this 2745
section. If the individual is in the correct polling location 2746
for the precinct in which the individual is registered and 2747
eligible to vote, the election official shall complete and sign, 2748
under penalty of election falsification, a form that includes 2749
all of the following, and attach the form to the individual's 2750
provisional ballot affirmation: 2751
(a) The name or number of the individual's correct 2752
precinct; 2753
(b) A statement that the election official instructed the 2754
individual to travel to the correct precinct to vote; 2755
(c) A statement that the election official informed the 2756
individual that casting a provisional ballot in the wrong 2757
precinct would result in all or a portion of the votes on the 2758
ballot being rejected; 2759
(d) The name or number of the precinct in which the 2760
individual is casting a provisional ballot; and 2761
(e) The name of the polling location in which the 2762
individual is casting a provisional ballot. 2763
(D) The appropriate local election official shall cause 2764

S. B. No. 153 Page 96
As Introduced
voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place 2765
on the day of each election. 2766
(E) As used in this section and sections 3505.182 and 2767
3505.183 of the Revised Code: 2768
(1) "Precinct voting location guide" means either of the 2769
following: 2770
(a) An electronic or paper record that lists the correct 2771
precinct and polling place for either each specific residential 2772
street address in the county or the range of residential street 2773
addresses located in each neighborhood block in the county; 2774
(b) Any other method that a board of elections creates 2775
that allows a precinct election official or any elector who is 2776
at a polling place in that county to determine the correct 2777
precinct and polling place of any qualified elector who resides 2778
in the county. 2779
(2) "Voting information" means all of the following: 2780
(a) A sample version of the ballot that will be used for 2781
that election; 2782
(b) Information regarding the date of the election and the 2783
hours during which polling places will be open; 2784
(c) Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a 2785
vote and how to cast a provisional ballot; 2786
(d) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time 2787
voters under applicable federal and state laws; 2788
(e) General information on voting rights under applicable 2789
federal and state laws, including information on the right of an 2790
individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how 2791

S. B. No. 153 Page 97
As Introduced
to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged 2792
to have been violated; 2793
(f) General information on federal and state laws 2794
regarding prohibitions against acts of fraud and 2795
misrepresentation. 2796
(F) Nothing in this section or section 3505.183 of the 2797
Revised Code is in derogation of section 3505.24 of the Revised 2798
Code, which permits a blind, disabled, or illiterate elector to 2799
receive assistance in the marking of the elector's ballot by two 2800
precinct election officials of different political parties. A 2801
blind, disabled, or illiterate elector may receive assistance in 2802
marking that elector's provisional ballot and in completing the 2803
required affirmation in the same manner as an elector may 2804
receive assistance on the day of an election under that section. 2805
Sec. 3505.182. Each individual who casts a provisional 2806
ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code shall execute 2807
a written affirmation. The form of the written affirmation shall 2808
be printed upon the face of the provisional ballot envelope and 2809
shall be as follows: 2810
"Provisional Ballot Affirmation 2811
(A) Clearly print your full name: ___________________ 2812
(B) Write your date of birth: _______________________ 2813
(C)(1) Write your current address: __________________ 2814
_____________________________________________________ 2815
(2) Have you moved without updating your voter 2816
registration?: 2817
Yes ______ No ______ 2818

S. B. No. 153 Page 98
As Introduced
If yes, write your former address: __________________ 2819
_____________________________________________________ 2820
Failure to provide your former address will not cause your 2821
provisional ballot to be rejected. 2822
(D)(1) You must show photo identification to the election 2823
official that includes your name and photograph and is not 2824
expired. Check the type of photo identification you provided: 2825
______ An Ohio driver's license or state identification 2826
card or an interim identification form issued by the Bureau of 2827
Motor Vehicles. If you showed your Ohio driver's license or 2828
state identification card or an interim identification form, 2829
write your full driver's license or state identification card 2830
number: ________________________ 2831
______ A United States passport or passport card; 2832
______ A United States military identification card, Ohio 2833
national guard identification card, or United States department 2834
of veterans affairs identification card. 2835
(2) If you do not have photo identification because you 2836
have a religious objection to being photographed, complete an 2837
affidavit of religious objection. The precinct election official 2838
will attach it to the provisional ballot envelope. 2839
(3) If you did not show photo identification to the 2840
election official or complete an affidavit of religious 2841
objection, you must appear at the office of the board of 2842
elections during the four days after the election and provide 2843
photo identification or complete an affidavit of religious 2844
objection for your vote to be eligible to be counted. 2845
(4) If Complete this section if you need to update your 2846

S. B. No. 153 Page 99
As Introduced
voter registration, you may provide additional information 2847
below. This information will not be used for ballot counting 2848
purposes or if you need to verify the identification you used to 2849
register to vote. If you need to verify your identification and 2850
you do not provide the needed information on this form, you must 2851
provide the information to the board of elections on or before 2852
the fourth day following this election in order for your ballot 2853
to be eligible to be counted. 2854
Write your full Ohio driver's license or state 2855
identification card number: ________________________ 2856
Write the last four digits of your Social Security number: 2857
_______________ 2858
(5) If you are casting a provisional ballot because you 2859
need to provide proof of citizenship, either write your full 2860
Ohio driver's license or state identification card number above 2861
or attach proof of citizenship to the outside of this envelope. 2862
If you do not provide proof of citizenship at this time, you 2863
must provide proof of citizenship to the board of elections on 2864
or before the fourth day following this election in order for 2865
your ballot to be eligible to be counted. 2866
"Proof of citizenship" means evidence that you are a 2867
United States citizen, in the form of one of the following: 2868
(a) The number of your current or expired Ohio driver's 2869
license or state identification card or a copy of the front and 2870
back of your current or expired Ohio driver's license, state 2871
identification card, or interim identification form, if you have 2872
submitted documentation to the bureau of motor vehicles 2873
indicating that you are a United States citizen; 2874
(b) A copy of the front and back of a current or expired 2875

S. B. No. 153 Page 100
As Introduced
driver's license or nondriver identification card issued by 2876
another state within the United States, if the issuing agency 2877
indicates on the license or card that you are a United States 2878
citizen; 2879
(c) A copy of a birth certificate, certification of report 2880
of birth, or consular report of birth abroad; 2881
(d) A copy of the identification page of a current or 2882
expired United States passport; 2883
(e) A copy of the front and back of a United States 2884
passport card; 2885
(f) A copy of a certificate of naturalization or 2886
certificate of citizenship. 2887
If the name on your proof of citizenship is different from 2888
your current legal name, you must also provide proof of your 2889
change of name, such as a copy of a marriage license or court 2890
order. 2891
(E) If your right to vote has been challenged, you must 2892
provide any required additional information to the board of 2893
elections on or before the seventh fourth day following this 2894
election. 2895
(F) Sign and date the following statement: 2896
I solemnly swear or affirm that I am a citizen of the 2897
United States; that I will be at least 18 years of age at the 2898
time of the general election; that I have lived in this state 2899
for 30 days immediately preceding this election in which I am 2900
voting this ballot; that I am a registered voter in the precinct 2901
in which I am voting this provisional ballot; and that I am 2902
eligible to vote in the election in which I am voting this 2903

S. B. No. 153 Page 101
As Introduced
provisional ballot; and that I will not vote or attempt to vote 2904
at any other location or in any other manner for this particular 2905
election. 2906
I understand that, if the information I provide on this 2907
provisional ballot affirmation is not fully completed and 2908
correct, if the board of elections determines that I am not 2909
registered to vote, a resident of this precinct, or eligible to 2910
vote in this election, or if the board of elections determines 2911
that I have already voted in this election, my provisional 2912
ballot will not be counted. I understand that, if I am not 2913
currently registered to vote or if I am not registered at my 2914
current address or under my current name, this form will serve 2915
as an application to register to vote or update my registration 2916
for future elections, as long as I provide all of the 2917
information required to register to vote or update my 2918
registration. I further understand that knowingly providing 2919
false information is a violation of law and subjects me to 2920
possible criminal prosecution. 2921
I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, 2922
that the above statements are true and correct to the best of my 2923
knowledge and belief. 2924
________________________ 2925
Signature of Voter 2926
________________________ 2927
Date 2928
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 2929
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 2930
In addition to any information required to be included on 2931

S. B. No. 153 Page 102
As Introduced
the written affirmation, an individual casting a provisional 2932
ballot may provide additional information to the election 2933
official to assist the board of elections in determining the 2934
individual's eligibility to vote in that election, including the 2935
date and location at which the individual registered to vote, if 2936
known. 2937
If the individual provided all of the information required 2938
under section 3503.14 of the Revised Code to register to vote or 2939
to update the individual's registration on the provisional 2940
ballot affirmation, the board of elections shall consider the 2941
individual's provisional ballot affirmation to also serve as a 2942
notice of change of name, change of residence, or both, or as a 2943
voter registration form, as applicable, for that individual only 2944
for the purposes of future elections. 2945
Sec. 3505.183. (A) When the ballot boxes are delivered to 2946
the board of elections from the precincts, the board shall 2947
separate the provisional ballot envelopes from the rest of the 2948
ballots. Teams of employees of the board consisting of one 2949
member of each major political party shall place the sealed 2950
provisional ballot envelopes in a secure location within the 2951
office of the board. The sealed provisional ballot envelopes 2952
shall remain in that secure location until the validity of those 2953
ballots is determined under division (B) of this section. While 2954
the provisional ballot is stored in that secure location, and 2955
prior to the counting of the provisional ballots, if the board 2956
receives information regarding the validity of a specific 2957
provisional ballot under division (B) of this section, the board 2958
may note, on the sealed provisional ballot envelope for that 2959
ballot, whether the ballot is valid and entitled to be counted. 2960
(B)(1) To determine whether a provisional ballot is valid 2961

S. B. No. 153 Page 103
As Introduced
and entitled to be counted, the board shall examine its records 2962
and determine whether the individual who cast the provisional 2963
ballot is registered and eligible to vote in the applicable 2964
election. The board shall examine the information contained in 2965
the written affirmation executed by the individual who cast the 2966
provisional ballot under division (B)(2) of section 3505.181 of 2967
the Revised Code or under section 3511.052 of the Revised Code, 2968
as applicable. The following information shall be included in 2969
the written affirmation in order for the provisional ballot to 2970
be eligible to be counted: 2971
(a) The individual's printed name, signature, date of 2972
birth, and current address; 2973
(b) A statement that the individual is a registered voter 2974
in the precinct in which the provisional ballot is being voted; 2975
(c) A statement that the individual is eligible to vote in 2976
the election in which the provisional ballot is being voted. 2977
(2) In addition to the information required to be included 2978
in an affirmation under division (B)(1) of this section, in 2979
determining whether a provisional ballot is valid and entitled 2980
to be counted, the board also shall examine any additional 2981
information for determining ballot validity provided by the 2982
provisional voter on the affirmation, provided by the 2983
provisional voter to an election official under section 3505.182 2984
or 3511.052 of the Revised Code, or provided to the board of 2985
elections during the four days after the day of the election 2986
under division (B)(7) or (8) of section 3505.181 or 3511.052 of 2987
the Revised Code, to assist the board in determining the 2988
individual's eligibility to vote. 2989
(3) If, in examining a provisional ballot affirmation and 2990

S. B. No. 153 Page 104
As Introduced
additional information under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this 2991
section and comparing the information required under division 2992
(B)(1) of this section with the individual's information in the 2993
statewide voter registration database, the board determines that 2994
all of the following apply, the provisional ballot envelope 2995
shall be opened, and the ballot shall be placed in a ballot box 2996
to be counted: 2997
(a) The individual named on the affirmation is properly 2998
registered to vote. 2999
(b) The individual named on the affirmation is eligible to 3000
cast a ballot in the precinct and for the election in which the 3001
individual cast the provisional ballot. 3002
(c) The individual provided all of the information 3003
required under division (B)(1) of this section in the 3004
affirmation that the individual executed at the time the 3005
individual cast the provisional ballot. 3006
(d) One of the following applies: 3007
(i) The individual provided showed photo identification to 3008
the election officials at the time of casting the provisional 3009
ballot or appeared at the office of the board within four days 3010
after the day of the election and provided photo identification 3011
or, in the case of a provisional uniformed services or overseas 3012
absent voter's ballot cast under section 3511.052 of the Revised 3013
Code, the individual provided a copy of the individual's photo 3014
identification with the provisional ballot or provided that copy 3015
to the board of elections within four days after the day of the 3016
election. If the individual provided showed the individual's 3017
Ohio driver's license or state identification card or an interim 3018
identification form to the election officials, the individual 3019

S. B. No. 153 Page 105
As Introduced
provided the individual's driver's license number or state 3020
identification card number and the number is not different from 3021
the individual's driver's license number or state identification 3022
card number contained in the statewide voter registration 3023
database. 3024
(ii) The individual completed an affidavit of religious 3025
objection under section 3505.19 of the Revised Code at the time 3026
of casting the provisional ballot or at the office of the board 3027
within four days after the day of the election and the affidavit 3028
is valid under that section. 3029
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 3030
month and day of the individual's date of birth are not 3031
different from the day and month of the individual's date of 3032
birth contained in the statewide voter registration database. 3033
This division does not apply to an individual's 3034
provisional ballot if either of the following is true: 3035
(i) The individual's date of birth contained in the 3036
statewide voter registration database is January 1, 1800. 3037
(ii) The board of elections has found, by a vote of at 3038
least three of its members, that the individual has met all 3039
other requirements of division (B)(3) of this section. 3040
(f) The individual's current address is not different from 3041
the individual's address contained in the statewide voter 3042
registration database, unless the individual indicated that the 3043
individual is casting a provisional ballot because the 3044
individual has moved and has not submitted a notice of change of 3045
address, as described in division (A)(6) of section 3505.181 of 3046
the Revised Code. 3047
(g) If applicable, the individual provided any additional 3048

S. B. No. 153 Page 106
As Introduced
information required under division (B)(8) of section 3505.181 3049
of the Revised Code within four days after the day of the 3050
election. 3051
(h) If applicable, the individual provided the information 3052
required under division (D)(2) of section 3503.202 of the 3053
Revised Code on the provisional ballot affirmation or within 3054
four days after the day of the election. 3055
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of 3056
this section, if, in examining a provisional ballot affirmation 3057
and additional information under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of 3058
this section and comparing the information required under 3059
division (B)(1) of this section with the individual's 3060
information in the statewide voter registration database, the 3061
board determines that any of the following applies, the 3062
provisional ballot envelope shall not be opened, and the ballot 3063
shall not be counted: 3064
(i) The individual named on the affirmation is not 3065
qualified or is not properly registered to vote. 3066
(ii) The individual named on the affirmation is not 3067
eligible to cast a ballot in the precinct or for the election in 3068
which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 3069
(iii) The individual did not provide all of the 3070
information required under division (B)(1) of this section in 3071
the affirmation that the individual executed at the time the 3072
individual cast the provisional ballot. 3073
(iv) The individual has already cast a ballot for the 3074
election in which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 3075
(v) If applicable, the individual did not provide any 3076
additional information required under division (B)(8) of section 3077

S. B. No. 153 Page 107
As Introduced
3505.181 of the Revised Code within four days after the day of 3078
the election. 3079
(vi) The individual failed to provide show photo 3080
identification, failed to provide the individual's driver's 3081
license or state identification card number if the individual 3082
provided showed photo identification in the form of an Ohio 3083
driver's license or state identification card or an interim 3084
identification form, failed to provide a copy of the 3085
individual's photo identification with the individual's 3086
provisional uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot 3087
or to provide that copy to the board of elections within four 3088
days after the day of the election, or failed to complete an 3089
affidavit of religious objection. 3090
(vii) The individual failed to execute an affirmation 3091
under division (B) of section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 3092
(viii) The individual provided showed photo identification 3093
in the form of an Ohio driver's license or state identification 3094
card or an interim identification form and the driver's license 3095
number or state identification card number the individual 3096
provided is different from the individual's driver's license 3097
number or state identification card number contained in the 3098
statewide voter registration database. 3099
(ix) The individual completed an affidavit of religious 3100
objection under section 3505.19 of the Revised Code, but the 3101
affidavit is not valid under that section. 3102
(x) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the 3103
month and day of the individual's date of birth are different 3104
from the day and month of the individual's date of birth 3105
contained in the statewide voter registration database. 3106

S. B. No. 153 Page 108
As Introduced
This division does not apply to an individual's 3107
provisional ballot if either of the following is true: 3108
(I) The individual's date of birth contained in the 3109
statewide voter registration database is January 1, 1800. 3110
(II) The board of elections has found, by a vote of at 3111
least three of its members, that the individual has met all of 3112
the requirements of division (B)(3) of this section, other than 3113
the requirements of division (B)(3)(e) of this section. 3114
(xi) The individual's current address is different from 3115
the individual's address contained in the statewide voter 3116
registration database, unless the individual indicated that the 3117
individual is casting a provisional ballot because the 3118
individual has moved and has not submitted a notice of change of 3119
address, as described in division (A)(6) of section 3505.181 of 3120
the Revised Code. 3121
(xii) If applicable, the individual did not provide the 3122
information required under division (D)(2) of section 3503.202 3123
of the Revised Code on the provisional ballot affirmation or 3124
within four days after the day of the election. 3125
(b) If, in examining a provisional ballot affirmation and 3126
additional information under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this 3127
section and comparing the information required under division 3128
(B)(1) of this section with the individual's information in the 3129
statewide voter registration database, the board is unable to 3130
determine either of the following, the provisional ballot 3131
envelope shall not be opened, and the ballot shall not be 3132
counted: 3133
(i) Whether the individual named on the affirmation is 3134
qualified or properly registered to vote; 3135

S. B. No. 153 Page 109
As Introduced
(ii) Whether the individual named on the affirmation is 3136
eligible to cast a ballot in the precinct or for the election in 3137
which the individual cast the provisional ballot. 3138
(C) For each provisional ballot rejected under division 3139
(B)(4) of this section, the board shall record the name of the 3140
provisional voter who cast the ballot, the identification number 3141
of the provisional ballot envelope, the names of the election 3142
officials who determined the validity of that ballot, the date 3143
and time that the determination was made, and the reason that 3144
the ballot was not counted, unless the board has already 3145
recorded that information in another database. 3146
(D)(1) If an individual cast a provisional ballot in a 3147
precinct in which the individual is not registered and eligible 3148
to vote, but in the correct polling location for the precinct in 3149
which the individual is registered and eligible to vote, and the 3150
election official failed to direct the individual to the correct 3151
precinct, the individual's ballot shall be remade under division 3152
(D)(2) of this section. The election official shall be deemed to 3153
have directed the individual to the correct precinct if the 3154
election official correctly completed the form described in 3155
division (C)(2) of section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 3156
(2) A board of elections that remakes a provisional ballot 3157
under division (D)(1) of this section shall remake the 3158
provisional ballot on a ballot for the appropriate precinct to 3159
reflect the offices, questions, and issues for which the 3160
individual was eligible to cast a ballot and for which the 3161
individual attempted to cast a provisional ballot. The remade 3162
ballot shall be counted for each office, question, and issue for 3163
which the individual was eligible to vote. 3164
(3) If an individual cast a provisional ballot in a 3165

S. B. No. 153 Page 110
As Introduced
precinct in which the individual is not registered and eligible 3166
to vote and in the incorrect polling location for the precinct 3167
in which the individual is registered and eligible to vote, the 3168
provisional ballot envelope shall not be opened, and the ballot 3169
shall not be counted. 3170
(E) Provisional ballots that are rejected under division 3171
(B)(4) of this section shall not be counted but shall be 3172
preserved in their provisional ballot envelopes unopened until 3173
the time provided by section 3505.31 of the Revised Code for the 3174
destruction of all other ballots used at the election for which 3175
ballots were provided, at which time they shall be destroyed. 3176
(F) Provisional ballots that the board determines are 3177
eligible to be counted under division (B)(3) or (D) of this 3178
section shall be counted in the same manner as provided for 3179
other ballots under section 3505.27 of the Revised Code. No 3180
provisional ballots shall be counted in a particular county 3181
until the board determines the eligibility to be counted of all 3182
provisional ballots cast in that county under division (B) of 3183
this section for that election. Observers, as provided in 3184
section 3505.21 of the Revised Code, may be present at all times 3185
that the board is determining the eligibility of provisional 3186
ballots to be counted and counting those provisional ballots 3187
determined to be eligible. No person shall recklessly disclose 3188
the count or any portion of the count of provisional ballots in 3189
such a manner as to jeopardize the secrecy of any individual 3190
ballot. 3191
(G)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(2) of 3192
this section, nothing in this section shall prevent a board of 3193
elections from examining provisional ballot affirmations and 3194
additional information under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this 3195

S. B. No. 153 Page 111
As Introduced
section to determine the eligibility of provisional ballots to 3196
be counted during the seven days after the day of an election. 3197
(2) A board of elections shall not examine the provisional 3198
ballot affirmation and additional information under divisions 3199
(B)(1) and (2) of this section of any provisional ballot cast by 3200
an individual who must provide photo identification, complete an 3201
affidavit of religious objection, or provide additional 3202
information to the board of elections under division (B)(7) or 3203
(8) of section 3505.181 or 3511.052 of the Revised Code for the 3204
board to determine the individual's eligibility until the 3205
individual does so or until the eighth day after the day of the 3206
election, whichever is earlier. 3207
Sec. 3505.20. Any person offering to vote may be 3208
challenged at the polling place by any precinct election 3209
official. If the board of elections has ruled on the question 3210
presented by a challenge prior to election day, its finding and 3211
decision shall be final, and the voting location manager shall 3212
be notified in writing. If the board has not ruled, the question 3213
shall be determined as set forth in this section. If any person 3214
is so challenged as unqualified to vote, the voting location 3215
manager shall tender the person the following oath: "You do 3216
swear or affirm under penalty of election falsification that you 3217
will fully and truly answer all of the following questions put 3218
to you concerning your qualifications as an elector at this 3219
election." 3220
(A) If the person is challenged as unqualified on the 3221
ground that the person is not a United States citizen, the 3222
precinct election officials shall put the following questions: 3223
(1) Are you a citizen of the United States? 3224

S. B. No. 153 Page 112
As Introduced
(2) Are you a native or naturalized citizen? 3225
(3) Where were you born? 3226
(4) What official documentation do Do you possess to prove 3227
proof of your United States citizenship? Please provide that 3228
documentation. 3229
If the person offering to vote claims to be a naturalized 3230
citizen of the United States, the person shall, before the vote 3231
is received, produce produces proof of citizenship for 3232
inspection of the precinct election officials a certificate of 3233
naturalization , other than the number of the person's Ohio 3234
driver's license or state identification card, and declare 3235
declares under oath that the person is the identical person 3236
named in the certificate. If the person states under oath that, 3237
by reason of the naturalization of the person's parents or one 3238
of them, the person has become a citizen of the United States, 3239
and when or where the person's parents were naturalized, the 3240
certificate of naturalization need not be producedthe person 3241
shall be permitted to cast a regular ballot. If the person is 3242
unable to provide a certificate of naturalization proof of 3243
citizenship, other than the number of the person's Ohio driver's 3244
license or state identification card, on the day of the 3245
election, the precinct election officials shall provide to the 3246
person, and the person may vote, a provisional ballot under 3247
section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. The provisional ballot 3248
shall not be counted unless it is properly completed and the 3249
board of elections determines that the voter is properly 3250
registered and eligible to vote in the election. 3251
(B) If the person is challenged as unqualified on the 3252
ground that the person has not resided in this state for thirty 3253
days immediately preceding the election, the precinct election 3254

S. B. No. 153 Page 113
As Introduced
officials shall put the following questions: 3255
(1) Have you resided in this state for thirty days 3256
immediately preceding this election? If so, where have you 3257
resided? 3258
(2) Did you properly register to vote? 3259
(3) Can you provide some form of identification containing 3260
your current mailing address in this precinct? Please provide 3261
that identification. 3262
(4) Have you voted or attempted to vote at any other 3263
location in this or in any other state at this election? 3264
(5) Have you applied for an absent voter's ballot in any 3265
state for this election? 3266
If the precinct election officials are unable to verify 3267
the person's eligibility to cast a ballot in the election, the 3268
precinct election officials shall provide to the person, and the 3269
person may vote, a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of 3270
the Revised Code. The provisional ballot shall not be counted 3271
unless it is properly completed and the board of elections 3272
determines that the voter is properly registered and eligible to 3273
vote in the election. 3274
(C) If the person is challenged as unqualified on the 3275
ground that the person is not a resident of the precinct where 3276
the person offers to vote, the precinct election officials shall 3277
put the following questions: 3278
(1) Do you reside in this precinct? 3279
(2) When did you move into this precinct? 3280
(3) When you came into this precinct, did you come for a 3281

S. B. No. 153 Page 114
As Introduced
temporary purpose merely or for the purpose of making it your 3282
home? 3283
(4) What is your current mailing address? 3284
(5) Do you have some official identification containing 3285
your current address in this precinct? Please provide that 3286
identification. 3287
(6) Have you voted or attempted to vote at any other 3288
location in this or in any other state at this election? 3289
(7) Have you applied for any absent voter's ballot in any 3290
state for this election? 3291
The precinct election officials shall direct an individual 3292
who is not in the appropriate polling place to the appropriate 3293
polling place. If the individual refuses to go to the 3294
appropriate polling place, or if the precinct election officials 3295
are unable to verify the person's eligibility to cast a ballot 3296
in the election, the precinct election officials shall provide 3297
to the person, and the person may vote, a provisional ballot 3298
under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. The provisional 3299
ballot shall not be counted unless it is properly completed and 3300
the board of elections determines that the voter is properly 3301
registered and eligible to vote in the election. 3302
(D) If the person is challenged as unqualified on the 3303
ground that the person is not of legal voting age, the precinct 3304
election officials shall put the following questions: 3305
(1) Are you eighteen years of age or more? 3306
(2) What is your date of birth? 3307
(3) Do you have some official identification verifying 3308
your age? Please provide that identification. 3309

S. B. No. 153 Page 115
As Introduced
If the precinct election officials are unable to verify 3310
the person's age and eligibility to cast a ballot in the 3311
election, the precinct election officials shall provide to the 3312
person, and the person may vote, a provisional ballot under 3313
section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. The provisional ballot 3314
shall not be counted unless it is properly completed and the 3315
board of elections determines that the voter is properly 3316
registered and eligible to vote in the election. 3317
The voting location manager shall put such other questions 3318
to the person challenged as are necessary to determine the 3319
person's qualifications as an elector at the election. If a 3320
person challenged refuses to answer fully any question put to 3321
the person, is unable to answer the questions as they were 3322
answered on the registration form by the person under whose name 3323
the person offers to vote, or refuses to sign the person's name 3324
or make the person's mark, or if for any other reason a majority 3325
of the precinct election officials believes the person is not 3326
entitled to vote, the precinct election officials shall provide 3327
to the person, and the person may vote, a provisional ballot 3328
under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. The provisional 3329
ballot shall not be counted unless it is properly completed and 3330
the board of elections determines that the voter is properly 3331
registered and eligible to vote in the election. 3332
A qualified citizen who has certified the citizen's 3333
intention to vote for president and vice-president as provided 3334
by Chapter 3504. of the Revised Code shall be eligible to 3335
receive only the ballot containing presidential and vice- 3336
presidential candidates. 3337
However, not later than the thirtieth day before the day 3338
of an election and in accordance with section 3503.24 of the 3339

S. B. No. 153 Page 116
As Introduced
Revised Code, any person qualified to vote may challenge the 3340
right of any other person to be registered as a voter, or the 3341
right to cast an absent voter's ballot, or to make application 3342
for such ballot. Such challenge shall be made in accordance with 3343
section 3503.24 of the Revised Code, and the board of elections 3344
of the county in which the voting residence of the challenged 3345
voter is situated shall make a final determination relative to 3346
the legality of such registration or application. 3347
Sec. 3509.02. (A) Any qualified elector may vote by cast 3348
absent voter's ballots by mail at an election, unless the 3349
elector is required to cast a provisional ballot under section 3350
3505.181 of the Revised Code. 3351
(B) Any qualified elector who is required to cast a 3352
provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code 3353
may cast a provisional ballot in person at the office of the 3354
board of elections during the time for in-person absent voting 3355
under section 3509.051 of the Revised Code. 3356
(C) Any qualified elector who is unable to appear at the 3357
office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) 3358
of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated 3359
another location in the county at which registered electors may 3360
vote, at that other location on account of personal illness, 3361
physical disability, or infirmity, and who moves from one 3362
precinct to another within a county, changes the elector's name 3363
and moves from one precinct to another within a county, or moves 3364
from one county to another county within the state, on or prior 3365
to the day of a general, primary, or special election and has 3366
not filed a notice of change of residence or change of name who 3367
is located in the county in which the elector resides and would 3368
be eligible to cast absent voter's ballots with the assistance 3369

S. B. No. 153 Page 117
As Introduced
of two election officials under section 3509.08 of the Revised 3370
Code, but is required to cast a provisional ballot under section 3371
3505.181 of the Revised Code, may vote by absent voter's ballots 3372
in that election cast a provisional ballot as specified in 3373
division (G) (E) of section 3503.16 3509.08 of the Revised Code. 3374
Sec. 3509.03. (A) Except as otherwise provided in sections 3375
3509.051, 3511.02, and 3511.021 of the Revised Code, any 3376
qualified elector desiring to vote absent voter's ballots at an 3377
election shall deliver a written application for those ballots, 3378
either in person or by mail, to the board of elections of the 3379
county in which the elector's voting residence is located. 3380
(B) Except as otherwise permitted under section 3511.02 of 3381
the Revised Code and under division (C) of this section, the 3382
application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of 3383
state and shall contain all of the following: 3384
(1) The elector's name; 3385
(2) The elector's signature; 3386
(3) The address at which the elector is registered to 3387
vote; 3388
(4) The elector's date of birth; 3389
(5) One of the following: 3390
(a) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state 3391
identification card number; 3392
(b) The or, if the elector does not have an Ohio driver's 3393
license or state identification card, the last four digits of 3394
the elector's social security number; 3395
(c) A or a copy of the elector's photo identification.; 3396

S. B. No. 153 Page 118
As Introduced
(6) A statement identifying the election for which absent 3397
voter's ballots are requested; 3398
(7) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is 3399
a qualified elector; 3400
(8) If the request is for primary election ballots, the 3401
elector's party affiliation; 3402
(9) If the elector desires ballots to be mailed to the 3403
elector, the address to which those ballots shall be mailed. 3404
(C) If the elector has a confidential voter registration 3405
record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the 3406
elector may provide the elector's program participant 3407
identification number instead of the address at which the 3408
elector is registered to vote. 3409
(D) Except as otherwise provided in division (A) of 3410
section 3509.051 and in division (B) of section 3509.08 of the 3411
Revised Code, an application to receive absent voter's ballots 3412
shall be delivered to the office of the board not earlier than 3413
the first day of January of the year of the elections for which 3414
the absent voter's ballots are requested or not earlier than 3415
ninety days before the day of the election at which the ballots 3416
are to be voted, whichever is earlier, and not later than the 3417
close of business on the seventh day before the day of the 3418
election at which the ballots are to be voted. 3419
(E) Except as permitted under section 111.31 of the 3420
Revised Code, no public office, and no public official or 3421
employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall do either 3422
of the following: 3423
(1) Prepay the return postage for an application for 3424
absent voter's ballots; 3425

S. B. No. 153 Page 119
As Introduced
(2) Mail or otherwise deliver an unsolicited application 3426
for absent voter's ballots to any person. 3427
(F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(2) of 3428
this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised 3429
Code, no person shall preprint or fill out any portion of an 3430
application for absent voter's ballots on behalf of an 3431
applicant. 3432
(2) The secretary of state or a board of elections may 3433
preprint only an applicant's name and address on an application 3434
for absent voter's ballots before mailing that application to 3435
the applicant, except that if the applicant has a confidential 3436
voter registration record, the secretary of state or a board of 3437
elections shall not preprint the applicant's address on the 3438
application. 3439
(3) A completed application for absent voter's ballots is 3440
not valid if any portion of it has been completed by any person 3441
other than the applicant in violation of division (F) of this 3442
section. 3443
Sec. 3509.04. (A) If a board of elections receives an 3444
application for absent voter's ballots that does not contain all 3445
of the required information or is not submitted on an 3446
appropriate form, the board promptly shall notify the applicant 3447
of the additional information required to be provided by the 3448
applicant to complete that application, direct the applicant to 3449
use an appropriate form, or both, as applicable. 3450
(B) Upon receipt by the board of elections of an 3451
application for absent voter's ballots that contains all of the 3452
required information and is submitted on an appropriate form, as 3453
provided by section 3509.03 and division (G) of section 3503.16 3454

S. B. No. 153 Page 120
As Introduced
of the Revised Code, the board, if the board finds that the 3455
applicant is a qualified elector, shall deliver to the applicant 3456
in person or mail directly to the applicant by special delivery 3457
mail, air mail, or regular mail, postage prepaid, proper absent 3458
voter's ballots. The board shall deliver or mail with the 3459
ballots an unsealed identification envelope upon the face of 3460
which shall be printed a form substantially as follows: 3461
"Identification Envelope Statement of Voter 3462
I, ________________________(Name of voter), declare under 3463
penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or 3464
ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received 3465
them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed 3466
in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. 3467
My voting residence in Ohio is 3468
________________________________________________________________ 3469
(Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) 3470
of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) 3471
Ohio, which is in Ward _____________ Precinct ________________ 3472
in that city, village, or township. 3473
If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am 3474
providing my program participant identification number instead 3475
of my residence address: ________________________ 3476
The primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope 3477
are primary election ballots of the _____________ Party. 3478
Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at 3479
the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be 3480
held on the __________________________ day of 3481
______________________, ____. 3482

S. B. No. 153 Page 121
As Introduced
My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), 3483
__________ (Year). 3484
(Voter must provide one of the following:) 3485
My Ohio driver's license or state identification card 3486
number is _______________ (Driver's license or state 3487
identification card number). 3488
(If the voter does not have an Ohio driver's license or 3489
state identification card, the voter must provide one of the 3490
following:) 3491
The last four digits of my Social Security Number are 3492
_______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). 3493
______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state 3494
identification card number or the last four digits of my Social 3495
Security Number, I am enclosing a copy of my photo 3496
identification in the return envelope in which this 3497
identification envelope will be mailed. 3498
I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, 3499
that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. 3500
_________________________ 3501
(Signature of Voter) 3502
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF 3503
THE FIFTH DEGREE." 3504
(C)(1) The board shall mail with the ballots and the 3505
unsealed identification envelope an unsealed return envelope 3506
upon the face of which shall be printed the post-office address 3507
of the board. In the upper left corner on the face of the return 3508
envelope, several blank lines shall be printed upon which the 3509

S. B. No. 153 Page 122
As Introduced
voter may write the voter's name and return address. The return 3510
envelope shall be of such size that the identification envelope 3511
can be conveniently placed within it for returning the 3512
identification envelope to the board. 3513
(2) The board shall include on the return envelope a bar 3514
code associated with the intelligent mail bar code tracing 3515
service offered by the United States postal service, or a 3516
marking associated with a successor mail tracing service offered 3517
by the United States postal service, that permits the board to 3518
perform origin tracing on the return envelope to determine when 3519
the return envelope was submitted to the United States postal 3520
service for mailing. The board shall obtain any necessary 3521
equipment or software needed to perform origin tracing under 3522
division (E)(2) of section 3509.05 of the Revised Code. 3523
(D) No public office, and no public official or employee 3524
who is acting in an official capacity, shall prepay the return 3525
postage for any absent voter's ballots. 3526
(E) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in 3527
sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election 3528
official shall not fill out any portion of an identification 3529
envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on 3530
behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an 3531
elector's name and address on an identification envelope 3532
statement of voter before mailing absent voter's ballots to the 3533
elector, except that if the elector has a confidential voter 3534
registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the 3535
Revised Code, the board of elections shall not preprint the 3536
elector's address on the identification envelope statement of 3537
voter. 3538
Sec. 3509.05. (A) When an elector receives an absent 3539

S. B. No. 153 Page 123
As Introduced
voter's ballot pursuant to the elector's application or request, 3540
the elector shall, before placing any marks on the ballot, note 3541
whether there are any voting marks on it. If there are any 3542
voting marks, the ballot shall be returned immediately to the 3543
board of elections; otherwise, the elector shall cause the 3544
ballot to be marked, folded in a manner that the stub on it and 3545
the indorsements and facsimile signatures of the members of the 3546
board of elections on the back of it are visible, and placed and 3547
sealed within the identification envelope received from the 3548
board of elections for that purpose. Then, the elector shall 3549
cause the statement of voter on the outside of the 3550
identification envelope to be completed and signed, under 3551
penalty of election falsification. 3552
(B) The elector shall provide one of the following: 3553
(1) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state 3554
identification card number on the statement of voter on the 3555
identification envelope; 3556
(2) The last four digits of the elector's social security 3557
number on the statement of voter on the identification envelope; 3558
(3) A copy of the elector's photo identification in the 3559
return envelope with the identification envelope. 3560
(C)(1) The elector shall mail the identification envelope 3561
to the office of the board of elections in the return envelope, 3562
postage prepaid, or the elector or the elector's assistant may 3563
personally deliver it the identification envelope in the return 3564
envelope to the office of the board, or the spouse of the 3565
elector, the father, mother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, 3566
grandfather, grandmother, brother, or sister of the whole or 3567
half blood, or the son, daughter, adopting parent, adopted 3568

S. B. No. 153 Page 124
As Introduced
child, stepparent, stepchild, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece of 3569
the elector may deliver it to the office of the board in 3570
accordance with division (D) of this section. The return 3571
envelope shall be returned by no other person, in no other 3572
manner, and to no other location, except as otherwise provided 3573
in section 3509.08 of the Revised Code. 3574
(2) If the board maintains multiple offices in the county, 3575
as permitted under division (C) of section 3501.10 of the 3576
Revised Code, the board may designate any of its offices for the 3577
return of absent voter's ballots under this section, provided 3578
that the board shall designate only one office to which absent 3579
voter's ballots shall be returned under this section. 3580
(3)(a) The board of elections may place not more than one 3581
secure receptacle outside the office of the board, on the 3582
property on which the office of the board is located, for the 3583
purpose of receiving absent voter's ballots under this section. 3584
(b) A secure receptacle shall be open to receive ballots 3585
only during the period beginning on the first day after the 3586
close of voter registration before the election and ending at 3587
seven-thirty p.m. on the day of the election. The receptacle 3588
shall be open to receive ballots at all times during that 3589
period. 3590
(c) A secure receptacle shall be monitored by recorded 3591
video surveillance at all times. The video recordings are a 3592
public record. The board shall do one of the following: 3593
(i) Make the video recordings available for inspection 3594
upon request in accordance with section 149.43 of the Revised 3595
Code. 3596
(ii) Make each day's video recording available to the 3597

S. B. No. 153 Page 125
As Introduced
public on the internet for streaming or download without charge 3598
within seventy-two hours after the recording ends and make the 3599
video recordings available to the public upon request in 3600
accordance with section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 3601
(d) Only a bipartisan team of election officials may open 3602
a secure receptacle or handle its contents. A bipartisan team of 3603
election officials shall collect the contents of each secure 3604
receptacle and deliver them to the board for processing at least 3605
once each day and at seven-thirty p.m. on the day of the 3606
election. If, at seven-thirty p.m. on the day of the election, 3607
there are persons waiting in line to deposit absent voter's 3608
ballots in a receptacle, those persons shall be permitted to 3609
deposit the ballots. 3610
(4)(a) During the period beginning on the forty-fifth day 3611
before election day and ending on the day after election day, on 3612
each day the office of the board of elections is open for 3613
business, the board shall report to the secretary of state all 3614
of the following information concerning the previous business 3615
day: 3616
(i) The number of return envelopes purporting to contain 3617
absent voter's ballots or uniformed services or overseas absent 3618
voter's ballots the board received by personal delivery, other 3619
than to a receptacle described in division (C)(3) of this 3620
section; 3621
(ii) If the board has placed a secure receptacle outside 3622
the office of the board under division (C)(3) of this section, 3623
the number of return envelopes purporting to contain absent 3624
voter's ballots or uniformed services or overseas absent voter's 3625
ballots the board received in the receptacle. 3626

S. B. No. 153 Page 126
As Introduced
(b) As soon as practicable after receiving a report under 3627
division (C)(4)(a) of this section, the secretary of state shall 3628
make the information in the report available to the public on 3629
the secretary of state's official web site. 3630
(D)(1) An elector may personally deliver the elector's 3631
marked absent voter's ballots to the office of the board by 3632
hand-delivering the ballots to the election officials at the 3633
office of the board or at a designated location on, or adjacent 3634
to, the property on which the office of the board is located. 3635
(2) An elector's assistant may personally deliver the 3636
elector's marked absent voter's ballots to the office of the 3637
board by hand-delivering the ballots to the election officials 3638
at the office of the board or at a designated location on, or 3639
adjacent to, the property on which the office of the board is 3640
located. Except as otherwise permitted under division (D)(3) of 3641
this section, the assistant shall be the elector's spouse, 3642
father, mother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, grandfather, 3643
grandmother, brother or sister of the whole or half blood, son, 3644
daughter, adopting parent, adopted child, stepparent, stepchild, 3645
uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece. The assistant shall complete a 3646
delivery attestation, which the election officials shall attach 3647
to the ballot return envelope. The attestation shall be made 3648
under penalty of election falsification, on a form prescribed by 3649
the secretary of state, and shall include all of the following: 3650
(a) The assistant's name; 3651
(b) The elector's name; 3652
(c) An affirmation that the assistant is delivering the 3653
elector's ballots at the elector's request; 3654
(d) An affirmation that the assistant is the elector's 3655

S. B. No. 153 Page 127
As Introduced
spouse, father, mother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, 3656
grandfather, grandmother, brother or sister of the whole or half 3657
blood, son, daughter, adopting parent, adopted child, 3658
stepparent, stepchild, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece; 3659
(e) The assistant's signature; 3660
(f) The date the assistant delivers the ballots. 3661
(3) If an elector requires assistance to vote by reason of 3662
a disability, the elector's assistant instead may be any person 3663
of the elector's choice, other than the elector's employer, an 3664
agent of the elector's employer, or an officer or agent of the 3665
elector's union. If an elector's assistant described in this 3666
division delivers the elector's ballots, the assistant shall 3667
complete a delivery attestation under this division instead of 3668
division (D)(2) of this section, and the election officials 3669
shall attach the attestation to the ballot return envelope. The 3670
attestation shall be made under penalty of election 3671
falsification, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, 3672
and shall include all of the following: 3673
(a) The assistant's name; 3674
(b) The elector's name; 3675
(c) An affirmation that the assistant is delivering the 3676
elector's ballots at the elector's request; 3677
(d) An affirmation that the elector requires assistance to 3678
vote by reason of a disability; 3679
(e) An affirmation that the assistant is not the elector's 3680
employer, an agent of the elector's employer, or an officer or 3681
agent of the elector's union; 3682
(f) The assistant's signature; 3683

S. B. No. 153 Page 128
As Introduced
(g) The date the assistant delivers the ballots. 3684
(4) The election officials shall not accept any marked 3685
absent voter's ballots that are returned to the board by 3686
personal delivery, except as permitted under divisions (D)(1) to 3687
(3) of this section. The board shall not accept absent voter's 3688
ballots returned by personal delivery to an unattended 3689
receptacle. 3690
(E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) (E) 3691
(2) of this section, all envelopes containing marked absent 3692
voter's ballots shall be delivered to the office of the board 3693
not later than the close of the polls on the day of an election. 3694
Absent voter's ballots delivered to the office of the board 3695
later than the times specified shall not be counted, but shall 3696
be kept by the board in the sealed identification envelopes in 3697
which they are delivered, until the time provided by section 3698
3505.31 of the Revised Code for the destruction of all other 3699
ballots used at the election for which ballots were provided, at 3700
which time they shall be destroyed. 3701
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2)(b) 3702
of this section, any return envelope that is postmarked prior to 3703
the day of the election shall be delivered to the director prior 3704
to the fifth day after the election. (2) Ballots delivered in 3705
envelopes postmarked prior to the day of the election that are 3706
received at the office of the board by mail after the close of 3707
the polls on election day through the fourth day thereafter 3708
shall be counted on the fifth day at the board of elections in 3709
the manner provided in divisions (C) and (D) of section 3509.06 3710
of the Revised Code or in the manner provided in division (E) of 3711
that section, as applicable, if either of the following apply: 3712
(a) The return envelope is postmarked prior to the day of 3713

S. B. No. 153 Page 129
As Introduced
the election. This division does not apply to a return envelope 3714
that is postmarked using a postage evidencing system, including 3715
a postage meter, as defined in 39 C.F.R. 501.1. 3716
(b) Origin tracing information obtained from the United 3717
States postal service, as described in division (C)(2) of 3718
section 3509.04 of the Revised Code, indicates that the return 3719
envelope was submitted to the United States postal service for 3720
mailing prior to the day of the election. The board shall 3721
attempt to obtain origin tracing information regarding each 3722
return envelope received by mail during the period described in 3723
division (E)(2) of this section that has no legible postmark, is 3724
postmarked on or after the day of the election, or is postmarked 3725
using a postage evidencing system. Any such 3726
(3) The following ballots that are received by the 3727
director later than the fourth day following the election shall 3728
not be counted, but shall be kept by the board in the sealed 3729
identification envelopes as provided in division (A) of this 3730
section. 3731
(b) Division (D)(2)(a) of this section shall not apply to 3732
any mail that is postmarked using a postage evidencing system, 3733
including a postage meter, as defined in 39 C.F.R. 501.1. in 3734
which they are delivered, until the time provided by section 3735
3505.31 of the Revised Code for the destruction of all other 3736
ballots used at the election for which ballots were provided, at 3737
which time they shall be destroyed: 3738
(a) Absent voter's ballots delivered to the office of the 3739
board after the close of the polls on election day other than by 3740
mail; 3741
(b) Absent voter's ballots delivered to the office of the 3742

S. B. No. 153 Page 130
As Introduced
board by mail after the close of the polls on election day, but 3743
by the fourth day after election day, that are ineligible to be 3744
counted under division (E)(2) of this section; 3745
(c) Absent voter's ballots delivered to the office of the 3746
board by mail later than the fourth day after election day. 3747
Sec. 3509.051. An elector may appear at the office of the 3748
board of elections to cast absent voter's ballots in person 3749
instead of applying for those ballots under section 3509.03 of 3750
the Revised Code. Notwithstanding section 3509.05 or any other 3751
provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, all of the 3752
following shall apply to the casting of absent voter's ballots 3753
in person: 3754
(A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of 3755
this section, in-person absent voting shall be permitted only 3756
during the period beginning on the first day after the close of 3757
voter registration before the election and ending at five p.m. 3758
on the Sunday before the day of the election. 3759
(2) If, at the time for the close of in-person absent 3760
voting on a particular day, there are voters waiting in line to 3761
cast their ballots, the in-person absent voting location shall 3762
be kept open until such waiting voters have cast their absent 3763
voter's ballots. 3764
(B) An in-person absent voter shall provide photo 3765
identification to the election officials, sign a poll list or 3766
signature pollbook, and cast a ballot in the same manner as a 3767
voter who casts a ballot in person on the day of an election 3768
under section 3505.18 of the Revised Code. 3769
The absent voter shall not be required to complete a 3770
written application for absent voter's ballots or a statement of 3771

S. B. No. 153 Page 131
As Introduced
voter on an absent voter's ballot identification envelope. 3772
(C) No person other than an election official shall be 3773
permitted to challenge the right to vote of an absent voter who 3774
is casting a ballot in person. An election official may 3775
challenge the right to vote of an absent voter who is casting a 3776
ballot in person in the same manner as a precinct election 3777
official may challenge the right to vote of an elector on the 3778
day of an election under section 3505.20 or 3513.19 of the 3779
Revised Code. 3780
(D) An individual who appears to cast absent voter's 3781
ballots in person and is eligible to cast a provisional ballot 3782
under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code shall be permitted to 3783
do so as though the individual had appeared at a polling place 3784
on the day of the election. 3785
(E) No absent voter may receive a replacement ballot after 3786
the voter's absent voter's ballot has been scanned or entered 3787
into automatic tabulating equipment. 3788
(F) Ballots cast under this section, other than 3789
provisional ballots, may be recorded by a voting machine or 3790
scanned by automatic tabulating equipment before the close of 3791
the polls on the day of the election, but the board of elections 3792
shall not tabulate or count the votes on those ballots before 3793
that time. Special election officials, employees or members of 3794
the board of elections, or observers shall not disclose the 3795
count or any portion of the count of absent voter's ballots 3796
prior to the time of the closing of the polling places. No 3797
person shall recklessly disclose the count or any portion of the 3798
count of absent voter's ballots in such a manner as to 3799
jeopardize the secrecy of any individual ballot. 3800

S. B. No. 153 Page 132
As Introduced
Sec. 3509.06. (A) The board of elections shall determine 3801
whether absent voter's ballots cast under section 3503.16, 3802
3509.05, 3509.08, or 3511.09 of the Revised Code shall be 3803
processed and counted in each precinct, at the office of the 3804
board, or at some other location designated by the board, and 3805
shall proceed accordingly under division (B), (C), or (E) of 3806
this section, as applicable. This section does not apply to 3807
absent voter's ballots cast in person under section 3509.051 or 3808
to provisional ballots cast under section 3509.051 or 3509.08 of 3809
the Revised Code. 3810
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of 3811
this section, when the board of elections determines that those 3812
absent voter's ballots shall be processed and counted in each 3813
precinct, the board shall deliver to the voting location manager 3814
of each precinct on election day identification envelopes 3815
purporting to contain absent voter's ballots of electors whose 3816
voting residence appears from the statement of voter on the 3817
outside of each of those envelopes, to be located in that 3818
manager's precinct, and which were received by the board not 3819
later than the close of the polls on election day. The board 3820
shall deliver to the voting location manager a list containing 3821
the name and voting residence of each person whose voting 3822
residence is in such precinct to whom absent voter's ballots 3823
were mailed. 3824
(2) The board shall not deliver to the voting location 3825
manager identification envelopes cast by electors who provided a 3826
program participant identification number instead of a residence 3827
address on the identification envelope and shall not inform the 3828
voting location manager of the names and voting residences of 3829
persons who have confidential voter registration records. Those 3830
identification envelopes shall be examined and processed as 3831

S. B. No. 153 Page 133
As Introduced
described in division (E) of this section. 3832
(C) When the board of elections determines that those 3833
absent voter's ballots shall be processed and counted at the 3834
office of the board of elections or at another location 3835
designated by the board, special election officials shall be 3836
appointed by the board for that purpose having the same 3837
authority as is exercised by precinct election officials. The 3838
votes so cast shall be added to the vote totals by the board, 3839
and the absent voter's ballots shall be preserved separately by 3840
the board, in the same manner and for the same length of time as 3841
provided by section 3505.31 of the Revised Code. 3842
(D) Each of the identification envelopes purporting to 3843
contain absent voter's ballots delivered to the voting location 3844
manager of the precinct or the special election official 3845
appointed by the board of elections shall be handled as follows: 3846
(1) The election officials shall compare the signature of 3847
the elector on the outside of the identification envelope with 3848
the signature of that elector on the elector's registration form 3849
and verify that the absent voter's ballot is eligible to be 3850
counted under section 3509.07 of the Revised Code. 3851
(2)(a) Any of the precinct officials may challenge the 3852
right of the elector named on the identification envelope to 3853
vote the absent voter's ballots upon the ground that the 3854
signature on the envelope is not the same as the signature on 3855
the registration form, that the identification envelope 3856
statement of voter is incomplete, or upon any other of the 3857
grounds upon which the right of persons to vote may be lawfully 3858
challenged. 3859
(b) If the elector's name does not appear in the pollbook 3860

S. B. No. 153 Page 134
As Introduced
or poll list or signature pollbook, the precinct officials shall 3861
deliver the absent voter's ballots to the director of the board 3862
of elections to be examined and processed in the manner 3863
described in division (E) of this section. 3864
(3)(a) An identification envelope statement of voter shall 3865
be considered incomplete if it does not include all of the 3866
following: 3867
(i) The voter's name; 3868
(ii) The voter's residence address or, if the voter has a 3869
confidential voter registration record, as described in section 3870
111.44 of the Revised Code, the voter's program participant 3871
identification number; 3872
(iii) The voter's date of birth. The requirements of this 3873
division are satisfied if the voter provided a date of birth and 3874
any of the following is true: 3875
(I) The month and day of the voter's date of birth on the 3876
identification envelope statement of voter are not different 3877
from the month and day of the voter's date of birth contained in 3878
the statewide voter registration database. 3879
(II) The voter's date of birth contained in the statewide 3880
voter registration database is January 1, 1800. 3881
(III) The board of elections has found, by a vote of at 3882
least three of its members, that the voter has met the 3883
requirements of divisions (D)(3)(a)(i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of 3884
this section. 3885
(iv) The voter's signature; and 3886
(v) One of the following forms of identification: 3887

S. B. No. 153 Page 135
As Introduced
(I) The voter's Ohio driver's license or state 3888
identification card number; 3889
(II) The last four digits of the voter's social security 3890
number; or 3891
(III) A copy of the voter's photo identification. 3892
(b) If the election officials find that the identification 3893
envelope statement of voter is incomplete or that the 3894
information contained in that statement does not conform to the 3895
information contained in the statewide voter registration 3896
database concerning the voter, the election officials shall mail 3897
a written notice to the voter, informing the voter of the nature 3898
of the defect. The notice shall inform the voter that in order 3899
for the voter's ballot to be counted, the voter must provide the 3900
necessary information to the board of elections in writing and 3901
on a form prescribed by the secretary of state not later than 3902
the fourth day after the day of the election. The voter may 3903
deliver the form to the office of the board in person or by 3904
mail. If the voter provides the necessary information to the 3905
board of elections not later than the fourth day after the day 3906
of the election and the ballot is not successfully challenged on 3907
another basis, the voter's ballot shall be processed and counted 3908
in accordance with this section. 3909
(4) If no such challenge is made, or if such a challenge 3910
is made and not sustained, the voting location manager shall 3911
open the envelope without defacing the statement of voter and 3912
without mutilating the ballots in it, and shall remove the 3913
ballots contained in it and proceed to count them. 3914
(5)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(5)(b) 3915
of this section, the name of each person voting who is entitled 3916

S. B. No. 153 Page 136
As Introduced
to vote only an absent voter's presidential ballot shall be 3917
entered in a pollbook or poll list or signature pollbook 3918
followed by the words "Absentee Presidential Ballot." The name 3919
of each person voting an absent voter's ballot, other than such 3920
persons entitled to vote only a presidential ballot, shall be 3921
entered in the pollbook or poll list or signature pollbook and 3922
the person's registration card marked to indicate that the 3923
person has voted. 3924
(b) If the person voting has a confidential voter 3925
registration record, the person's registration card shall be 3926
marked to indicate that the person has voted, but the person's 3927
name shall not be entered in the pollbook or poll list or 3928
signature pollbook. 3929
(6) The date of such election shall also be entered on the 3930
elector's registration form. If any such challenge is made and 3931
sustained, the identification envelope of such elector shall not 3932
be opened, shall be endorsed "Not Counted" with the reasons the 3933
ballots were not counted, and shall be delivered to the board. 3934
(E)(1) When the board of elections receives absent voter's 3935
ballots from an elector who has provided a program participant 3936
identification number instead of a residence address on the 3937
identification envelope statement of voter, the director and the 3938
deputy director personally shall examine and process the 3939
identification envelope statement of voter in the manner 3940
prescribed in division (D) of this section. 3941
(2) If the director and the deputy director find that the 3942
identification envelope statement of voter is incomplete or that 3943
the information contained in that statement does not conform to 3944
the information contained in the statewide voter registration 3945
database concerning the voter or to the information contained in 3946

S. B. No. 153 Page 137
As Introduced
the voter's confidential voter registration record, the director 3947
and the deputy director shall mail a written notice to the voter 3948
informing the voter of the nature of the defect. The notice 3949
shall inform the voter that in order for the voter's ballot to 3950
be counted the voter must provide the necessary information to 3951
the board of elections in writing and on a form prescribed by 3952
the secretary of state not later than the fourth day after the 3953
day of the election. The voter may deliver the form to the 3954
office of the board in person or by mail. If the voter provides 3955
the necessary information to the board of elections not later 3956
than the fourth day after the day of the election and the ballot 3957
is not successfully challenged on another basis, the voter's 3958
ballot shall be counted in accordance with this section. 3959
(3) The director or the deputy director may challenge the 3960
ballot on the ground that the signature on the envelope is not 3961
the same as the signature on the registration form, that the 3962
identification envelope statement of voter is incomplete, or 3963
upon any other of the grounds upon which the right of persons to 3964
vote may be lawfully challenged. If such a challenge is made, 3965
the board of elections shall decide whether to sustain the 3966
challenge. 3967
(4) If neither the director nor the deputy director 3968
challenges the ballot, or if such a challenge is made and not 3969
sustained, the director and the deputy director shall open the 3970
envelope without defacing the statement of voter and without 3971
mutilating the ballots in it, shall remove the ballots contained 3972
in it, and shall transmit the ballots to the election officials 3973
to be counted with other absent voter's ballots from that 3974
precinct. 3975
(F) The board of elections shall process absent voter's 3976

S. B. No. 153 Page 138
As Introduced
ballots before the time for counting those ballots, but the 3977
board shall not tabulate or count the votes on those ballots 3978
before that time. As used in this section and section 3511.11 of 3979
the Revised Code, processing an absent voter's ballot means all 3980
of the following: 3981
(1) Examining the identification envelope statement of 3982
voter in order to verify that the absent voter's ballot is 3983
eligible to be counted under section 3509.07 of the Revised 3984
Code; 3985
(2) Opening the identification envelope, if the absent 3986
voter's ballot is eligible to be counted; 3987
(3) Determining the validity of the absent voter's ballot 3988
under section 3509.07 of the Revised Code; 3989
(4) Preparing and sorting the absent voter's ballot for 3990
scanning by automatic tabulating equipment; 3991
(5) Scanning the absent voter's ballot by automatic 3992
tabulating equipment, if the equipment used by the board of 3993
elections permits an absent voter's ballot to be scanned without 3994
tabulating or counting the votes on the ballots scanned. 3995
(G) Special election officials, employees or members of 3996
the board of elections, or observers shall not disclose the 3997
count or any portion of the count of absent voter's ballots 3998
prior to the time of the closing of the polling places. No 3999
person shall recklessly disclose the count or any portion of the 4000
count of absent voter's ballots in such a manner as to 4001
jeopardize the secrecy of any individual ballot. 4002
(H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2) of 4003
this section, observers may be appointed under section 3505.21 4004
of the Revised Code to witness the examination and opening of 4005

S. B. No. 153 Page 139
As Introduced
identification envelopes and the processing and counting of 4006
absent voters' ballots under this section. 4007
(2) Observers shall not be permitted to witness the 4008
examination and opening of identification envelopes returned by, 4009
and the processing and counting of absent voter's ballots cast 4010
by, electors who have confidential voter registration records in 4011
a manner that would permit the observers to learn the identities 4012
or residence addresses of those electors. 4013
Sec. 3509.07. (A) If election officials find that any of 4014
the following are true concerning an absent voter's ballot or 4015
absent voter's presidential ballot cast under section 3503.16, 4016
3509.05, 3509.08, or 3511.09 of the Revised Code and, if 4017
applicable, the person did not provide any required additional 4018
information to the board of elections not later than the fourth 4019
day after the day of the election, as permitted under division 4020
(D)(3)(b) or (E)(2) of section 3509.06 of the Revised Code, the 4021
ballot shall not be accepted or counted: 4022
(A) (1) The statement accompanying the ballot is 4023
incomplete as described in division (D)(3)(a) of section 3509.06 4024
of the Revised Code or is insufficient; 4025
(B) (2) The signatures do not correspond with the person's 4026
registration signature; 4027
(C) (3) The applicant is not a qualified elector in the 4028
precinct; 4029
(D) (4) The ballot envelope contains more than one ballot 4030
of any one kind, or any voted ballot that the elector is not 4031
entitled to vote; 4032
(E) (5) Stub A is detached from the absent voter's ballot 4033
or absent voter's presidential ballot; or 4034

S. B. No. 153 Page 140
As Introduced
(F) (6) The elector has not included with the elector's 4035
ballot any identification required under section 3509.05 or 4036
3511.09 of the Revised Code. 4037
(B) The vote of any absent voter may be challenged for 4038
cause in the same manner as other votes are challenged, and the 4039
election officials shall determine the legality of that ballot. 4040
Every ballot not counted shall be endorsed on its back "Not 4041
Counted" with the reasons the ballot was not counted, and shall 4042
be enclosed and returned to or retained by the board of 4043
elections along with the contested ballots. 4044
(C) This section does not apply to either of the 4045
following: 4046
(1) Absent voter's ballots cast in person under section 4047
3509.051 of the Revised Code. Any challenge to the right of an 4048
elector to cast absent voter's ballots in person shall be 4049
brought under division (C) of that section. 4050
(2) Provisional ballots cast under section 3509.051, 4051
3509.08, or 3511.052 of the Revised Code, which shall be 4052
processed and counted under section 3505.183 of the Revised 4053
Code. 4054
Sec. 3509.08. (A) Any qualified elector, who, on account 4055
of the elector's own personal illness, physical disability, or 4056
infirmity, or on account of the elector's confinement in a jail 4057
or workhouse under sentence for a misdemeanor or awaiting trial 4058
on a felony or misdemeanor, will be unable to travel from the 4059
elector's home or place of confinement to the voting booth in 4060
the elector's precinct on the day of any general, special, or 4061
primary election may make application in writing for an absent 4062
voter's ballot to the board of elections of the elector's county 4063

S. B. No. 153 Page 141
As Introduced
in the manner described in section 3509.03 of the Revised Code. 4064
The application shall state the nature of the elector's illness, 4065
physical disability, or infirmity, or the fact that the elector 4066
is confined in a jail or workhouse and the elector's resultant 4067
inability to travel to the election booth in the elector's 4068
precinct on election day. 4069
The absent voter's ballot may be mailed directly to the 4070
applicant at the applicant's voting residence or place of 4071
confinement as stated in the applicant's application, or the 4072
board may designate two board employees belonging to the two 4073
major political parties for the purpose of delivering the ballot 4074
to the disabled or confined elector and returning it to the 4075
board, unless the applicant is confined to a public or private 4076
institution within the county, in which case the board shall 4077
designate two board employees belonging to the two major 4078
political parties for the purpose of delivering the ballot to 4079
the disabled or confined elector and returning it to the board. 4080
In all other instances, the ballot shall be returned to the 4081
office of the board in the manner prescribed in section 3509.05 4082
of the Revised Code. 4083
Any disabled or confined elector who declares to the two 4084
board employees belonging to the two major political parties 4085
that the elector is unable to mark the elector's ballot by 4086
reason of physical infirmity that is apparent to the employees 4087
to be sufficient to incapacitate the voter from marking the 4088
elector's ballot properly, may receive, upon request, the 4089
assistance of the employees in marking the elector's ballot, and 4090
they shall thereafter give no information in regard to this 4091
matter. Such assistance shall not be rendered for any other 4092
cause. 4093

S. B. No. 153 Page 142
As Introduced
When two board employees belonging to the two major 4094
political parties deliver a ballot to a disabled or confined 4095
elector, each of the employees shall be present when the ballot 4096
is delivered, when assistance is given, and when the ballot is 4097
returned to the office of the board, and shall subscribe to the 4098
declaration on the identification envelope. 4099
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of 4100
application for absent voter's ballots under this division. 4101
This chapter applies to disabled and confined absent 4102
voter's ballots except as otherwise provided in this section. 4103
(B)(1) Any qualified elector who is unable to travel to 4104
the voting booth in the elector's precinct on the day of any 4105
general, special, or primary election may apply to the board of 4106
elections of the county where the elector is a qualified elector 4107
to vote in the election by absent voter's ballot if either of 4108
the following apply: 4109
(a) The elector is confined in a hospital as a result of 4110
an accident or unforeseeable medical emergency occurring before 4111
the election; 4112
(b) The elector's minor child is confined in a hospital as 4113
a result of an accident or unforeseeable medical emergency 4114
occurring before the election. 4115
(2)(2)(a) The application authorized under division (B)(1) 4116
of this section shall be made in writing in the manner described 4117
in section 3509.03 of the Revised Code, except that the 4118
application shall be delivered to the office of the board not 4119
later than three p.m. on the day of the election. The 4120
application shall indicate the hospital where the applicant or 4121
the applicant's child is confined, the date of the applicant's 4122

S. B. No. 153 Page 143
As Introduced
or the applicant's child's admission to the hospital, and the 4123
offices for which the applicant is qualified to vote. The 4124
(b) The applicant may also request that a member of the 4125
applicant's family, as listed an assistant described in division 4126
(D)(2) or (3) of section 3509.05 of the Revised Code, as 4127
applicable, deliver the absent voter's ballot to the applicant. 4128
(c) The board, after establishing to the board's 4129
satisfaction the validity of the circumstances claimed by the 4130
applicant, shall supply an absent voter's ballot to be delivered 4131
to the applicant. When 4132
(d) When the applicant or the applicant's child is in a 4133
hospital in the county where the applicant is a qualified 4134
elector and no request is made for a member of the family an 4135
assistant to deliver the ballot, the board shall arrange for the 4136
delivery of an absent voter's ballot to the applicant, and for 4137
its return to the office of the board, by two board employees 4138
belonging to the two major political parties according to the 4139
procedures prescribed in division (A) of this section. When the 4140
applicant or the applicant's child is in a hospital outside the 4141
county where the applicant is a qualified elector and no request 4142
is made for a member of the family an assistant to deliver the 4143
ballot, the board shall arrange for the delivery of an absent 4144
voter's ballot to the applicant by mail, and the ballot shall be 4145
returned to the office of the board in the manner prescribed in 4146
section 3509.05 of the Revised Code. 4147
(3) Any qualified elector who is eligible to vote under 4148
division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code but 4149
is unable to do so because of the circumstances described in 4150
division (B)(2) of this section may vote in accordance with 4151
division (B)(1) of this section if that qualified elector states 4152

S. B. No. 153 Page 144
As Introduced
in the application for absent voter's ballots that that 4153
qualified elector moved or had a change of name under the 4154
circumstances described in division (B) or (C) of section 4155
3503.16 of the Revised Code and if that qualified elector 4156
complies with divisions (G)(1) to (4) of section 3503.16 of the 4157
Revised Code. 4158
(C) Any Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of 4159
this section, any qualified elector described in division (A) or 4160
(B)(1) of this section who needs no assistance to vote or to 4161
return absent voter's ballots to the board of elections may 4162
apply for absent voter's ballots under section 3509.03 of the 4163
Revised Code instead of applying for them under this section or 4164
may cast absent voter's ballots in person under section 3509.051 4165
of the Revised Code. 4166
(D) Any qualified elector described in division (A) or (B) 4167
(1) of this section to whom ballots are delivered by two 4168
employees of the board of elections or who votes with the 4169
assistance of two employees of the board of elections shall be 4170
considered to have cast absent voter's ballots by mail, rather 4171
than in person, for the purpose of the laws governing voter 4172
identification. A board employee who delivers ballots to an 4173
elector or returns ballots to the office of the board under this 4174
section is not considered the elector's assistant for that 4175
purpose. 4176
(E) A qualified elector who is located in the county in 4177
which the elector resides and who would be eligible to cast 4178
absent voter's ballots with the assistance of two election 4179
officials under this section, but who is required to cast a 4180
provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code, 4181
may cast a provisional ballot with the assistance of two 4182

S. B. No. 153 Page 145
As Introduced
election officials under this section as though the individual 4183
had appeared at a polling place on the day of the election. 4184
Sec. 3509.09. (A) The poll list or signature pollbook for 4185
each precinct shall identify each registered elector in that 4186
precinct who has requested an absent voter's ballot for that 4187
election or cast absent voter's ballots in person under section 4188
3509.051 of the Revised Code, other than an elector who has a 4189
confidential voter registration record, as described in section 4190
111.44 of the Revised Code. 4191
(B) If a registered elector appears to vote and that 4192
elector has requested or cast an absent voter's ballot for that 4193
election, the elector shall be permitted to cast a provisional 4194
ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 4195
(C)(1) In counting absent voter's ballots under section 4196
3509.06 of the Revised Code, the board of elections shall 4197
compare the signature of each elector from whom the board has 4198
received a sealed identification envelope purporting to contain 4199
that elector's voted absent voter's ballots for that election to 4200
the signature on that elector's registration form. Except as 4201
otherwise provided in division (C)(3) of this section, if the 4202
board of elections determines that the absent voter's ballot in 4203
the sealed identification envelope is valid, it shall be 4204
counted. If the board of elections determines that the signature 4205
on the sealed identification envelope purporting to contain the 4206
elector's voted absent voter's ballot does not match the 4207
signature on the elector's registration form, the ballot shall 4208
be set aside and the board shall examine, during the time prior 4209
to the beginning of the official canvass, the poll list or 4210
signature pollbook from the precinct in which the elector is 4211
registered to vote to determine if the elector also cast a 4212

S. B. No. 153 Page 146
As Introduced
provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. 4213
(2) The board of elections shall count the provisional 4214
ballot, instead of the absent voter's ballot, if both of the 4215
following apply: 4216
(a) The board of elections determines that the signature 4217
of the elector on the outside of the identification envelope in 4218
which the absent voter's ballots are enclosed does not match the 4219
signature of the elector on the elector's registration form; 4220
(b) The elector cast a provisional ballot in the election. 4221
(3) If the board of elections does not receive the sealed 4222
identification envelope purporting to contain the elector's 4223
voted absent voter's ballot by the applicable deadline 4224
established under section 3509.05 of the Revised Code, the 4225
provisional ballot cast under section 3505.181 of the Revised 4226
Code shall be counted as valid, if that provisional ballot is 4227
otherwise determined to be valid pursuant to section 3505.183 of 4228
the Revised Code. 4229
(D) If the board of elections counts a provisional ballot 4230
under division (C)(2) or (3) of this section, the returned 4231
identification envelope of that elector shall not be opened, and 4232
the ballot within that envelope shall not be counted. The 4233
identification envelope shall be endorsed "Not Counted" with the 4234
reason the ballot was not counted. 4235
(E) Division (C) of this section does not apply to absent 4236
voter's ballots cast in person under section 3509.051 of the 4237
Revised Code. If an elector casts absent voter's ballots in 4238
person and casts a provisional ballot for the same election, the 4239
provisional ballot shall not be counted. 4240
Sec. 3511.02. (A) Notwithstanding any section of the 4241

S. B. No. 153 Page 147
As Introduced
Revised Code to the contrary, whenever any person applies for 4242
registration as a voter on a form adopted in accordance with 4243
federal regulations relating to the "Uniformed and Overseas 4244
Citizens Absentee Voting Act," 100 Stat. 924, 52 U.S.C.A. 20301, 4245
this application shall be sufficient for voter registration and 4246
as a request for an absent voter's ballot. Uniformed services or 4247
overseas absent voter's ballots may be obtained by any person 4248
meeting the requirements of section 3511.011 of the Revised Code 4249
by applying electronically to the secretary of state or to the 4250
board of elections of the county in which the person's voting 4251
residence is located in accordance with section 3511.021 of the 4252
Revised Code or by applying to the board of elections of the 4253
county in which the person's voting residence is located, in one 4254
of the following ways: 4255
(1) That person may make written application for those 4256
ballots. The person may personally deliver the application to 4257
the office of the board or may mail it, send it by facsimile 4258
machine, send it by electronic mail, send it through internet 4259
delivery if such delivery is offered by the board of elections 4260
or the secretary of state, or otherwise send it to the board. 4261
Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, 4262
the application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary 4263
of state and shall contain all of the following information: 4264
(a) The elector's name; 4265
(b) The elector's signature; 4266
(c) The address at which the elector is registered to 4267
vote; 4268
(d) The elector's date of birth; 4269
(e) One of the following: 4270

S. B. No. 153 Page 148
As Introduced
(i) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state 4271
identification card number; 4272
(ii) The or, if the elector does not have an Ohio driver's 4273
license or state identification card, the last four digits of 4274
the elector's social security number; 4275
(iii) A or a copy of the elector's photo identification.; 4276
(f) A statement identifying the election for which absent 4277
voter's ballots are requested; 4278
(g) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is 4279
a qualified elector; 4280
(h) A statement that the elector is an absent uniformed 4281
services voter or overseas voter as defined in 52 U.S.C. 20310; 4282
(i) A statement of the elector's length of residence in 4283
the state immediately preceding the commencement of service, 4284
immediately preceding the date of leaving to be with or near the 4285
service member, or immediately preceding leaving the United 4286
States, or a statement that the elector's parent or legal 4287
guardian resided in this state long enough to establish 4288
residency for voting purposes immediately preceding leaving the 4289
United States, whichever is applicable; 4290
(j) If the request is for primary election ballots, the 4291
elector's party affiliation; 4292
(k) If the elector desires ballots to be mailed to the 4293
elector, the address to which those ballots shall be mailed; 4294
(l) If the elector desires ballots to be sent to the 4295
elector by facsimile machine, the telephone number to which they 4296
shall be so sent; 4297

S. B. No. 153 Page 149
As Introduced
(m) If the elector desires ballots to be sent to the 4298
elector by electronic mail or, if offered by the board of 4299
elections or the secretary of state, through internet delivery, 4300
the elector's electronic mail address or other internet contact 4301
information. 4302
(2) A voter or any relative of a voter listed in division 4303
(A)(3) of this section may use a single federal post card 4304
application to apply for uniformed services or overseas absent 4305
voter's ballots for use at the primary and general elections in 4306
a given year and any special election to be held on the day in 4307
that year specified by division (E) of section 3501.01 of the 4308
Revised Code for the holding of a primary election, designated 4309
by the general assembly for the purpose of submitting 4310
constitutional amendments proposed by the general assembly to 4311
the voters of the state. A single federal postcard application 4312
shall be processed by the board of elections pursuant to section 4313
3511.04 of the Revised Code the same as if the voter had applied 4314
separately for uniformed services or overseas absent voter's 4315
ballots for each election. 4316
(3) Application to have uniformed services or overseas 4317
absent voter's ballots mailed or sent by facsimile machine to 4318
such a person may be made by the spouse, father, mother, father- 4319
in-law, mother-in-law, grandfather, grandmother, brother or 4320
sister of the whole blood or half blood, son, daughter, adopting 4321
parent, adopted child, stepparent, stepchild, daughter-in-law, 4322
son-in-law, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece of such a person. The 4323
application shall be in writing upon a blank form furnished only 4324
by the board or on a single federal post card as provided in 4325
division (A)(2) of this section. The form of the application 4326
shall be prescribed by the secretary of state. The board shall 4327
furnish that blank form to any of the relatives specified in 4328

S. B. No. 153 Page 150
As Introduced
this division desiring to make the application, only upon the 4329
request of such a relative made in person at the office of the 4330
board or upon the written request of such a relative mailed to 4331
the office of the board. Except as otherwise provided in 4332
division (B) of this section, the application, subscribed and 4333
sworn to by the applicant, shall contain all of the following: 4334
(a) The full name of the elector for whom ballots are 4335
requested; 4336
(b) A statement that the elector is an absent uniformed 4337
services voter or overseas voter as defined in 52 U.S.C. 20310; 4338
(c) The address at which the elector is registered to 4339
vote; 4340
(d) A statement identifying the elector's length of 4341
residence in the state immediately preceding the commencement of 4342
service, immediately preceding the date of leaving to be with or 4343
near a service member, or immediately preceding leaving the 4344
United States, or a statement that the elector's parent or legal 4345
guardian resided in this state long enough to establish 4346
residency for voting purposes immediately preceding leaving the 4347
United States, as the case may be; 4348
(e) The elector's date of birth; 4349
(f) One of the following: 4350
(i) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state 4351
identification card number; 4352
(ii) The or, if the elector does not have an Ohio driver's 4353
license or state identification card, the last four digits of 4354
the elector's social security number; 4355
(iii) A or a copy of the elector's photo identification.; 4356

S. B. No. 153 Page 151
As Introduced
(g) A statement identifying the election for which absent 4357
voter's ballots are requested; 4358
(h) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is 4359
a qualified elector; 4360
(i) If the request is for primary election ballots, the 4361
elector's party affiliation; 4362
(j) A statement that the applicant bears a relationship to 4363
the elector as specified in division (A)(3) of this section; 4364
(k) The address to which ballots shall be mailed, the 4365
telephone number to which ballots shall be sent by facsimile 4366
machine, the electronic mail address to which ballots shall be 4367
sent by electronic mail, or, if internet delivery is offered by 4368
the board of elections or the secretary of state, the internet 4369
contact information to which ballots shall be sent through 4370
internet delivery; 4371
(l) The signature and address of the person making the 4372
application. 4373
(B) If the elector has a confidential voter registration 4374
record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the 4375
application may include the elector's program participant 4376
identification number instead of the address at which the 4377
elector is registered to vote. 4378
(C) Each application for uniformed services or overseas 4379
absent voter's ballots shall be delivered to the office of the 4380
board not earlier than the first day of January of the year of 4381
the elections for which the uniformed services or overseas 4382
absent voter's ballots are requested or not earlier than ninety 4383
days before the day of the election at which the ballots are to 4384
be voted, whichever is earlier. An application to receive 4385

S. B. No. 153 Page 152
As Introduced
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots by mail or 4386
by another method permitted under section 3511.021 of the 4387
Revised Code shall be delivered to the office of the board not 4388
later than the close of business on the seventh day preceding 4389
the day of the election. 4390
(D) If the voter for whom the application is made is 4391
entitled to vote for presidential and vice-presidential electors 4392
only, the applicant shall submit to the board, in addition to 4393
the requirements of division (A) of this section, a statement to 4394
the effect that the voter is qualified to vote for presidential 4395
and vice-presidential electors and for no other offices. 4396
(E) Except as permitted under section 111.31 of the 4397
Revised Code, no public office, and no public official or 4398
employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall do either 4399
of the following: 4400
(1) Prepay the return postage for an application for 4401
absent voter's ballots; 4402
(2) Mail or otherwise deliver an unsolicited application 4403
for absent voter's ballots to any person. 4404
(F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (A)(2) 4405
and (3) and (F)(2) of this section and in sections 3505.24 and 4406
3509.08 of the Revised Code, no person shall fill out any 4407
portion of a federal post card application or other application 4408
for absent voter's ballots on behalf of an applicant. 4409
(2) The secretary of state or a board of elections may 4410
preprint only an applicant's name and address on a federal post 4411
card application or other application for absent voter's ballots 4412
before mailing that application to the applicant, except that if 4413
the applicant has a confidential voter registration record, the 4414

S. B. No. 153 Page 153
As Introduced
secretary of state or the board of elections shall not preprint 4415
the applicant's address on the application. 4416
(3) A completed application for absent voter's ballots is 4417
not valid if any portion of it has been completed by any person 4418
other than the applicant in violation of division (F) of this 4419
section. 4420
Sec. 3511.04. (A) If a board of elections receives an 4421
application for uniformed services or overseas absent voter's 4422
ballots that does not contain all of the required information or 4423
is not submitted on an appropriate form, the board promptly 4424
shall notify the applicant of the additional information 4425
required to be provided by the applicant to complete that 4426
application, direct the applicant to use an appropriate form, or 4427
both, as applicable. 4428
(B)(B)(1) Not later than the forty-sixth day before the 4429
day of each general or primary election, and at the earliest 4430
possible time before the day of a special election held on a day 4431
other than the day on which a general or primary election is 4432
held, the board of elections shall mail, send by facsimile 4433
machine, send by electronic mail, send through internet delivery 4434
if such delivery is offered by the board of elections or the 4435
secretary of state, or otherwise send uniformed services or 4436
overseas absent voter's ballots then ready for use as provided 4437
for in section 3511.03 of the Revised Code and for which the 4438
board has received valid applications prior to that time. 4439
Thereafter, and until the close of business on the seventh day 4440
preceding the day of election, the board shall promptly, upon 4441
receipt of valid applications for them, mail, send by facsimile 4442
machine, send by electronic mail, send through internet delivery 4443
if such delivery is offered by the board of elections or the 4444

S. B. No. 153 Page 154
As Introduced
secretary of state, or otherwise send to the proper persons all 4445
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots then ready 4446
for use. 4447
(2) If, after the seventieth day before the day of a 4448
general or primary election, any other question, issue, or 4449
candidacy is lawfully ordered submitted to the electors voting 4450
at the general or primary election, the board shall promptly 4451
provide a separate official issue, special election, or other 4452
election ballot for submitting the question, issue, or candidacy 4453
to those electors, and the board shall promptly mail, send by 4454
facsimile machine, send by electronic mail, send through 4455
internet delivery if such delivery is offered by the board of 4456
elections or the secretary of state, or otherwise send each such 4457
separate ballot to each person to whom the board has previously 4458
mailed or sent other uniformed services or overseas absent 4459
voter's ballots. 4460
(C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2) of 4461
this section, upon receiving a valid application for uniformed 4462
services or overseas absent voter's ballots from an elector who 4463
is required to cast a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 4464
of the Revised Code, the board instead shall deliver to the 4465
elector a provisional uniformed or overseas absent voter's 4466
ballot, as described in section 3511.052 of the Revised Code. In 4467
all other respects, the board shall proceed as described in 4468
division (B) of this section regarding the elector. 4469
(2) Division (C)(1) of this section does not apply to a 4470
uniformed services or overseas absent voter who submits a valid 4471
federal write-in absentee ballot in a general election for 4472
federal office as permitted under division (C) of section 4473
3511.14 of the Revised Code. 4474

S. B. No. 153 Page 155
As Introduced
(D) No public office, and no public official or employee 4475
who is acting in an official capacity, shall prepay the return 4476
postage for any absent voter's ballots. In mailing uniformed 4477
services or overseas absent voter's ballots, the board shall use 4478
the fastest mail service available, but the board shall not mail 4479
them by certified mail. 4480
Sec. 3511.05. (A) The board of elections shall place 4481
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots sent by 4482
mail in an unsealed identification envelope, gummed ready for 4483
sealing. The board shall include with uniformed services or 4484
overseas absent voter's ballots sent electronically, including 4485
by facsimile machine, an instruction sheet for preparing a 4486
gummed envelope in which the ballots shall be returned. The 4487
envelope for returning ballots sent by either means shall have 4488
printed or written on its face a form substantially as follows: 4489
"Identification Envelope Statement of Voter 4490
I, ________________________(Name of voter), declare under 4491
penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or 4492
ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received 4493
them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed 4494
in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. 4495
My voting residence in Ohio is 4496
________________________________________________________________ 4497
(Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) 4498
of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) 4499
Ohio, which is in Ward _______________ Precinct ________________ 4500
in that city, village, or township. 4501
If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am 4502

S. B. No. 153 Page 156
As Introduced
providing my program participant identification number instead 4503
of my residence address: ________________________ 4504
The primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope 4505
are primary election ballots of the _____________ Party. 4506
Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at 4507
the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be 4508
held on the __________________________ day of 4509
______________________, ____ 4510
My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), 4511
__________ (Year). 4512
(Voter must provide one of the following:) 4513
My Ohio driver's license or state identification card 4514
number is _______________ (Driver's license or state 4515
identification card number). 4516
(If the voter does not have an Ohio driver's license or 4517
state identification card, the voter must provide one of the 4518
following:) 4519
The last four digits of my Social Security Number are 4520
_______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). 4521
______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state 4522
identification card number or the last four digits of my Social 4523
Security Number, I am enclosing a copy of my photo 4524
identification in the return envelope in which this 4525
identification envelope will be mailed. 4526
I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, 4527
that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. 4528
________________________ 4529

S. B. No. 153 Page 157
As Introduced
(Signature of Voter) 4530
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF 4531
THE FIFTH DEGREE." 4532
(B) The board shall also mail with the ballots and the 4533
unsealed identification envelope sent by mail an unsealed return 4534
envelope, gummed, ready for sealing, for use by the voter in 4535
returning the voter's marked ballots to the office of the board. 4536
The board shall send with the ballots and the instruction sheet 4537
for preparing a gummed envelope sent electronically, including 4538
by facsimile machine, an instruction sheet for preparing a 4539
second gummed envelope as described in this division, for use by 4540
the voter in returning that voter's marked ballots to the board. 4541
The return envelope shall have two parallel lines, each one 4542
quarter of an inch in width, printed across its face paralleling 4543
the top, with an intervening space of one quarter of an inch 4544
between such lines. The top line shall be one and one-quarter 4545
inches from the top of the envelope. Between the parallel lines 4546
shall be printed: "OFFICIAL ELECTION UNIFORMED SERVICES OR 4547
OVERSEAS ABSENT VOTER'S BALLOTS -- VIA AIR MAIL." Three blank 4548
lines shall be printed in the upper left corner on the face of 4549
the envelope for the use by the voter in placing the voter's 4550
complete military, naval, or mailing address on these lines. The 4551
post-office address of the office of the board shall be printed 4552
on the face of such envelope in the lower right portion below 4553
the bottom parallel line. 4554
(C) On the back of each identification envelope and each 4555
return envelope shall be printed the following: 4556
"Instructions to voter: 4557
If the flap on this envelope is so firmly stuck to the 4558

S. B. No. 153 Page 158
As Introduced
back of the envelope when received by you as to require forcible 4559
opening in order to use it, open the envelope in the manner 4560
least injurious to it, and, after marking your ballots and 4561
enclosing same in the envelope for mailing them to the board of 4562
elections, reclose the envelope in the most practicable way, by 4563
sealing or otherwise, and sign the blank form printed below. 4564
The flap on this envelope was firmly stuck to the back of 4565
the envelope when received, and required forced opening before 4566
sealing and mailing. 4567
____________________ 4568
(Signature of voter)" 4569
(D) Division (C) of this section does not apply when 4570
absent voter's ballots are sent electronically, including by 4571
facsimile machine. 4572
(E) Except as otherwise provided in this division and in 4573
sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election 4574
official shall not fill out any portion of an identification 4575
envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on 4576
behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an 4577
elector's name and address on an identification envelope 4578
statement of voter before mailing or electronically transmitting 4579
absent voter's ballots to the elector, except that if the 4580
elector has a confidential voter registration record, as 4581
described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the board of 4582
elections shall not preprint the elector's address on the 4583
identification envelope statement of voter. 4584
Sec. 3511.052. (A) The identification envelope of a 4585
provisional uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot 4586
sent to an elector under division (C)(1) of section 3511.04 of 4587

S. B. No. 153 Page 159
As Introduced
the Revised Code shall have printed or written on its face a 4588
form substantially as follows: 4589
"Provisional Uniformed Services or Overseas Absent Voter's 4590
Ballot Affirmation 4591
(1) Clearly print your full name: ___________________ 4592
(2) Write your date of birth: _______________________ 4593
(3)(a) Write your current address: __________________ 4594
_____________________________________________________ 4595
(b) Have you moved without updating your voter 4596
registration?: 4597
Yes ______ No ______ 4598
If yes, write your former address: __________________ 4599
_____________________________________________________ 4600
Failure to provide your former address will not cause your 4601
provisional ballot to be rejected. 4602
(4) You must provide a copy of one of the following forms 4603
of photo identification that includes your name and photograph 4604
and is not expired. Place the copy in the return envelope along 4605
with this envelope. Do not place the copy inside the ballot 4606
envelope. 4607
(a) An Ohio driver's license or state identification card 4608
or an interim identification form issued by the Bureau of Motor 4609
Vehicles; 4610
(b) A United States passport or passport card; 4611
(c) A United States military identification card, Ohio 4612
national guard identification card, or United States department 4613

S. B. No. 153 Page 160
As Introduced
of veterans affairs identification card. 4614
(5) If you do not have photo identification because you 4615
have a religious objection to being photographed, complete the 4616
enclosed affidavit of religious objection and place it in the 4617
return envelope along with this ballot envelope. Do not place 4618
the affidavit inside the ballot envelope. 4619
(6) If you do not provide a copy of your photo 4620
identification or complete an affidavit of religious objection, 4621
you must provide a copy of your photo identification or a 4622
completed an affidavit of religious objection to the board of 4623
elections by the fourth day after the election for your ballot 4624
to be eligible to be counted. 4625
(7) Complete this section if you need to update your voter 4626
registration or if you need to verify the identification you 4627
used to register to vote. If you need to verify your 4628
identification and you do not provide the needed information on 4629
this form, you must provide the information to the board of 4630
elections by the fourth day after the election for your ballot 4631
to be eligible to be counted. 4632
Write your full Ohio driver's license or state 4633
identification card number: ________________________ 4634
Write the last four digits of your Social Security number: 4635
_______________ 4636
(8) If you are casting a provisional ballot because you 4637
need to provide proof of citizenship, either write your full 4638
Ohio driver's license or state identification card number above 4639
or provide proof of citizenship in the return envelope along 4640
with this envelope. Do not place your proof of citizenship 4641
inside the ballot envelope. If you do not provide proof of 4642

S. B. No. 153 Page 161
As Introduced
citizenship at this time, you must provide proof of citizenship 4643
to the board of elections by the fourth day after the election 4644
for your ballot to be eligible to be counted. 4645
"Proof of citizenship" means evidence that you are a 4646
United States citizen, in the form of one of the following: 4647
(a) The number of your current or expired Ohio driver's 4648
license or state identification card or a copy of the front and 4649
back of your current or expired Ohio driver's license, state 4650
identification card, or interim identification form, if you have 4651
submitted documentation to the bureau of motor vehicles 4652
indicating that you are a United States citizen; 4653
(b) A copy of the front and back of a current or expired 4654
driver's license or nondriver identification card issued by 4655
another state within the United States, if the issuing agency 4656
indicates on the license or card that you are a United States 4657
citizen; 4658
(c) A copy of a birth certificate, certification of report 4659
of birth, or consular report of birth abroad; 4660
(d) A copy of the identification page of a current or 4661
expired United States passport; 4662
(e) A copy of the front and back of a United States 4663
passport card; 4664
(f) A copy of a certificate of naturalization or 4665
certificate of citizenship. 4666
If the name on your proof of citizenship is different from 4667
your current legal name, you must also provide proof of your 4668
change of name, such as a copy of a marriage license or court 4669
order. 4670

S. B. No. 153 Page 162
As Introduced
(9) If your right to vote has been challenged, you must 4671
provide any additional required documents in the return envelope 4672
along with this envelope or provide them to the board of 4673
elections by the fourth day after the election. Do not place 4674
those documents inside the ballot envelope. 4675
(10) Sign and date the following statement: 4676
The within ballot or ballots contained no voting marks of 4677
any kind when I received them, and I caused the ballot or 4678
ballots to be marked, enclosed in this envelope, and sealed in 4679
this envelope. 4680
I solemnly swear or affirm that I am a citizen of the 4681
United States; that I will be at least 18 years of age at the 4682
time of the general election; that I have lived in this state 4683
for 30 days immediately preceding this election in which I am 4684
voting this ballot; that I am a registered voter in the precinct 4685
in which I am voting this provisional ballot; that I am eligible 4686
to vote in the election in which I am voting this provisional 4687
ballot; and that I will not vote or attempt to vote at any other 4688
location or in any other manner for this particular election. 4689
I understand that, if the information I provide on this 4690
provisional ballot affirmation is not fully completed and 4691
correct, if the board of elections determines that I am not 4692
registered to vote, a resident of this precinct, or eligible to 4693
vote in this election, or if the board of elections determines 4694
that I have already voted in this election, my provisional 4695
ballot will not be counted. I understand that, if I am not 4696
currently registered to vote or if I am not registered at my 4697
current address or under my current name, this form will serve 4698
as an application to register to vote or update my registration 4699
for future elections, as long as I provide all of the 4700

S. B. No. 153 Page 163
As Introduced
information required to register to vote or update my 4701
registration. I further understand that knowingly providing 4702
false information is a violation of law and subjects me to 4703
possible criminal prosecution. 4704
I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, 4705
that the above statements are true and correct to the best of my 4706
knowledge and belief. 4707
________________________ 4708
Signature of Voter 4709
________________________ 4710
Date 4711
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 4712
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 4713
(B) The board of elections shall include both of the 4714
following with the provisional uniformed services or overseas 4715
absent voter's ballot: 4716
(1) An explanation of the reason the voter is required to 4717
cast a provisional ballot and the information or documentation 4718
the voter must provide in order for the voter's ballot to be 4719
counted; 4720
(2) A blank copy of the affidavit of religious objection 4721
to being photographed described in section 3505.19 of the 4722
Revised Code. 4723
(C)(1) In addition to any information required to be 4724
included on the written affirmation, an individual casting a 4725
provisional uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot 4726
may provide additional information to the board of elections to 4727

S. B. No. 153 Page 164
As Introduced
assist the board in determining the individual's eligibility to 4728
vote in that election, including the date and location at which 4729
the individual registered to vote, if known. 4730
(2) If the individual provided all of the information 4731
required under section 3503.14 of the Revised Code to register 4732
to vote or to update the individual's registration on the 4733
provisional uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot 4734
affirmation, the board of elections shall consider the 4735
affirmation to also serve as a notice of change of name, change 4736
of residence, or both, or as a voter registration form, as 4737
applicable, for that individual only for the purposes of future 4738
elections. 4739
(D) Upon receiving a completed provisional uniformed 4740
services or overseas absent voter's ballot, the board of 4741
elections shall process the ballot in accordance with section 4742
3505.183 of the Revised Code in the same manner as other 4743
provisional ballots. 4744
(E) In all other respects, except as otherwise provided in 4745
this chapter, the provisions of this chapter that apply to a 4746
uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot apply in 4747
the same manner to a provisional uniformed services or overseas 4748
absent voter's ballot. 4749
Sec. 3511.09. (A) Upon receiving uniformed services or 4750
overseas absent voter's ballots, the elector shall cause the 4751
questions on the face of the identification envelope to be 4752
answered, and, by writing the elector's usual signature in the 4753
proper place on the identification envelope, the elector shall 4754
declare under penalty of election falsification that the answers 4755
to those questions are true and correct to the best of the 4756
elector's knowledge and belief. Then, the elector shall note 4757

S. B. No. 153 Page 165
As Introduced
whether there are any voting marks on the ballot. If there are 4758
any voting marks, the ballot shall be returned immediately to 4759
the board of elections; otherwise, the elector shall cause the 4760
ballot to be marked, folded separately so as to conceal the 4761
markings on it, deposited in the identification envelope, and 4762
securely sealed in the identification envelope. The elector 4763
shall sign the identification envelope not later than the close 4764
of the polls on the day of the election. The elector then shall 4765
cause the identification envelope to be placed within the return 4766
envelope, sealed in the return envelope, and mailed to the board 4767
of elections to which it is addressed. 4768
(B) The (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division 4769
(B)(2) of this section, the elector shall provide one of the 4770
following: 4771
(1) (a) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state 4772
identification card number on the statement of voter on the 4773
identification envelope; 4774
(2) (b) The last four digits of the elector's social 4775
security number on the statement of voter on the identification 4776
envelope; 4777
(3) (c) A copy of the elector's photo identification in 4778
the return envelope with the identification envelope. 4779
(2) If the elector is casting a provisional uniformed 4780
services or overseas absent voter's ballot, the elector shall 4781
provide the applicable identification and other information 4782
required by the form described in section 3511.052 of the 4783
Revised Code. 4784
(C) Every uniformed services or overseas absent voter's 4785
ballot identification envelope shall be accompanied by the 4786

S. B. No. 153 Page 166
As Introduced
following statement in boldface capital letters: WHOEVER COMMITS 4787
ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH 4788
DEGREE. 4789
(D) The elector shall cause the uniformed services or 4790
overseas absent voter's ballots to be returned to the office of 4791
the board of elections in a manner described in division (C) of 4792
section 3509.05 of the Revised Code, provided that the elector 4793
shall not be required to prepay the postage on the return 4794
envelope if, under 39 U.S.C. 3406, no postage is required. 4795
Sec. 3511.11. (A) Uniformed services or overseas absent 4796
voter's ballots delivered to the office of the board of 4797
elections not later than the close of the polls on election day 4798
shall be processed and counted in the manner provided in section 4799
3509.06 of the Revised Code or in the manner provided in 4800
division (D) of section 3511.052 of the Revised Code, as 4801
applicable. 4802
(B) A return envelope is not required to be postmarked in 4803
order for a uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot 4804
contained in it to be valid. Except as otherwise provided in 4805
this division, whether or not the return envelope containing the 4806
ballot is postmarked, contains a late postmark, or contains an 4807
illegible postmark, a uniformed services or overseas absent 4808
voter's ballot that is received by mail after the close of the 4809
polls on election day through the fourth day after the election 4810
day shall be processed and counted on the fifth day after the 4811
election day at the office of the board of elections in the 4812
manner provided in section 3509.06 of the Revised Code if the 4813
voter signed the identification envelope by the close of the 4814
polls on election day. However, if a return envelope containing 4815
a uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot is so 4816

S. B. No. 153 Page 167
As Introduced
received, but the identification envelope in it is signed after 4817
the close of the polls on election day, the uniformed services 4818
or overseas absent voter's ballot shall not be counted. 4819
(C) The following types of uniformed services or overseas 4820
absent voter's ballots shall not be counted: 4821
(1) Uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots 4822
that are received by the board of elections after the close of 4823
the polls on the day of the election, and that contain an 4824
identification envelope that is signed after the close of the 4825
polls on election day; 4826
(2) Uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots 4827
that are received after the fourth day following the election. 4828
The uncounted ballots shall be preserved in their 4829
identification envelopes unopened until the time provided by 4830
section 3505.31 of the Revised Code for the destruction of all 4831
other ballots used at the election for which ballots were 4832
provided, at which time they shall be destroyed. 4833
Sec. 3511.14. (A) A Subject to division (C) of this 4834
section, a board of elections shall accept and process federal 4835
write-in absentee ballots cast under the Uniformed and Overseas 4836
Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. 20302 and 20303, for all 4837
elections for office and for all ballot questions and issues as 4838
required under "The Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee 4839
Voting Act," Pub. L. No. 99-410, 100 Stat. 924, 42 U.S.C. 4840
1973ff, et seq., as amended. 4841
(B) A uniformed services or overseas voter may use the 4842
declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot to 4843
apply to register to vote simultaneously with the submission of 4844
the federal write-in absentee ballot, if the declaration is 4845

S. B. No. 153 Page 168
As Introduced
received not later than thirty days before the day of the 4846
election. If the declaration is received after that date, the 4847
declaration shall be considered an application to register to 4848
vote for all subsequent elections. 4849
(C) A uniformed services or overseas absent voter who 4850
otherwise would be required to cast a provisional ballot under 4851
division (B)(1) of section 3503.201 of the Revised Code, but for 4852
no other reason, may cast a federal write-in absentee ballot 4853
under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 4854
52 U.S.C. 20302 and 20303, in a general election for federal 4855
office. The votes on such a voter's ballot shall be counted only 4856
for federal candidates and not for any state or local candidate 4857
or any ballot issue or question appearing on the ballot at the 4858
election. 4859
Sec. 3513.07. The form of declaration of candidacy and 4860
petition of a person desiring to be a candidate for a party 4861
nomination or a candidate for election to an office or position 4862
to be voted for at a primary election shall be substantially as 4863
follows: 4864
"DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY PARTY PRIMARY ELECTION 4865
I, ___________________________ (Name of Candidate), the 4866
undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election 4867
falsification that my voting residence is in _______________ 4868
precinct of the _____________________________ (Township) or 4869
(Ward and City or Village) in the county of ________________, 4870
Ohio; that my voting residence is _______________ (Street and 4871
Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the 4872
_____________________________ (City or Village) of 4873
_________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector in 4874
the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I am a 4875

S. B. No. 153 Page 169
As Introduced
member of the ________ Party. I hereby declare that I desire to 4876
be ____________________ (a candidate for nomination as a 4877
candidate of the Party for election to the office of 4878
_____________) (a candidate for election to the office or 4879
position of ______________) for the ____________ in the state, 4880
district, (Full term or unexpired term ending _______________) 4881
county, city, or village of ___________________, at the primary 4882
election to be held on the _____________ day of _________, ____, 4883
and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official 4884
primary election ballot of the said __________ Party as a 4885
candidate for _________ (such nomination) or (such election) as 4886
provided by law. 4887
I further declare that, if elected to said office or 4888
position, I will qualify therefor, and that I will support and 4889
abide by the principles enunciated by the ____________ Party. 4890
Dated this __________ day of _________________, _________ 4891
__________________________________ 4892
(Signature of candidate) 4893
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 4894
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. 4895
PETITION OF CANDIDATE 4896
We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of 4897
Ohio, whose voting residence is in the county, city, village, 4898
ward, township, or school district, and precinct set opposite 4899
our names, and members of the 4900
_______________________________________ Party, hereby certify 4901
that ____________________________ (Name of candidate) whose 4902
declaration of candidacy is filed herewith, is a member of the 4903
____________ Party, and is, in our opinion, well qualified to 4904

S. B. No. 153 Page 170
As Introduced
perform the duties of the office or position to which that 4905
candidate desires to be elected. 4906
Street City, 4907
and Village or 4908
Signature Number Township Ward Precinct County Date 4909
(Must use address on file with the board of elections) 4910
________________________________________________________________ 4911
________________________________________________________________ 4912
________________________________________________________________ 4913
STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR 4914
I, _______________________________________ (Name of 4915
circulator of petition), declares declare under penalty of 4916
election falsification that the circulator of the petition is a 4917
qualified elector of the state of Ohio and resides I reside at 4918
the address appearing below the my signature of that circulator; 4919
that the circulator is I am a member of the ___________ Party; 4920
that the circulator is I am the circulator of the foregoing 4921
petition paper containing _____________ (Number) signatures; 4922
that the circulator I witnessed the affixing of every signature; 4923
that all signers were to the best of the circulator's my 4924
knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature 4925
is to the best of the circulator's my knowledge and belief the 4926
signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of 4927
an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the 4928
Revised Code. (The circulator shall personally write the number 4929
of electors whose signatures the petition paper contains.) 4930
For the purposes of any proceeding related to this 4931
petition, I submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the 4932
State of Ohio, the Ohio Secretary of State, and the board of 4933

S. B. No. 153 Page 171
As Introduced
elections of the county in which I have circulated this 4934
petition. I understand that I may be required to testify or to 4935
produce evidence in such a proceeding. I agree to receive any 4936
service of process at the residence address I have provided. 4937
I am compensated to circulate this petition by 4938
______________________ (name and address). (The circulator shall 4939
complete the preceding sentence as required by section 3501.38 4940
of the Revised Code if the circulator is being compensated to 4941
circulate the petition.) 4942
_____________________________ 4943
(Signature of circulator) 4944
____________________________ 4945
(Address of circulator's 4946
permanent residence in this 4947
state) 4948
_________________________ 4949
(If petition is for a 4950
statewide candidate, the 4951
name and address of person 4952
employing to circulate 4953
petition, if any) 4954
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 4955
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 4956
The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of 4957
declaration of candidacy and petition, and the form shall be 4958

S. B. No. 153 Page 172
As Introduced
substantially similar to the declaration of candidacy and 4959
petition set forth in this section, that will be suitable for 4960
joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant 4961
governor. 4962
The petition provided for in this section shall be 4963
circulated only by a member of the same political party as the 4964
candidate. 4965
Sec. 3513.261. A nominating petition may consist of one or 4966
more separate petition papers, each of which shall be 4967
substantially in the form prescribed in this section. If the 4968
petition consists of more than one separate petition paper, the 4969
statement of candidacy of the candidate or joint candidates 4970
named need be signed by the candidate or joint candidates on 4971
only one of such separate petition papers, but the statement of 4972
candidacy so signed shall be copied on each other separate 4973
petition paper before the signatures of electors are placed on 4974
it. Each nominating petition containing signatures of electors 4975
of more than one county shall consist of separate petition 4976
papers each of which shall contain signatures of electors of 4977
only one county; provided that petitions containing signatures 4978
of electors of more than one county shall not thereby be 4979
declared invalid. In case petitions containing signatures of 4980
electors of more than one county are filed, the board of 4981
elections shall determine the county from which the majority of 4982
the signatures came, and only signatures from this county shall 4983
be counted. Signatures from any other county shall be invalid. 4984
All signatures on nominating petitions shall be written in 4985
ink or indelible pencil. 4986
At the time of filing a nominating petition, the candidate 4987
designated in the nominating petition, and joint candidates for 4988

S. B. No. 153 Page 173
As Introduced
governor and lieutenant governor, shall pay to the election 4989
officials with whom it is filed the fees specified for the 4990
office under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the 4991
Revised Code. The fees shall be disposed of by those election 4992
officials in the manner that is provided in section 3513.10 of 4993
the Revised Code for the disposition of other fees, and in no 4994
case shall a fee required under that section be returned to a 4995
candidate. 4996
Candidates or joint candidates whose names are written on 4997
the ballot, and who are elected, shall pay the same fees under 4998
section 3513.10 of the Revised Code that candidates who file 4999
nominating petitions pay. Payment of these fees shall be a 5000
condition precedent to the granting of their certificates of 5001
election. 5002
Each nominating petition shall contain a statement of 5003
candidacy that shall be signed by the candidate or joint 5004
candidates named in it or by an attorney in fact acting pursuant 5005
to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. Such statement of 5006
candidacy shall contain a declaration made under penalty of 5007
election falsification that the candidate desires to be a 5008
candidate for the office named in it, and that the candidate is 5009
an elector qualified to vote for the office the candidate seeks. 5010
The form of the nominating petition and statement of 5011
candidacy shall be substantially as follows: 5012
"STATEMENT OF CANDIDACY 5013
I, ___________________________________ (Name of 5014
candidate), the undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of 5015
election falsification that my voting residence is in 5016
________________ __________ Precinct of the 5017

S. B. No. 153 Page 174
As Introduced
_________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City, or 5018
Village) in the county of _______________ Ohio; that my post- 5019
office address is ____________________________ (Street and 5020
Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the 5021
_______________________________ (City, Village, or post office) 5022
of ____________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector 5023
in the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I 5024
hereby declare that I desire to be a candidate for election to 5025
the office of ______________ in the ________________________ 5026
(State, District, County, City, Village, Township, or School 5027
District) for the ______________________________________ (Full 5028
term or unexpired term ending ________________) at the General 5029
Election to be held on the ___________ day of ___________, ____ 5030
I further declare that I am an elector qualified to vote 5031
for the office I seek. Dated this _______ day of ______________, 5032
____ 5033
___________________________ 5034
(Signature of candidate) 5035
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 5036
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. 5037
I, _________________________________, hereby constitute 5038
the persons named below a committee to represent me: 5039
Name Residence 5040
_______________________________________________________________ 5041
_______________________________________________________________ 5042
_______________________________________________________________ 5043
_______________________________________________________________ 5044

S. B. No. 153 Page 175
As Introduced
________________________________________________________________ 5045
The designated agent of the committee is _________________ 5046
(name). Notice of all matters or proceedings pertaining to this 5047
petition may be served on the agent at ________________________ 5048
(address). 5049
NOMINATING PETITION 5050
We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of 5051
Ohio, whose voting residence is in the County, City, Village, 5052
Ward, Township or Precinct set opposite our names, hereby 5053
nominate ____________________ as a candidate for election to the 5054
office of ___________________________ in the 5055
____________________________ (State, District, County, City, 5056
Village, Township, or School District) for the _________________ 5057
(Full term or unexpired term ending ___________________) to be 5058
voted for at the general election next hereafter to be held, and 5059
certify that this person is, in our opinion, well qualified to 5060
perform the duties of the office or position to which the person 5061
desires to be elected. 5062
5063
1 2 3 4 5 6 7
A Street
B Address
C or R.F.D.
D (Must use
E address on City,
F file with Village

S. B. No. 153 Page 176
As Introduced
G the board of or Date of
H Signature elections) Township Ward Precinct County Signing
____________________________________________________________ 5064
____________________________________________________________ 5065
____________________________________________________________ 5066
STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR 5067
I, ___________________________, declares declare under penalty 5068
of election falsification that such person is a qualified 5069
elector of the state of Ohio and resides I reside at the address 5070
appearing below such person's my signature hereto; that such 5071
person is I am the circulator of the foregoing petition paper 5072
containing ________________ signatures; that such person I 5073
witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were 5074
to the best of such person's my knowledge and belief qualified 5075
to sign; and that every signature is to the best of such 5076
person's my knowledge and belief the signature of the person 5077
whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact 5078
acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. (The 5079
circulator shall personally write the number of electors whose 5080
signatures the petition paper contains.) 5081
For the purposes of any proceeding related to this 5082
petition, I submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the 5083
State of Ohio, the Ohio Secretary of State, and the board of 5084
elections of the county in which I have circulated this 5085
petition. I understand that I may be required to testify or to 5086
produce evidence in such a proceeding. I agree to receive any 5087
service of process at the residence address I have provided. 5088

S. B. No. 153 Page 177
As Introduced
I am compensated to circulate this petition by 5089
______________________ (name and address). (The circulator shall 5090
complete the preceding sentence as required by section 3501.38 5091
of the Revised Code if the circulator is being compensated to 5092
circulate the petition.) 5093
___________________________ 5094
(Signature of circulator) 5095
___________________________ 5096
(Address of circulator's 5097
permanent residence 5098
in this state) 5099
___________________________ 5100
(If petition is for a statewide 5101
candidate, the name and address 5102
of person employing circulator 5103
to circulate petition, if any) 5104
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 5105
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 5106
The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of 5107
nominating petition for a group of candidates for the office of 5108
member of a board of education, township office, and offices of 5109
municipal corporations of under two thousand population. 5110
The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of statement 5111
of candidacy and nominating petition, which shall be 5112
substantially similar to the form of statement of candidacy and 5113
nominating petition set forth in this section, that will be 5114

S. B. No. 153 Page 178
As Introduced
suitable for joint candidates for the offices of governor and 5115
lieutenant governor. 5116
If such petition nominates a candidate whose election is 5117
to be determined by the electors of a county or a district or 5118
subdivision within the county, it shall be filed with the board 5119
of such county. If the petition nominates a candidate whose 5120
election is to be determined by the voters of a subdivision 5121
located in more than one county, it shall be filed with the 5122
board of the county in which the major portion of the population 5123
of such subdivision is located. 5124
If the petition nominates a candidate whose election is to 5125
be determined by the electors of a district comprised of more 5126
than one county but less than all of the counties of the state, 5127
it shall be filed with the board of elections of the most 5128
populous county in such district. If the petition nominates a 5129
candidate whose election is to be determined by the electors of 5130
the state at large, it shall be filed with the secretary of 5131
state. 5132
The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not 5133
accept for filing a nominating petition of a person seeking to 5134
become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has 5135
already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of 5136
intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or 5137
has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary 5138
election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 5139
3513.31 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county 5140
office, if the nominating petition is for a state or county 5141
office, or for any municipal or township office, for member of a 5142
city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for 5143
member of a governing board of an educational service center, if 5144

S. B. No. 153 Page 179
As Introduced
the nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, 5145
or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of 5146
education, or for member of a governing board of an educational 5147
service center. 5148
Sec. 3517.01. (A)(1) A political party within the meaning 5149
of Title XXXV of the Revised Code is any group of voters that 5150
meets either of the following requirements: 5151
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, at the 5152
most recent regular state election, the group polled for its 5153
candidate for governor in the state or nominees for presidential 5154
electors at least three per cent of the entire vote cast for 5155
that office. A group that meets the requirements of this 5156
division remains a political party for a period of four years 5157
after meeting those requirements. 5158
(b) The group filed with the secretary of state, 5159
subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division 5160
(A)(1)(a) of this section, a party formation petition that meets 5161
all of the following requirements: 5162
(i) The petition is signed by qualified electors equal in 5163
number to at least one per cent of the total vote for governor 5164
or nominees for presidential electors at the most recent 5165
election for such office. 5166
(ii) The petition is signed by not fewer than five hundred 5167
qualified electors from each of at least a minimum of one-half 5168
of the congressional districts in this state. If an odd number 5169
of congressional districts exists in this state, the number of 5170
districts that results from dividing the number of congressional 5171
districts by two shall be rounded up to the next whole number. 5172
(iii) The petition declares the petitioners' intention of 5173

S. B. No. 153 Page 180
As Introduced
organizing a political party, the name of which shall be stated 5174
in the declaration, and of participating in the succeeding 5175
general election, held in even-numbered years, that occurs more 5176
than one hundred twenty-five days after the date of filing. 5177
(iv) The petition designates a committee of not less than 5178
three nor more than five individuals of the petitioners, who 5179
shall represent the petitioners in all matters relating to the 5180
petition. Notice of all matters or proceedings pertaining to the 5181
petition may be served on the committee, or any of them 5182
committee's agent designated under division (N)(1) of section 5183
3501.38 of the Revised Code, either personally or by registered 5184
mail, or by leaving such notice at the agent's usual place of 5185
residence of each of them. 5186
(2) No such group of electors shall assume a name or 5187
designation that is similar, in the opinion of the secretary of 5188
state, to that of an existing political party as to confuse or 5189
mislead the voters at an election. 5190
(B) A campaign committee shall be legally liable for any 5191
debts, contracts, or expenditures incurred or executed in its 5192
name. 5193
(C) Notwithstanding the definitions found in section 5194
3501.01 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and 5195
sections 3517.08 to 3517.14, 3517.99, and 3517.992 of the 5196
Revised Code: 5197
(1) "Campaign committee" means a candidate or a 5198
combination of two or more persons authorized by a candidate 5199
under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code to receive 5200
contributions and make expenditures. 5201
(2) "Campaign treasurer" means an individual appointed by 5202

S. B. No. 153 Page 181
As Introduced
a candidate under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code. 5203
(3) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in division (H) of 5204
section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes any person 5205
who, at any time before or after an election, receives 5206
contributions or makes expenditures or other use of 5207
contributions, has given consent for another to receive 5208
contributions or make expenditures or other use of 5209
contributions, or appoints a campaign treasurer, for the purpose 5210
of bringing about the person's nomination or election to public 5211
office. When two persons jointly seek the offices of governor 5212
and lieutenant governor, "candidate" means the pair of 5213
candidates jointly. "Candidate" does not include candidates for 5214
election to the offices of member of a county or state central 5215
committee, presidential elector, and delegate to a national 5216
convention or conference of a political party. 5217
(4) "Continuing association" means an association, other 5218
than a campaign committee, political party, legislative campaign 5219
fund, political contributing entity, or labor organization, that 5220
is intended to be a permanent organization that has a primary 5221
purpose other than supporting or opposing specific candidates, 5222
political parties, or ballot issues, and that functions on a 5223
regular basis throughout the year. "Continuing association" 5224
includes organizations that are determined to be not organized 5225
for profit under subsection 501 and that are described in 5226
subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(6) of the Internal 5227
Revenue Code. 5228
(5) "Contribution" means a loan, gift, deposit, 5229
forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, payment, or 5230
transfer of funds or anything of value, including a transfer of 5231
funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's 5232

S. B. No. 153 Page 182
As Introduced
estate, and the payment by any person other than the person to 5233
whom the services are rendered for the personal services of 5234
another person, which contribution is made, received, or used 5235
for the purpose of influencing the results of an election. Any 5236
loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, 5237
advance, payment, or transfer of funds or of anything of value, 5238
including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or 5239
testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any 5240
campaign committee, political action committee, legislative 5241
campaign fund, political party, political contributing entity, 5242
or person other than the person to whom the services are 5243
rendered for the personal services of another person, that is 5244
made, received, or used by a state or county political party, 5245
other than the moneys an entity may receive under sections 5246
3517.101, 3517.1012, and 3517.1013 of the Revised Code, shall be 5247
considered to be a "contribution" for the purpose of section 5248
3517.10 of the Revised Code and shall be included on a statement 5249
of contributions filed under that section. 5250
"Contribution" does not include any of the following: 5251
(a) Services provided without compensation by individuals 5252
volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a 5253
person; 5254
(b) Ordinary home hospitality; 5255
(c) The personal expenses of a volunteer paid for by that 5256
volunteer campaign worker; 5257
(d) Any gift given to an entity pursuant to section 5258
3517.101 of the Revised Code; 5259
(e) Any contribution as defined in section 3517.1011 of 5260
the Revised Code that is made, received, or used to pay the 5261

S. B. No. 153 Page 183
As Introduced
direct costs of producing or airing an electioneering 5262
communication; 5263
(f) Any gift given to a state or county political party 5264
for the party's restricted fund under division (A)(2) of section 5265
3517.1012 of the Revised Code; 5266
(g) Any gift given to a state political party for deposit 5267
in a Levin account pursuant to section 3517.1013 of the Revised 5268
Code. As used in this division, "Levin account" has the same 5269
meaning as in that section. 5270
(h) Any donation given to a transition fund under section 5271
3517.1014 of the Revised Code. 5272
(6) "Expenditure" means the disbursement or use of a 5273
contribution for the purpose of influencing the results of an 5274
election or of making a charitable donation under division (G) 5275
of section 3517.08 of the Revised Code. Any disbursement or use 5276
of a contribution by a state or county political party is an 5277
expenditure and shall be considered either to be made for the 5278
purpose of influencing the results of an election or to be made 5279
as a charitable donation under division (G) of section 3517.08 5280
of the Revised Code and shall be reported on a statement of 5281
expenditures filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. 5282
During the thirty days preceding a primary or general election, 5283
any disbursement to pay the direct costs of producing or airing 5284
a broadcast, cable, or satellite communication that refers to a 5285
clearly identified candidate shall be considered to be made for 5286
the purpose of influencing the results of that election and 5287
shall be reported as an expenditure or as an independent 5288
expenditure under section 3517.10 or 3517.105 of the Revised 5289
Code, as applicable, except that the information required to be 5290
reported regarding contributors for those expenditures or 5291

S. B. No. 153 Page 184
As Introduced
independent expenditures shall be the same as the information 5292
required to be reported under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of 5293
section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. 5294
As used in this division, "broadcast, cable, or satellite 5295
communication" and "refers to a clearly identified candidate" 5296
have the same meanings as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised 5297
Code. 5298
(7) "Personal expenses" includes, but is not limited to, 5299
ordinary expenses for accommodations, clothing, food, personal 5300
motor vehicle or airplane, and home telephone. 5301
(8) "Political action committee" means a combination of 5302
two or more persons, the primary or major purpose of which is to 5303
support or oppose any candidate, political party, or issue, or 5304
to influence the result of any election through express 5305
advocacy, and that is not a political party, a campaign 5306
committee, a political contributing entity, or a legislative 5307
campaign fund. "Political action committee" does not include 5308
either of the following: 5309
(a) A continuing association that makes disbursements for 5310
the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering 5311
communications and that does not engage in express advocacy; 5312
(b) A political club that is formed primarily for social 5313
purposes and that consists of one hundred members or less, has 5314
officers and periodic meetings, has less than two thousand five 5315
hundred dollars in its treasury at all times, and makes an 5316
aggregate total contribution of one thousand dollars or less per 5317
calendar year. 5318
(9) "Public office" means any state, county, municipal, 5319
township, or district office, except an office of a political 5320

S. B. No. 153 Page 185
As Introduced
party, that is filled by an election and the offices of United 5321
States senator and representative. 5322
(10) "Anything of value" has the same meaning as in 5323
section 1.03 of the Revised Code. 5324
(11) "Beneficiary of a campaign fund" means a candidate, a 5325
public official or employee for whose benefit a campaign fund 5326
exists, and any other person who has ever been a candidate or 5327
public official or employee and for whose benefit a campaign 5328
fund exists. 5329
(12) "Campaign fund" means money or other property, 5330
including contributions. 5331
(13) "Public official or employee" has the same meaning as 5332
in section 102.01 of the Revised Code. 5333
(14) "Caucus" means all of the members of the house of 5334
representatives or all of the members of the senate of the 5335
general assembly who are members of the same political party. 5336
(15) "Legislative campaign fund" means a fund that is 5337
established as an auxiliary of a state political party and 5338
associated with one of the houses of the general assembly. 5339
(16) "In-kind contribution" means anything of value other 5340
than money that is used to influence the results of an election 5341
or is transferred to or used in support of or in opposition to a 5342
candidate, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, 5343
political party, political action committee, or political 5344
contributing entity and that is made with the consent of, in 5345
coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the 5346
request or suggestion of the benefited candidate, committee, 5347
fund, party, or entity. The financing of the dissemination, 5348
distribution, or republication, in whole or part, of any 5349

S. B. No. 153 Page 186
As Introduced
broadcast or of any written, graphic, or other form of campaign 5350
materials prepared by the candidate, the candidate's campaign 5351
committee, or their authorized agents is an in-kind contribution 5352
to the candidate and an expenditure by the candidate. 5353
(17) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure by a 5354
person advocating the election or defeat of an identified 5355
candidate or candidates, that is not made with the consent of, 5356
in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the 5357
request or suggestion of any candidate or candidates or of the 5358
campaign committee or agent of the candidate or candidates. As 5359
used in division (C)(17) of this section: 5360
(a) "Person" means an individual, partnership, 5361
unincorporated business organization or association, political 5362
action committee, political contributing entity, separate 5363
segregated fund, association, or other organization or group of 5364
persons, but not a labor organization or a corporation unless 5365
the labor organization or corporation is a political 5366
contributing entity. 5367
(b) "Advocating" means any communication containing a 5368
message advocating election or defeat. 5369
(c) "Identified candidate" means that the name of the 5370
candidate appears, a photograph or drawing of the candidate 5371
appears, or the identity of the candidate is otherwise apparent 5372
by unambiguous reference. 5373
(d) "Made in coordination, cooperation, or consultation 5374
with, or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or the 5375
campaign committee or agent of the candidate" means made 5376
pursuant to any arrangement, coordination, or direction by the 5377
candidate, the candidate's campaign committee, or the 5378

S. B. No. 153 Page 187
As Introduced
candidate's agent prior to the publication, distribution, 5379
display, or broadcast of the communication. An expenditure is 5380
presumed to be so made when it is any of the following: 5381
(i) Based on information about the candidate's plans, 5382
projects, or needs provided to the person making the expenditure 5383
by the candidate, or by the candidate's campaign committee or 5384
agent, with a view toward having an expenditure made; 5385
(ii) Made by or through any person who is, or has been, 5386
authorized to raise or expend funds, who is, or has been, an 5387
officer of the candidate's campaign committee, or who is, or has 5388
been, receiving any form of compensation or reimbursement from 5389
the candidate or the candidate's campaign committee or agent; 5390
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of 5391
section 3517.105 of the Revised Code, made by a political party 5392
in support of a candidate, unless the expenditure is made by a 5393
political party to conduct voter registration or voter education 5394
efforts. 5395
(e) "Agent" means any person who has actual oral or 5396
written authority, either express or implied, to make or to 5397
authorize the making of expenditures on behalf of a candidate, 5398
or means any person who has been placed in a position with the 5399
candidate's campaign committee or organization such that it 5400
would reasonably appear that in the ordinary course of campaign- 5401
related activities the person may authorize expenditures. 5402
(18) "Labor organization" means a labor union; an employee 5403
organization; a federation of labor unions, groups, locals, or 5404
other employee organizations; an auxiliary of a labor union, 5405
employee organization, or federation of labor unions, groups, 5406
locals, or other employee organizations; or any other bona fide 5407

S. B. No. 153 Page 188
As Introduced
organization in which employees participate and that exists for 5408
the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers 5409
concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours, and other 5410
terms and conditions of employment. 5411
(19) "Separate segregated fund" means a separate 5412
segregated fund established pursuant to the Federal Election 5413
Campaign Act. 5414
(20) "Federal Election Campaign Act" means the "Federal 5415
Election Campaign Act of 1971," 86 Stat. 11, 2 U.S.C.A. 431, et 5416
seq., as amended. 5417
(21) "Restricted fund" means the fund a state or county 5418
political party must establish under division (A)(1) of section 5419
3517.1012 of the Revised Code. 5420
(22) "Electioneering communication" has the same meaning 5421
as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. 5422
(23) "Express advocacy" means a communication that 5423
contains express words advocating the nomination, election, or 5424
defeat of a candidate or that contains express words advocating 5425
the adoption or defeat of a question or issue, as determined by 5426
a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. 5427
(24) "Political committee" has the same meaning as in 5428
section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. 5429
(25) "Political contributing entity" means any entity, 5430
including a corporation or labor organization, that may lawfully 5431
make contributions and expenditures and that is not an 5432
individual or a political action committee, continuing 5433
association, campaign committee, political party, legislative 5434
campaign fund, designated state campaign committee, or state 5435
candidate fund. For purposes of this division, "lawfully" means 5436

S. B. No. 153 Page 189
As Introduced
not prohibited by any section of the Revised Code, or authorized 5437
by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. 5438
(26) "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning 5439
as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. 5440
Sec. 3517.12. (A) Prior to receiving a contribution or 5441
making an expenditure, the circulator or committee in charge of 5442
an initiative or referendum petition, or supplementary petition 5443
for additional signatures, for the submission of a 5444
constitutional amendment, proposed law, section, or item of any 5445
law shall appoint a treasurer and shall file with the secretary 5446
of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, 5447
include a designation of that appointment, including the full 5448
name and address of the treasurer and of the circulator or 5449
committee on the statement described in division (B) of section 5450
3519.02 of the Revised Code. 5451
(B) The circulator or the committee in charge of an 5452
initiative or referendum petition, or supplementary petition for 5453
additional signatures, for the submission of a constitutional 5454
amendment, proposed law, section, or item of any law shall, 5455
within thirty days after those petition papers are filed, file 5456
with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the 5457
secretary of state, an itemized statement, made under penalty of 5458
election falsification, showing in detail the following: 5459
(1) All money or things of value paid, given, promised, or 5460
received for circulating the petitions; 5461
(2) All appointments, promotions, contracts, or increases 5462
in salary pay, in positions which were given, promised, or 5463
received, or to obtain which assistance was given, promised, or 5464
received as a consideration for work done in circulating 5465

S. B. No. 153 Page 190
As Introduced
petitions; 5466
(3) Full names and addresses, including street, city, and 5467
state, of all persons to whom such payments or promises were 5468
made and of all persons from whom such payments or promises were 5469
received; 5470
(4) Full names and addresses, including street, city, and 5471
state, of all persons who contributed anything of value to be 5472
used in circulating the petitions, and the amounts of those 5473
contributions; 5474
(5) Time spent and salaries pay earned while soliciting 5475
signatures to petitions by persons who were regular salaried 5476
employees or contractors of some person or whom that employer 5477
authorized to solicit as part of their regular duties. 5478
If no money or things of value were paid or received or if 5479
no promises were made or received as a consideration for work 5480
done in circulating a petition, the statement shall contain 5481
words to that effect. 5482
(C) The treasurer designated under division (A) of this 5483
section shall file statements of contributions and expenditures 5484
in accordance with section 3517.10 of the Revised Code regarding 5485
all contributions made or received and all expenditures made by 5486
that treasurer or the circulator or committee in connection with 5487
the initiative or referendum petition, or supplementary petition 5488
for additional signatures, for the submission of a 5489
constitutional amendment, proposed law, section, or item of any 5490
law. 5491
Sec. 3519.02. The (A) As used in this section, 5492
"contribution" and "expenditure" have the same meanings as in 5493
section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. 5494

S. B. No. 153 Page 191
As Introduced
(B) Before circulating any initiative or referendum 5495
petition, including a petition described in section 3519.01 of 5496
the Revised Code, and before receiving a contribution or making 5497
an expenditure, the petitioners shall designate in any 5498
initiative, referendum, or supplementary petition and on each of 5499
the several parts of such petition a file with the secretary of 5500
state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a 5501
statement containing all of the following information: 5502
(1) The full names and addresses of a committee of not 5503
less than three nor more than five of their number the 5504
petitioners, who shall represent them in all matters relating to 5505
such petitions. Notice ; 5506
(2) The full name and address of the committee's 5507
treasurer; 5508
(3) The full name and address of an agent upon whom notice 5509
of all matters or proceedings pertaining to such petitions may 5510
be served on said committee, or any of them, either personally 5511
or by registered mail, or by leaving such notice at the usual 5512
place of residence of each of them; 5513
(4) A designation of one or more members or agents of the 5514
committee who consent to testify on behalf of the committee. The 5515
designation may set out the matters on which each person 5516
designated may testify. 5517
(C) The committee promptly shall update the statement 5518
described in division (B) of this section with the secretary of 5519
state if the information in the statement changes during the 5520
time that the committee is circulating the petition. If the law, 5521
constitutional amendment, or referendum is certified to appear 5522
on the ballot, the committee promptly shall update that 5523

S. B. No. 153 Page 192
As Introduced
information if it changes at any time before the day of the 5524
election. 5525
(D) Each part-petition shall include the names of the 5526
members of the committee and the name and address of the 5527
committee's agent designated under division (B)(3) of this 5528
section as they exist at the time the part-petition is printed. 5529
Sec. 3519.05. (A) If the measure to be submitted proposes 5530
a constitutional amendment, the heading of each part of the 5531
petition shall be prepared in the following form, and printed in 5532
capital letters in type of the approximate size set forth: 5533
"INITIATIVE PETITION 5534
Amendment to the Constitution 5535
Proposed by Initiative Petition 5536
To be submitted directly to the electors" 5537
"Amendment" printed in fourteen-point boldface type shall 5538
precede the title, which shall be briefly expressed and printed 5539
in eight-point type. The summary shall then be set forth printed 5540
in ten-point type, and then shall follow the certification of 5541
the attorney general, under proper date, which shall also be 5542
printed in ten-point type. The petition shall then set forth the 5543
names and addresses of the members of the petition committee of 5544
not less than three nor more than five to represent the 5545
petitioners in all matters relating to the petition or its 5546
circulation designated under section 3519.02 of the Revised Code 5547
and the name and address of the petition committee's agent 5548
designated under division (B)(3) of that section. 5549
Immediately above the heading of the place for signatures 5550
on each part of the petition the following notice shall be 5551

S. B. No. 153 Page 193
As Introduced
printed in boldface type: 5552
"NOTICE 5553
Whoever knowingly signs this petition more than once; 5554
except as provided in section 3501.382 of the Revised Code, 5555
signs a name other than one's own on this petition; or signs 5556
this petition when not a qualified voter, is liable to 5557
prosecution." 5558
The heading of the place for signatures shall be 5559
substantially as follows: 5560
"(Sign with ink. Your name, residence, and date of signing must 5561
be given.) 5562
_______________________________________________________________ 5563
5564
1 2 3 4 5 6 7
A Rural Route or
B other Post-
C Signature County Township office Address Month Day Year
_______________________________________________________________ 5565
(Voters who do not live in a municipal corporation should fill 5566
in the information called for by headings printed above.) 5567
(Voters who reside in municipal corporations should fill in the 5568
information called for by headings printed below.) 5569
_______________________________________________________________ 5570
5571
1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9

S. B. No. 153 Page 194
As Introduced
A City Street
B or and
C Signature County Village Number Ward Precinct Month Day Year"
_______________________________________________________________ 5572
The text of the proposed amendment shall be printed in 5573
full, immediately following the place for signatures, and shall 5574
be prefaced by "Be it resolved by the people of the State of 5575
Ohio." Immediately following the text of the proposed amendment 5576
must appear the following form: 5577
"I, _________, declare under penalty of election 5578
falsification that I am the circulator of the foregoing petition 5579
paper containing the signatures of _________ electors, that the 5580
signatures appended hereto were made and appended in my presence 5581
on the date set opposite each respective name, and are the 5582
signatures of the persons whose names they purport to be or of 5583
attorneys in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the 5584
Revised Code, and that the electors signing this petition did so 5585
with knowledge of the contents of same. I (The circulator shall 5586
personally write the number of electors whose signatures the 5587
petition paper contains.) 5588
For the purposes of any proceeding related to this 5589
petition, I submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the 5590
State of Ohio, the Ohio Secretary of State, and the board of 5591
elections of the county in which I have circulated this 5592
petition. I understand that I may be required to testify or to 5593
produce evidence in such a proceeding. I agree to receive any 5594
service of process at the residence address I have provided. 5595

S. B. No. 153 Page 195
As Introduced
I am employed compensated to circulate this petition by 5596
________________________________ (Name and address of employer). 5597
(The preceding sentence shall be completed as required by 5598
section 3501.38 of the Revised Code if the circulator is being 5599
employed compensated to circulate the petition.) 5600
(Signed) ________________________ 5601
(Address of circulator's permanent 5602
residence in this state) 5603
__________________________________ 5604
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 5605
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 5606
(B) If the measure proposes a law, the heading of each 5607
part of the petition shall be prepared as follows: 5608
"INITIATIVE PETITION 5609
Law proposed by initiative petition first to be submitted 5610
to the General Assembly." 5611
In all other respects, the form shall be as provided for 5612
the submission of a constitutional amendment, except that the 5613
text of the proposed law shall be prefaced by "Be it enacted by 5614
the people of the state of Ohio." 5615
The form for a supplementary initiative petition shall be 5616
the same as that provided for an initiative petition, with the 5617
exception that "supplementary" shall precede "initiative" in the 5618
title thereof. 5619
(C) The general provisions set forth in this section 5620
relative to the form and order of an initiative petition shall 5621
be, so far as practical, applicable to a referendum petition, 5622

S. B. No. 153 Page 196
As Introduced
the heading of which shall be as follows: 5623
"REFERENDUM PETITION 5624
To be submitted to the electors for their approval or 5625
rejection" 5626
The title, which follows the heading, shall contain a 5627
brief legislative history of the law, section, or item of law to 5628
be referred. The text of the law so referred shall be followed 5629
by the certification of the secretary of state, in accordance 5630
with division (B)(2)(b) of section 3519.01 of the Revised Code, 5631
that it has been compared with the copy of the enrolled act, on 5632
file in the secretary of state's office, containing such law, 5633
section, or item of law, and found to be correct. 5634
(D) The secretary of state shall prescribe a form for part 5635
petitions to be submitted during the ten-day period beginning on 5636
the first day following the date that the secretary of state 5637
notifies the chairperson of the committee interested in the 5638
petition committee's agent that the petition has an insufficient 5639
number of valid signatures. The secretary of state shall provide 5640
to each particular committee a different form that contains a 5641
unique identifier and that is separate from the forms prescribed 5642
in divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section. The secretary of 5643
state shall make the form available to the committee only as 5644
described in division (F) of section 3519.16 of the Revised 5645
Code. The form shall not be considered a public record until 5646
after the secretary of state makes it available to the committee 5647
under that division. 5648
The form shall comply with the requirements of Section 1g 5649
of Article II, Ohio Constitution and, except as otherwise 5650
provided in this division, with the requirements of divisions 5651

S. B. No. 153 Page 197
As Introduced
(A), (B), and (C) of this section. 5652
Sec. 3519.16. (A) Pursuant to Section 1g of Article II, 5653
Ohio Constitution, the supreme court of Ohio shall have 5654
exclusive original jurisdiction in all challenges to initiative 5655
and referendum petitions. 5656
(B) The committee interested in a petition shall include 5657
upon each part-petition filed with the secretary of state a 5658
designation of the county in which the part-petition was 5659
circulated and a number for the part-petition. In any county 5660
where part-petitions are circulated, each part-petition shall be 5661
numbered sequentially. The committee shall sort the part- 5662
petitions by county. Upon filing the petition with the secretary 5663
of state, the committee also shall file the following: 5664
(1) An electronic copy of the petition along with a 5665
verification that the electronic copy is a true representation 5666
of the original filed paper petition; 5667
(2) A summary of the number of part-petitions filed per 5668
county, and the number of signatures on each part-petition; 5669
(3) An index of the electronic copy of the petition. 5670
(C) From the time the petition is initially filed with the 5671
secretary of state and until the part-petitions are returned to 5672
the secretary of state by the boards of elections after a 5673
determination of sufficiency under section 3519.15 of the 5674
Revised Code, any request for the inspection or copying of the 5675
original petition filed with the secretary of state under 5676
Chapter 149. of the Revised Code is fulfilled if the secretary 5677
of state permits the inspection of or provides copies of the 5678
electronic copy of the petition filed by the circulator. 5679
(D) Discrepancies between the electronic copy of a 5680

S. B. No. 153 Page 198
As Introduced
petition filed under division (B)(1) of this section and the 5681
original paper petition filed with the secretary of state shall 5682
not render the petition invalid. Such discrepancies, if the 5683
product of fraud, shall be subject to criminal penalties under 5684
section 3599.36 of the Revised Code. 5685
(E) The properly verified part-petitions, together with an 5686
electronic copy of the part-petitions, shall be returned to the 5687
secretary of state not less than one hundred ten days before the 5688
election, provided that, in the case of an initiated law to be 5689
presented to the general assembly, the boards shall promptly 5690
check and return the petitions together with their report. The 5691
secretary of state shall determine the sufficiency of the 5692
signatures not later than one hundred five days before the 5693
election. The secretary of state promptly shall notify the 5694
chairperson of the committee in charge of the circulation 5695
petition committee's agent as to the sufficiency or 5696
insufficiency of the petition and the extent of the 5697
insufficiency. 5698
(F) If the petition is found insufficient because of an 5699
insufficient number of valid signatures, the committee shall be 5700
allowed ten additional days after the notification by the 5701
secretary of state for the collection and filing of additional 5702
signatures to the petition. When the secretary of state makes 5703
that notification, the secretary of state simultaneously shall 5704
provide the chairperson petition committee's agent with both a 5705
paper copy and an electronic copy of the unique petition form 5706
described in division (D) of section 3519.05 of the Revised 5707
Code. At that time, the secretary of state also shall make the 5708
form available to the public on the secretary of state's 5709
official web site and shall transmit the form electronically to 5710
the boards of elections. Upon request, a board of elections 5711

S. B. No. 153 Page 199
As Introduced
shall provide a paper or electronic copy of the form to any 5712
person. 5713
No additional signatures shall be collected or submitted 5714
to the secretary of state by the committee interested in the 5715
petition, or by any person acting on behalf of the committee, 5716
during the period beginning on the date that the petition is 5717
initially submitted to the secretary of state and ending on the 5718
date that the secretary of state notifies the chairperson of the 5719
committee petition committee's agent that the petition has an 5720
insufficient number of valid signatures. If the committee, or 5721
any person acting on behalf of the committee, submits additional 5722
signatures, the signatures must be on the form provided by the 5723
secretary of state under this division and only signatures that 5724
were signed and collected during the ten-day period to collect 5725
and submit additional signatures may be submitted. 5726
If additional signatures are filed, the secretary of state 5727
shall determine the sufficiency of those additional signatures 5728
not later than sixty-five days before the election. The part- 5729
petitions of the supplementary petition that appear to the 5730
secretary of state to be properly verified, upon their receipt 5731
by the secretary of state, shall forthwith be forwarded to the 5732
boards of the several counties together with the part-petitions 5733
of the original petition that have been properly verified. They 5734
shall be immediately examined and passed upon as to the validity 5735
and sufficiency of the signatures on them by each of the boards 5736
and returned within eight days to the secretary of state with 5737
the report of each board. No signature on a supplementary part- 5738
petition that is the same as a signature on an original part- 5739
petition shall be counted. The number of signatures in both the 5740
original and supplementary petitions, properly verified, shall 5741
be used by the secretary of state in determining the total 5742

S. B. No. 153 Page 200
As Introduced
number of signatures to the petition that the secretary of state 5743
shall record and announce. If they are sufficient, the 5744
amendment, proposed law, or law shall be placed on the ballot as 5745
required by law. If the petition is found insufficient, the 5746
secretary of state shall notify the committee in charge of the 5747
circulation of the petition. 5748
Sec. 3599.12. (A) No person shall do any of the following: 5749
(1) Vote or attempt to vote in any primary, special, or 5750
general election in a precinct in which that person is not a 5751
legally qualified elector; 5752
(2) Vote or attempt to vote more than once at the same 5753
election by any means, including voting or attempting to vote 5754
both by absent voter's ballots under division (G) of section 5755
3503.16 of the Revised Code and by regular ballot at the polls 5756
at the same election, or voting or attempting to vote both by 5757
absent voter's ballots under division (G) of section 3503.16 of 5758
the Revised Code and by absent voter's ballots under Chapter 5759
3509. or armed service absent voter's ballots under Chapter 5760
3511. of the Revised Code at the same election; 5761
(3) Impersonate or sign the name of another person, real 5762
or fictitious, living or dead, and vote or attempt to vote as 5763
that other person in any such election; 5764
(4) Cast a ballot at any such election after objection has 5765
been made and sustained to that person's vote; 5766
(5) Knowingly vote or attempt to vote a ballot other than 5767
the official ballot. 5768
(B) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is 5769
guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. 5770

S. B. No. 153 Page 201
As Introduced
Sec. 3599.21. (A) No person shall knowingly do any of the 5771
following: 5772
(1) Impersonate another, or make a false representation in 5773
order to obtain an absent voter's ballot; 5774
(2) Aid or abet a person to vote an absent voter's ballot 5775
illegally; 5776
(3) If the person is an election official, open, destroy, 5777
steal, mark, or mutilate any absent voter's ballot; 5778
(4) Aid or abet another person to open, destroy, steal, 5779
mark, or mutilate any absent voter's ballot after the ballot has 5780
been voted; 5781
(5) Delay the delivery of any absent voter's ballot with a 5782
view to preventing its arrival in time to be counted; 5783
(6) Hinder or attempt to hinder the delivery or counting 5784
of such absent voter's ballot; 5785
(7) Fail to forward to the appropriate election official 5786
an absent voter's ballot application entrusted to that person to 5787
so forward; 5788
(8) Fail to forward to the appropriate election official 5789
an absent voter's ballot application entrusted to that person to 5790
so forward within ten days after that application is completed 5791
or within such a time period that the failure to so forward the 5792
application disenfranchises the voter with respect to a 5793
particular election, whichever is earlier; 5794
(9) Return the absent voter's ballot of another to the 5795
office of a board of elections, unless either of the following 5796
apply: 5797

S. B. No. 153 Page 202
As Introduced
(a) The person is a relative an assistant who is 5798
authorized to do so under division (C)(1) (D)(2), (3), or (4) of 5799
section 3509.05 of the Revised Code; 5800
(b) The person is, and is acting as, an employee or 5801
contractor of the United States postal service or a private 5802
carrier. 5803
(10) Except as authorized under Chapters 3509. and 3511. 5804
of the Revised Code, possess the absent voter's ballot of 5805
another. 5806
(B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, no 5807
person who receives compensation for soliciting persons to apply 5808
to vote by absent voter's ballots shall fail to forward to the 5809
appropriate election official an absent voter's ballot 5810
application entrusted to that person to so forward within ten 5811
days after that application is completed. 5812
(2) No person who receives compensation for soliciting 5813
persons to apply to vote by absent voter's ballots shall fail to 5814
forward to the appropriate election official an absent voter's 5815
ballot application entrusted to that person to so forward within 5816
such a time period that the failure to so forward the 5817
application disenfranchises the voter with respect to a 5818
particular election. 5819
(C) Whoever violates division (A) or (B) of this section 5820
is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. 5821
(D) As used in this section, "person who receives 5822
compensation for soliciting persons to apply to vote by absent 5823
voter's ballots" includes any effort, for compensation, to 5824
provide absent voter's ballot applications or to assist persons 5825
in completing those applications or returning them to the 5826

S. B. No. 153 Page 203
As Introduced
director of the board of elections of the county in which the 5827
applicant's voting residence is located. 5828
Section 2. That existing sections 303.12, 303.59, 307.94, 5829
3501.01, 3501.38, 3501.381, 3501.39, 3503.13, 3503.14, 3503.15, 5830
3503.151, 3503.152, 3503.153, 3503.16, 3503.19, 3503.20, 5831
3503.21, 3503.33, 3505.181, 3505.182, 3505.183, 3505.20, 5832
3509.02, 3509.03, 3509.04, 3509.05, 3509.051, 3509.06, 3509.07, 5833
3509.08, 3509.09, 3511.02, 3511.04, 3511.05, 3511.09, 3511.11, 5834
3511.14, 3513.07, 3513.261, 3517.01, 3517.12, 3519.02, 3519.05, 5835
3519.16, 3599.12, and 3599.21 of the Revised Code are hereby 5836
repealed. 5837
Section 3. A petition or part-petition described in 5838
section 3501.38 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, 5839
that is signed by one or more electors before the effective date 5840
of this section is not invalid on the ground that the petition 5841
or part-petition does not meet the requirements of the Revised 5842
Code, as amended by this act, so long as the petition or part- 5843
petition meets the requirements of the Revised Code that were in 5844
effect on the day before the effective date of this section. 5845
Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle 5846
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 5847
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 5848
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 5849
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 5850
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 5851
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 5852
as presented in this act: 5853
Section 3503.21 of the Revised Code as amended by both 5854
H.B. 359 and S.B. 63 of the 131st General Assembly. 5855

S. B. No. 153 Page 204
As Introduced
Section 3505.183 of the Revised Code as amended by both 5856
H.B. 45 and H.B. 458 of the 134th General Assembly. 5857